Mississippi, session 2026, HB1062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 29-1-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 29-1-107.  (1)  The Secretary of State with the approval of the Governor shall, as far as practicable, rent or lease all lands belonging to the state, except as otherwise provided by law for a period of not exceeding one (1) year, and account for the rents therefrom in the same manner as money received from the sale of state lands, provided that no state land shall be rented or leased to individuals, corporations, partnerships, or association of persons for hunting or fishing purposes.  Property belonging to the state in municipalities, even though it may have been subdivided into lots, blocks, divisions, or otherwise escheated or was sold to the state by such description, may likewise be leased or rented by the Secretary of State under the terms provided above for other state lands, and the rents accounted for in the same manner.  The state shall have all the liens, rights and remedies accorded to landlords in Sections 89-7-1 through 89-7-125; said leases and rental contracts shall automatically terminate on the date provided in said leases or contracts.  A person possessing a gaming license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act or who wishes to seek a gaming license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act and who further uses or wishes to use public trust tidelands as part of its proposed gaming project shall be required to obtain a tidelands lease from the Secretary of State notwithstanding any statute, law or other provision providing other authority to municipalities and counties to use the public trust tidelands, and such lease may be conditioned upon the licensee obtaining such other necessary and required approvals. (2)  (a)  The Secretary of State, with the approval of the Governor, may rent or lease surface lands, tidelands or submerged lands owned or controlled by the State of Mississippi lying in or adjacent to the Mississippi Sound or Gulf of Mexico or streams emptying therein, for a period not exceeding forty (40) years for rental payable to the state annually.  However, the term of any lease of state public trust tidelands to a person possessing a license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act shall be governed by the provisions of subsection (4) of this section. (b)  The lessee under such agreement may construct such necessary items for marking channels, docking, wharfing, mooring or fleeting vessels which shall be in aid of navigation and not obstructions thereto. (c)  A lessee of record may be given the option to renew for an additional period not to exceed twenty-five (25) years; however, the term of a renewal for a lease of state public trust tidelands to a person possessing a gaming license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act shall be governed by the provisions of subsection (4) of this section.  The holder of a lease of Public Trust Tidelands, at the expiration thereof, shall have a prior right, exclusive of all other persons, to re-lease as may be agreed upon between the holder of the lease and the Secretary of State. (d)  Leases shall provide for review and rent adjustments at each fifth anniversary tied either to the All Urban Consumer Price Index-All Items (CPI) or to an appraisal which deducts the value of any improvements by the lessee which substantially enhance the value of the land.  In the case where the initial rental was based on the value set by the ad valorem tax rolls, then the rent review and adjustment clause shall be likewise based on the value set by such tax rolls.  In the event that the lessor and lessee cannot agree on a rental amount, the lease may be cancelled at the option of the lessor.  The lessee shall, within thirty (30) days after execution of a sublease or assignment, file a copy thereof, including the total consideration therefor, with the Secretary of State.  This paragraph shall not apply to a lease of state public trust tidelands or submerged lands to a person possessing a gaming license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act who operates a gaming establishment on such tidelands or submerged lands or to a person who wishes to seek a gaming license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act and to use public trust tidelands or submerged lands as part of its proposed gaming project. (3)  Provided, however, the current occupants of public trust tidelands that were developed after the determinable mean high-water line nearest the effective date of the Coastal Wetlands Protection Law shall pay an annual rental based on the fair market value as determined by the assessed valuation of the property.  The holder of a lease of Public Trust Tidelands, at the expiration thereof, shall have a prior right, exclusive of all other persons, to re-lease as may be agreed upon between the holder of the lease and the Secretary of State. (4)  (a)  This section shall apply to any person possessing a license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act or who wishes to seek a license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act and who operates or proposes to operate a gaming establishment in any of the three (3) most southern counties of the state.  Any gaming licensee or proposed licensee shall be required to obtain a lease from the Secretary of State to use any state public trust tidelands notwithstanding any statute, law or other provision providing other authority to municipalities and counties to use the public trust tidelands.  To locate onshore and qualify to pay the in-lieu tidelands assessment, a gaming operation must have or show that it would have been able to receive a lease of public trust tidelands from the State of Mississippi through the Secretary of State for a gaming operation. (b)  The following shall apply to all leases of state public trust tidelands executed by such a licensee: (i)  Every lease executed after August 29, 2005, shall be for a period of thirty (30) years for rental payable to the state annually. (ii)  By operation of this section, any lease executed before August 29, 2005, may, at the option of the lessee, either remain at the term stated in the original execution of the lease or be converted to a thirty-year term lease, beginning on such date after August 29, 2005, that the lessee either resumes or begins permanent gaming activities as approved by the Mississippi Gaming Commission, and the lessee shall be required to comply with all other provisions of the lease. Should the lessee choose to operate in a structure that is not on state public trust tidelands and that is on property contiguous to state public trust tidelands leased by the State of Mississippi to the lessee, the lessee shall be required to comply with all other provisions of the lease with the State of Mississippi and shall be exempt from the assessment provided for in paragraph (c) of this subsection.  Easements for and rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of a parcel of property.  In the event that a lessee does not elect either to remain bound by the original term of the lease with the State of Mississippi or to convert the lease to a thirty-year term, the Secretary of State may lease the state public trust tidelands that are the subject of the lease to any other person or entity. (iii)  Leases shall provide for review and rent adjustments at each annual anniversary tied to the All Urban Consumer Price Index-All Items (CPI).  In the case of the renewal of a lease after the expiration of the original thirty-year term under this subsection, each renewal shall be for a term of thirty (30) years.  The base rate to which the CPI shall apply for purposes of executing the subsequent lease shall be negotiated by the lessee with the Secretary of State. (c)  (i)  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, any person possessing a license under the Mississippi Gaming Control Act who does not for a gaming site lease public trust tidelands from the * * *state or any of its political subdivisions State of Mississippi by and through the Secretary of State or a state port, and who operates a gaming establishment in any of the three (3) most southern counties of the state, shall pay an annual in-lieu tidelands assessment to the Public Trust Tidelands Assessments Fund (hereinafter referred to as "fund") created in Section 29-15-10, in the amount and manner provided for in this paragraph. For calendar year 2006, the annual in-lieu tidelands assessment paid by the licensee to the fund shall be: 1.  Four Hundred Thousand Dollars ($400,000.00), if the capital investment in the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) or less. 2.  Four Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($450,000.00), if the capital investment in the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is equal to or more than Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) but less than Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00). 3.  Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00), if the capital investment in the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is equal to or more than Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00) but less than Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00). 4.  Six Hundred Thousand Dollars ($600,000.00), if the capital investment in the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is equal to or more than Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00) but less than One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00). 5.  Seven Hundred Thousand Dollars ($700,000.00), if the capital investment in the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is equal to or more than One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) but less than One Hundred Twenty-five Million Dollars ($125,000,000.00). 6.  Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($750,000.00), if the capital investment in the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is equal to or more than One Hundred Twenty-five Million Dollars ($125,000,000.00). For each calendar year thereafter, the Secretary of State shall review and adjust the value of the capital investment and the annual in-lieu tidelands assessment due.  Such review and adjustment shall be tied to the CPI. (ii)  This paragraph shall not apply to a gaming licensee if the licensee conducts gaming in a structure that is located on property that is leased from the Mississippi State Port at Gulfport or any political subdivision of the state, or to a licensee who conducts gaming in a structure that is located on property that is leased to the licensee jointly by the State of Mississippi and the City of Biloxi; however, with regard to property owned by a political subdivision of the state, this exception shall only apply to property owned by the political subdivision on August 29, 2005, if legal gaming could have been conducted on such property on that date. (iii)  This paragraph shall not apply to a gaming licensee if the licensee conducts gaming in a structure that is located on property that is not leased from the State of Mississippi and/or a political subdivision of the State of Mississippi and is not on state public trust tidelands before August 29, 2005, and shall not apply to a gaming license if the licensee or former licensee conducted gaming on * * *that property contiguous property through a lease with the State Port at Gulfport before August 29, 2005. SECTION 2.  Section 29-15-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 29-15-1.  (a) "Commission" means the Mississippi Advisory Commission on Marine Resources. (b)  "Local tidal datum" means the datum established for a specific tide station through the use of tidal observations made at that station. (c)  "Mean high water" means the arithmetic mean of all the high waters occurring in a particular nineteen-year tidal epoch period; or for a shorter period of time after corrections are applied to the short term observations to reduce these values to the equivalent nineteen-year value. (d)  "Mean high water line" means the intersection of the tidal datum plane of mean high water with the shore. (e)  "Mean high water survey" means a survey of the intersection of the shoreline with the tidal datum plane of mean high water using local tidal datums and surveying methodologies approved by the commission.  Methodologies shall include but not be limited to the "staking method," "the topographic method" and "tide coordinated aerial photography." (f)  "National map accuracy standards" means a set of guidelines published by the Office of Management and Budget of the United States to which maps produced by the United States government adhere. (g)  "Submerged lands" means lands which remain covered by waters, where the tides ebb and flow, at ordinary low tides. (h)  "Tidelands" means those lands which are daily covered and uncovered by water by the action of the tides, up to the mean high water line * * * of the ordinary high tides. (i) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources. (j) "Fastlands" means tidelands and submerged lands waterward of the historic natural mean high water line but artificially filled such that the area waterward of that line is above mean high water. (k)  "Public Trust Tidelands" means those surface lands, tidelands, and submerged lands owned by the state and held in trust for the citizens of the State of Mississippi. (l)  "Surface lands" means the same as fastlands. SECTION 3.  The following shall be codified as Section 29-15-1.1, Mississippi Code of 1972: 29-15-1.1.  (1)  The Legislature passed the Tidelands Act of 1989, codified at Sections 29-1-107 and 29-15-1 et seq., to provide stability and certainty to the land titles of riparian and littoral property owners.  The Legislature now finds certainty and stability of the state ownership of Public Trust Tidelands in trust for all the citizens of the state and the designation of the Secretary of State as the trustee agent to act in the best interest of the state in the control, management, administration and leasing of the Public Trust Tidelands, which are essential for the economical and consistent use of the Public Trust Tidelands for the benefit of all the citizens of the state.  Due to a number of disputes causing harm and expense to the management of the state-held Public Trust Tidelands, legislative action is required to provide for the effective and consistent state control and management of the Public Trust Tidelands to ensure their sustainability and enjoyment for current and future generations of state citizens. (2)  The Legislature recognizes it serves the best interest of all citizens of the state, for whom the state holds title to the Public Trust Tidelands.  To balance their preservation and economic development interests, the Legislature believes the citizens of our state are best served when Public Trust Tidelands are controlled, managed, administered, and leased by one (1) trustee agent acting for the entire state.  The Legislature herby confirms the state's ownership of the Public Trust Tidelands for the enjoyment and benefit of its citizens, and that the Secretary of State, as the Land Commissioner of the State of Mississippi, should be and is acknowledged as the trustee agent of the state for the control, management, administration, and leasing of the Public Trust Tidelands.  Further, by confirming the Secretary of State as the only trustee agent of the Public Trust Tidelands, the Legislature has faith in the Secretary's ability to deal justly and fairly with all municipalities and counties along the Mississippi Gulf Coast. SECTION 4.  The following shall be codified as Section 29-15-2, Mississippi Code of 1972: 29-15-2.  (1)  It is declared that the state held tidelands subject to the public trust and the boundary between trust lands and other lands are shown on the Final Public Trust Tidelands Map and Public Trust Submerged Land Maps, Final December 1994, created and published pursuant to Section 29-15-7, as modified by any boundary agreements or court orders. (2)  Absent clear, specific and expressed legislative intent to sever fee simple title of a specific parcel of Public Trust Tidelands from the state in favor of a specific state agency or political subdivision, fee simple title remains in the state. (3)  It is declared to be the public policy of this state that all management and administrative control and authority of all state held Public Trust Tidelands is vested solely in the Secretary of State as the Land Commissioner and trustee of the Public Trust Tidelands. (4)  Absent clear, specific and expressed legislative intent to grant management and administrative control and authority, including leasing authority, of a specific area of Public Trust Tidelands to a specific state agency or political subdivision, the Secretary of State is not divested of management and administrative control and authority, and leasing authority. (5)  (a)  All proposed uses of Public Trust Tidelands by any entity, including a private party or a federal, state or local government, requires review of and approval by the Secretary of State as the Land Commissioner and trustee of the Public Trust Tidelands to confirm such use is consistent with the public trust for which the land are held for the benefit of all citizens of the state and the public policy as expressed by the Legislature. (b)  Any entity, including a private party or a federal, state or local government agency or authority, shall submit plans to the Secretary of State concerning use of the Public Trust Tidelands for review and approval, and if necessary, a Public Trust Tidelands lease, before any activity on the Public Trust Tidelands. (c)  All state agencies, consistent with the legislative intent of Section 29-15-3 and Section 57-15-6, shall coordinate with the Secretary of State concerning activities on the Public Trust Tidelands, and receive approval before conducting or authorizing activities on the Public Trust Tidelands. (6)  (a)  All existing and proposed uses of or projects on Public Trust Tidelands by any commercial activity shall require a Public Trust Tidelands lease from the state through the Secretary of State as trustee of the Public Trust Tidelands and shall be subject to annual rent pursuant to Section 29-1-107. (b)  All existing and proposed public uses of or projects on Public Trust Tidelands by any federal, state or local governmental entity and which serve a higher public purpose of promoting the conservation, reclamation and preservation of the tidelands and submerged lands; public use for boating, boat launches, piers, small craft harbors and marinas; fishing, recreation or navigation; or the enhancement of public access to such lands shall require a Public Trust Tidelands lease from the state through the Secretary of State as trustee of the Public Trust Tidelands pursuant to Section 29-1-107 (2) but shall be exempt from any use, lease, or rental fees pursuant to Section 29-15-13. (7)  All uses of Public Trust Tidelands for any gaming purpose or purpose related to a gaming operation shall require a Public Trust Tidelands lease from the state through the Secretary of State as trustee of the Public Trust Tidelands and shall be subject to annual rent pursuant to Section 29-1-107. (8)  All previous or prior statutory provisions which affect the Public Trust Tidelands shall be construed and interpreted subject to and consistent with the provisions contained in this statute. SECTION 5.  Section 29-15-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 29-15-3.  (1)  It is declared to be the public policy of this state to favor the preservation of the natural state of the state's public trust tidelands and their ecosystems and to prevent the despoliation and destruction of them, except where a specific alteration of specific public trust tidelands would serve a higher public interest in compliance with the public purposes of the public trust in which such tidelands are held. (2)  It is hereby declared to be a higher public purpose of this state and the public tidelands trust to resolve the uncertainty and disputes which have arisen as to the location of the boundary between the state's public trust tidelands and the upland property and to confirm the mean high water boundary line as determined by the Mississippi Supreme Court, the laws of this state and this chapter. (3)  Absent clear and specific intent by the Legislature to sever fee simple ownership or to grant management and administrative control and authority, to include but not limited to leasing authority, of a specific area of Public Trust Tidelands to a specific state agency or political subdivision, then fee simple title, management and administrative control and authority, and leasing authority to and of the Public Trust Tidelands is in the State of Mississippi. (4)  It is hereby declared that Public Trust Tidelands held by the state will be managed and administered by the Secretary of State as the Land Commissioner and Trustee of the Public Trust Tidelands. SECTION 6.  Section 29-15-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 29-15-5.  (1)  Tidelands and submerged lands are held by the state in trust for use of all the people, and are so held in their character as the beds and shores of the sea and its tidally affected arms and tributaries for the purposes defined by common law and statutory law.  Littoral and riparian property owners have common law and statutory rights under the Coastal Wetlands Protection Law which extend into the waters and beyond the low tide line, and the state's responsibilities as trustee extends to such owners as well as to the other members of the public. (2)  Residential property owners shall not be required to obtain a public trust tidelands lease from the state for exercising their common law and statutory littoral and riparian rights attached to residential property. (3)  All existing and proposed uses of or projects on Public Trust Tidelands by any commercial activity shall require a Public Trust Tidelands lease from the state through the Secretary of State as Trustee of the Public Trust Tidelands and shall be subject to annual rent pursuant to Section 29-1-107. (4)  All existing or proposed public uses of or projects on any federal, state or local governmental entity, including counties and municipalities, which serve a higher public purpose of promoting the conservation, reclamation, preservation of the tidelands and submerged lands, public use for boating, boat launches, piers, small craft harbors and marinas, fishing, recreation or navigation, or the enhancement of public access to such lands shall require a lease of state Public Trust Tidelands from the state through the Secretary of State as trustee of the Public Trust Tidelands pursuant to Section 29-1-107(2). SECTION 7.  Section 29-15-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 29-15-9.  (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the "Public Trust Tidelands Fund."  The fund shall be administered by the Secretary of State as trustee. (2)  Any funds derived from lease rentals of tidelands and submerged lands, except those funds derived from mineral leases, or funds previously specifically designated to be applied to other agencies, shall be transferred to the special fund.  * * *However Subject to legislative authorization, funds derived from lease rentals * * *may shall be used to cover the administrative cost, including legal expenses, incurred by the Secretary of State in administering the Public Trust Tidelands.  Any remaining funds derived from lease rentals shall then be disbursed pro rata to the local taxing authorities for the replacement of lost ad valorem taxes, if any. Then, any remaining funds shall be disbursed to the * * *commission Department of Marine Resources for new and extra programs of tidelands management, such as conservation, reclamation, preservation, acquisition, education or the enhancement of public access to the public trust tidelands or public improvement projects as they relate to those lands. (3)  Any funds that are appropriated as separate line items in an appropriation bill for tideland programs or projects authorized under this section for political subdivisions or other agencies shall be disbursed as provided in this subsection. (a)  The Department of Marine Resources shall make progress payments in installments based on the work completed and material used in the performance of a tidelands project only after receiving written verification from the political subdivision or agency. The political subdivision or agency shall submit verification of the work completed or materials in such detail and form that the department may require. (b)  The Department of Marine Resources shall make funds available for the purpose of using such funds as a match or leverage for federal or other funds that are available for the designated tidelands project. SECTION 8.  Section 29-15-10, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 29-15-10.  (1)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the "Public Trust Tidelands Assessments Fund."  The purpose of the fund is to ensure that monies derived from the public trust tidelands assessments shall be used for the benefit of preserving and protecting the tidelands and submerged lands found within the three (3) most southern counties of the state.  One (1) specific purpose of the fund is to ensure that the annual payment made by the state for the purchase of Deer Island shall continue uninterrupted until the purchase transaction is completed.  The fund shall be administered by the Secretary of State, as trustee.  None of the funds that are in the special fund or that are required to be deposited into the special fund shall be transferred, diverted or in any other manner expended or used for any purpose other than those purposes specified in this section. (2)  (a)  Any funds derived from assessments made pursuant to Section 29-1-107(4)(c) shall be deposited into the special fund. (b)  Funds paid pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection may be appropriated by the Legislature in an amount necessary to cover the administrative cost incurred by the Mississippi Advisory Commission on Marine Resources.  Any remaining funds shall be disbursed * * *by to the * * *commission Department of Marine Resources for new and extra programs of tidelands management, such as conservation, reclamation, preservation, acquisition, education or the enhancement of public access to the public trust tidelands or public improvement projects as they relate to those lands. (3)  Any funds that are appropriated as separate line items in an appropriation bill for tideland programs or projects authorized under this section for political subdivisions or other agencies shall be disbursed as provided in this subsection. (a)  The Department of Marine Resources shall make progress payments in installments based on the work completed and material used in the performance of a tidelands project only after receiving written verification from the political subdivision or agency. The political subdivision or agency shall submit verification of the work completed or materials in such detail and form that the department may require. (b)  The Department of Marine Resources shall make funds available for the purpose of using such funds as a match or leverage for federal or other funds that are available for the designated tidelands project. SECTION 9.  Section 29-15-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 29-15-13.  All existing or proposed public projects of any federal, state or local governmental entity, including counties and municipalities, which serve a higher public purpose of promoting the conservation, reclamation, preservation of the tidelands and submerged lands, public use for boating, boat launches, piers, small craft harbors and marinas, fishing, recreation or navigation, or the enhancement of public access to such lands shall require a lease of Public Trust Tidelands from the Secretary of State but shall be exempt from any use, lease or rental fees. SECTION 10.  Section 59-15-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 59-15-1.  The authorities of any city in this state which has a population of ten thousand (10,000) or more, according to the last official government census, and the authorities of any municipality bordering on the Mississippi Sound or Gulf of Mexico are hereby given the authority to acquire by purchase, deed, donation, gift, grant, * * *reclamation, lease, dedication, or otherwise, and if state-owned Public Trust Tidelands by lease subject to Sections 29-1-107(2) and 29-15-13, such land, harbor sites or water frontage for the purpose of establishing, developing, promoting, maintaining, and operating harbors for small water crafts and recreational parks connected therewith within its territorial limits, or both, and shall have the power to acquire, purchase, install, rent, lease, mortgage, incumber, construct, own, hold, maintain, equip, use, control and operate recreational parks and harbors for small water craft.  Any such existing use of state Public Trust Tidelands shall require a Public Trust Tidelands lease from the State of Mississippi by and through the Secretary of State.  Any use of state Public Trust Tidelands for gaming as contemplated by Section 27-1-107(4) shall require a direct lease of the Public Trust Tidelands from the State of Mississippi by and through the Secretary of State, and such lease may be conditioned upon the licensee obtaining such other necessary and required approvals.  Once permission to use the Public Trust Tidelands has been established, the tidelands shall be under the management and control of the municipality, and the revenues generated shall be used for the maintenance and upkeep and operation of the harbor. SECTION 11.  Section 21-17-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 21-17-1.  (1)  Every municipality of this state shall be a municipal corporation and shall have power to sue and be sued; to purchase and hold real estate, either within or without the corporate limits, for all proper municipal purposes, including parks, cemeteries, hospitals, schoolhouses, houses of correction, waterworks, electric lights, sewers and other proper municipal purposes; to purchase and hold personal property for all proper municipal purposes; to sell or dispose of personal property or real property owned by it consistent with Section 17-25-25; to acquire equipment and machinery by lease-purchase agreement and to pay interest thereon, if contracted, when needed for proper municipal purposes; and to sell and convey any real property owned by it, and make such order respecting the same as may be deemed conducive to the best interest of the municipality, and exercise jurisdiction over the same. (2)  (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, in case any of the real property belonging to a municipality shall cease to be used for municipal purposes, the governing authority of the municipality may sell, convey or lease the same on such terms as the municipal authority may elect.  In case of a sale on a credit, the municipality shall charge appropriate interest as contracted and shall have a lien on the same for the purchase money, as against all persons, until paid and may enforce the lien as in such cases provided by law.  The deed of conveyance in such cases shall be executed in the name of the municipality by the governing authority of the municipality pursuant to an order entered on the minutes.  In any sale or conveyance of real property, the municipality shall retain all mineral rights that it owns, together with the right of ingress and egress to remove same.  Except as otherwise provided in this section, before any such lease, deed or conveyance is executed, the governing authority of the municipality shall publish at least once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks, in a public newspaper of the municipality in which the real property is located, or if no newspaper be published as such, then in a newspaper having general circulation therein, the intention to lease or sell, as the case may be, the municipally owned real property and to accept sealed competitive bids for the leasing or sale.  The governing authority of the municipality shall thereafter accept bids for the lease or sale and shall award the lease or sale to the highest bidder in the manner provided by law. However, whenever the governing authority of the municipality shall find and determine, by resolution duly and lawfully adopted and spread upon its minutes (i) that any municipally owned real property is no longer needed for municipal or related purposes and is not to be used in the operation of the municipality, (ii) that the sale of such property in the manner otherwise provided by law is not necessary or desirable for the financial welfare of the municipality, and (iii) that the use of such property for the purpose for which it is to be sold, conveyed or leased will promote and foster the development and improvement of the community in which it is located and the civic, social, educational, cultural, moral, economic or industrial welfare thereof, the governing authority of the municipality shall be authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to sell, convey or lease same for any of the purposes set forth herein without having to advertise for and accept competitive bids. (b)  In any case in which a municipality proposes to sell, convey or lease real property under the provisions of this subsection (2) without advertising for and accepting competitive bids, the governing authority may sell, convey or lease the property as follows: (i)  Consideration for the purchase, conveyance or lease of the property shall be not less than the average of the fair market price for such property as determined by at least two (2) professional property appraisers selected by the municipality and approved by the purchaser or lessee.  Appraisal fees shall be shared equally by the municipality and the purchaser or lessee; (ii) The governing authority of a municipality may contract for the professional services of a Mississippi licensed real estate broker to assist the municipality in the marketing and sale or lease of the property, and may provide the broker reasonable compensation for services rendered to be paid from the sale or lease proceeds.  The reasonable compensation shall not exceed the usual and customary compensation for similar services within the municipality; or (iii)  The governing authority of a municipality may lease property of less than one thousand five hundred (1,500) square feet to any person or legal entity by having two (2) appraisals establish the fair market value of the lease, and on such other terms and conditions as the parties may agree, such lease being lawfully adopted and spread upon its official minutes. (c) All uses of Public Trust Tidelands shall be through a lease with the state through the Secretary of State. (3)  Whenever the governing authority of the municipality shall find and determine by resolution duly and lawfully adopted and spread upon the minutes that municipally owned real property is not used for municipal purposes and therefore surplus as set forth in subsection (2) of this section: (a)  (i)  Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph (a), the governing authority may donate such lands to a bona fide not-for-profit civic or eleemosynary corporation organized and existing under the laws of the State of Mississippi and granted tax-exempt status by the Internal Revenue Service and may donate such lands and necessary funds related thereto to the public school district in which the land is situated for the purposes set forth herein.  Any deed or conveyance executed pursuant hereto shall contain a clause of reverter providing that the bona fide not-for-profit corporation or public school district may hold title to such lands only so long as they are continued to be used for the civic, social, educational, cultural, moral, economic or industrial welfare of the community, and that title shall revert to the municipality in the event of the cessation of such use for a period of two (2) years.  In any such deed or conveyance, the municipality shall retain all mineral rights that it owns, together with the right of ingress and egress to remove same; (ii)  If the governing authority of a municipality with a total population of greater than forty thousand (40,000) but not more than forty-two thousand five hundred (42,500) according to the 2010 federal decennial census, donates real property to a bona fide not-for-profit civic or eleemosynary corporation and such civic or eleemosynary corporation commits Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) to renovate or make capital improvements to the property by an agreement between a certain state institution of higher learning and the civic or eleemosynary corporation, then the clause of reverter required by this paragraph shall provide that title of such real property shall revert 1. to the bona fide not-for-profit civic or eleemosynary corporation, if a certain state institution of higher learning ceases to use the property for the purposes required by this paragraph (a) for donated lands, or 2. to the municipality, if a certain state institution of higher learning ceases to use the property for the purposes required by this paragraph (a) and the not-for-profit civic or eleemosynary corporation or its successor ceases to exist; (b)  (i)  The governing authority may donate such lands to a bona fide not-for-profit corporation (such as Habitat for Humanity) which is primarily engaged in the construction of housing for persons who otherwise can afford to live only in substandard housing.  In any such deed or conveyance, the municipality shall retain all mineral rights that it owns, together with the right of ingress and egress to remove same; (ii)  In the event the governing authority does not wish to donate title to such lands to the bona fide not-for-profit civic or eleemosynary corporation, but wishes to retain title to the lands, the governing authority may lease the lands to a bona fide not-for-profit corporation described in paragraph (a) or this paragraph (b) for less than fair market value; (c)  The governing authority may donate any municipally owned lot measuring twenty-five (25) feet or less along the frontage line as follows:  the governing authority may cause the lot to be divided in half along a line running generally perpendicular to the frontage line and may convey each one-half (1/2) of that lot to the owners of the parcels laterally adjoining the municipally owned lot.  All costs associated with a conveyance under this paragraph (c) shall be paid by the person or entity to whom the conveyance is made.  In any such deed or instrument of conveyance, the municipality shall retain all mineral rights that it owns, together with the right of ingress and egress to remove same; (d)  Nothing contained in this subsection (3) shall be construed to prohibit, restrict or to prescribe conditions with regard to the authority granted under Section 17-25-3. (4)  Every municipality shall also be authorized and empowered to loan to private persons or entities, whether organized for profit or nonprofit, funds received from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) under an urban development action grant or a community development block grant under the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-383), as amended, and to charge interest thereon if contracted, provided that no such loan shall include any funds from any revenues other than the funds from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development; to make all contracts and do all other acts in relation to the property and affairs of the municipality necessary to the exercise of its governmental, corporate and administrative powers; and to exercise such other or further powers as are otherwise conferred by law. (5)  (a)  The governing authority of any municipality may establish an employer-assisted housing program to provide funds to eligible employees to be used toward the purchase of a home.  This assistance may be applied toward the down payment, closing costs or any other fees or costs associated with the purchase of a home.  The housing assistance may be in the form of a grant, forgivable loan or repayable loan.  The governing authority of a municipality may contract with one or more public or private entities to provide assistance in implementing and administering the program and shall adopt rules and regulations regarding the eligibility of a municipality for the program and for the implementation and administration of the program.  However, no general funds of a municipality may be used for a grant or loan under the program. (b)  Participation in the program established under this subsection (5) shall be available to any eligible municipal employee as determined by the governing authority of the municipality.  Any person who receives financial assistance under the program must purchase a house and reside within certain geographic boundaries as determined by the governing authority of the municipality. (c)  If the assistance authorized under this subsection (5) is structured as a forgivable loan, the participating employee must remain as an employee of the municipality for an agreed upon period of time, as determined by the rules and regulations adopted by the governing authority of the municipality, in order to have the loan forgiven.  The forgiveness structure, amount of assistance and repayment terms shall be determined by the governing authority of the municipality. (6)  The governing authority of any municipality may contract with a private attorney or private collection agent or agency to collect any type of delinquent payment owed to the municipality, including, but not limited to, past-due fees, fines and other assessments, or with the district attorney of the circuit court district in which the municipality is located to collect any delinquent fees, fines and other assessments.  Any such contract debt may provide for payment contingent upon successful collection efforts or payment based upon a percentage of the delinquent amount collected; however, the entire amount of all delinquent payments collected shall be remitted to the municipality and shall not be reduced by any collection costs or fees.  Any private attorney or private collection agent or agency contracting with the municipality under the provisions of this subsection shall give bond or other surety payable to the municipality in such amount as the governing authority of the municipality deems sufficient.  Any private attorney with whom the municipality contracts under the provisions of this subsection must be a member in good standing of The Mississippi Bar.  Any private collection agent or agency with whom the municipality contracts under the provisions of this subsection must meet all licensing requirements for doing business in the State of Mississippi.  Neither the municipality nor any officer or employee of the municipality shall be liable, civilly or criminally, for any wrongful or unlawful act or omission of any person or business with whom the municipality has contracted under the provisions of this subsection.  The Mississippi Department of Audit shall establish rules and regulations for use by municipalities in contracting with persons or businesses under the provisions of this subsection.  If a municipality uses its own employees to collect any type of delinquent payment owed to the municipality, then from and after July 1, 2000, the municipality may charge an additional fee for collection of the delinquent payment provided the payment has been delinquent for ninety (90) days.  The collection fee may not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the delinquent payment if the collection is made within this state and may not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the delinquent payment if the collection is made outside this state.  In conducting collection of delinquent payments, the municipality may utilize credit cards or electronic fund transfers.  The municipality may pay any service fees for the use of such methods of collection from the collection fee, but not from the delinquent payment.  There shall be due to the municipality from any person whose delinquent payment is collected under a contract executed as provided in this subsection an amount, in addition to the delinquent payment, of not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the delinquent payment for collections made within this state, and not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the delinquent payment for collections made outside of this state. (7)  In addition to such authority as is otherwise granted under this section, the governing authority of any municipality may expend funds necessary to maintain and repair, and to purchase liability insurance, tags and decals for, any personal property acquired under the Federal Excess Personal Property Program that is used by the local volunteer fire department. (8)  In addition to the authority to expend matching funds under Section 21-19-65, the governing authority of any municipality, in its discretion, may expend municipal funds to match any state, federal or private funding for any program administered by the State of Mississippi, the United States government or any nonprofit organization that is exempt under 26 USCS Section 501(c)(3) from paying federal income tax. (9)  The governing authority of any municipality that owns and operates a gas distribution system, as defined in Section 21-27-11(b), and the governing authority of any public natural gas district are authorized to contract for the purchase of the supply of natural gas for a term of up to ten (10) years with any public nonprofit corporation which is organized under the laws of this state or any other state. (10)  The governing authority of any municipality may perform and exercise any duty, responsibility or function, may enter into agreements and contracts, may provide and deliver any services or assistance, and may receive, expend and administer any grants, gifts, matching funds, loans or other monies, in accordance with and as may be authorized by any federal law, rule or regulation creating, establishing or providing for any program, activity or service.  The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed as authorizing any municipality or the governing authority of such municipality to perform any function or activity that is specifically prohibited under the laws of this state or as granting any authority in addition to or in conflict with the provisions of any federal law, rule or regulation. (11)  (a)  In addition to such authority as is otherwise granted under this section, the governing authority of a municipality, in its discretion, may sell, lease, donate or otherwise convey property to any person or legal entity without public notice, without having to advertise for and accept competitive bids and without appraisal, with or without consideration, and on such terms and conditions as the parties may agree if the governing authority finds and determines, by resolution duly and lawfully adopted and spread upon its official minutes: (i)  The subject property is real property acquired by the municipality: 1.  By reason of a tax sale; 2.  Because the property was abandoned or blighted; or 3.  In a proceeding to satisfy a municipal lien against the property; (ii)  The subject property is blighted and is located in a blighted area; (iii)  The subject property is not needed for governmental or related purposes and is not to be used in the operation of the municipality; (iv)  That the sale of the property in the manner otherwise provided by law is not necessary or desirable for the financial welfare of the municipality; and (v)  That the use of the property for the purpose for which it is to be conveyed will promote and foster the development and improvement of the community in which it is located or the civic, social, educational, cultural, moral, economic or industrial welfare thereof; the purpose for which the property is conveyed shall be stated. (b)  Any deed or instrument of conveyance executed pursuant to the authority granted under this subsection shall contain a clause of reverter providing that title to the property will revert to the municipality if the person or entity to whom the property is conveyed does not fulfill the purpose for which the property was conveyed and satisfy all conditions imposed on the conveyance within two (2) years of the date of the conveyance. (c)  In any such deed or instrument of conveyance, the municipality shall retain all mineral rights that it owns, together with the right of ingress and egress to remove same. (12)  The governing authority of any municipality may enter into agreements and contracts with any housing authority, as defined in Section 43-33-1, to provide extra police protection in exchange for the payment of compensation or a fee to the municipality. (13)  The governing authority of any municipality may reimburse the cost of an insured's deductible for an automobile insurance coverage claim if the claim has been paid for damages to the insured's property arising from the negligence of a duly authorized officer, agent, servant, attorney or employee of the municipality in the performance of his or her official duties, and the officer, agent, servant, attorney or employee owning or operating the motor vehicle is protected by immunity under the Mississippi Tort Claims Act, Section 11-46-1 et seq. (14)  The powers conferred by this section shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law, and nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit, or to prescribe conditions concerning, any practice or practices authorized under any other law. SECTION 12.  Section 57-7-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 57-7-1.  In the event that any municipality, county, supervisors district, municipal airport authority, regional airport authority or other governmental subdivision shall have surplus airport land or other lands which are not needed for airport purposes or for other governmental purposes, then such property so designated and described may be set aside and improved for industrial and commercial purposes and the same may thereafter be operated or the same may be leased or sold upon such terms and conditions as a municipality, county, municipal airport authority, regional airport authority or governmental subdivision shall prescribe. In order to provide for the improvement of such property for industrial and commercial purposes, the municipality or other authority shall be authorized to provide all necessary utilities therefor and to lay out, construct and/or improve and hard-surface roadways, streets, driveways and access roads, railroads and spur tracks, and provide for the grading, drainage, sewer, lights and water, and all other necessary or proper utilities as may be necessary or proper to make such land desirable or useful as a site or sites for industrial and commercial enterprises.  The cost and expense of such improvements to said real estate shall be paid for from funds made available from the lease or sale of such lands to the extent such funds are available. All uses of public trust tidelands shall be through a lease with the state through the Secretary of State. SECTION 13.  Section 59-7-405, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 59-7-405.  (1)  (a)  The governing authorities of any municipality in which there is situated and located, in whole or in part, a port or harbor through which commerce flows, and having not less than eight (8) industries engaged in the seafood industry, which maintains a channel and/or harbor to a depth of not less than eight (8) feet, may engage in, either directly or through the commission hereinafter provided and designated, and such other agencies as hereafter may be provided by law, works of internal improvement, or promoting, developing, constructing, maintaining and operating harbors or seaports within the state and its jurisdiction, and either directly or through the commission hereinafter provided for, with the power and authority to acquire, purchase, install, rent, lease, mortgage and/or otherwise encumber, to construct, own, hold, maintain, equip, use, control and operate at seaports or harbors, wharves, piers, docks, warehouses, cold storage facilities, water and rail terminals, airplane landing fields and strips, and other structures and facilities, needful for the convenient use of the same in the aid of commerce and navigation, and including the dredging of channels and approaches to the facilities, and being authorized with prior approval of the state through the Secretary of State to fill in * * * and reclaim bottomlands where incidental and necessary to the foregoing development.  All uses of public trust tidelands shall be through a lease with the state through the Secretary of State. (b)  A municipality, which is operating a port through a port commission under this section, may dissolve the port commission as provided in Section 59-7-408 and directly operate and maintain the port as provided under this article. (2)  The municipal authorities or commission, in connection with the exercise of the foregoing works of improvement and development, may as an adjunct to any such work of improvement or development to erect or construct such bridges, causeways or structures as may be required for access to and from the harbors or facilities provided as aforesaid by the municipal authorities or the commission, and including any necessary bridge or causeway or combination of the same, connecting with any island or islands lying within three (3) leagues of the main shoreline of the Mississippi Sound or the Gulf of Mexico, and whether the same be within or without the limits of the municipality concerned. (3)  The municipal authorities or commission may procure, by gift, grant, purchase, or by the exercise of eminent domain, and for the public purposes and uses herein provided for, such land or interest therein as may be required for the purposes of this article, and regardless of whether the land be within or without the limits of the municipality involved.  All uses of public trust tidelands shall be through a lease with the state through the Secretary of State. (4)  The municipal authorities or commission, in the exercise of the powers granted hereunder, may provide any of the aforesaid facilities alone or in collaboration and in conjunction with any other public bodies, entities or commissions, as may now or hereafter be established by law. (5)  The municipal authorities or commission may provide, among other harbor facilities, small craft and pleasure craft harbors and facilities needed therefor, including park and recreational facilities as an adjunct thereto, and in order to develop and promote tourist and recreational trade in the port. (6)  The municipal authorities or commission have the power and authority to carry out the provisions of this article, to employ engineers, attorneys, and such employees as may be necessary in carrying out the provisions of this article, from time to time, and for the purpose of operating the facilities herein provided for, and may prescribe reasonable compensation in connection with such employment. SECTION 14.  Section 7-11-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 7-11-11.  The Secretary of State shall have charge of the swamp and the overflowed lands and indemnity lands in lieu thereof, the internal improvement lands, the lands forfeited to the state for nonpayment of taxes after the time allowed by law for redemption shall have expired, the public trust tidelands and of all other public lands belonging to or under the control of the state.  The regulation, sale and disposition of all such lands shall be made through the Secretary of State's office. The Secretary of State shall sign all conveyances and leases of any and all state-owned lands and shall record same in a book kept in his office for such purposes. SECTION 15.  Section 87-1-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 87-1-5.  If any person, by playing at any game whatever, or by betting on the sides or hands of such as do play at any game, or by betting on any horse race or cockfight, or at any other sport or pastime, or by any wager whatever, shall lose any money, property, or other valuable thing, real or personal, and shall pay or deliver the same or any part thereof, the person so losing and paying or delivering the same, or his wife or children, may sue for and recover such money, property, or other valuable thing so lost and paid or delivered, or any part thereof, from the person knowingly receiving the same, with costs.  However, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering: (a)  On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay; (b)  In a structure located in whole or in part on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i)  The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming * * *on and before August 29, 2005, legal gaming could have been conducted by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, under paragraph (a) of this section, upon a docked cruise vessel * * * under paragraph (a) of this section in the waters within the State of Mississippi adjacent to the location of the proposed structure at the mean high water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) referenced in and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section; (ii)  The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from any and all points of reference along the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to the Mississippi Sound at Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii)  In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall * * *lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, be located on property which is owned and/or leased solely by the person described in subparagraph (b)(i) of this section possessing the gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, all such owned and/or leased property shall be subject to the exclusive use, possession and control of such licensee and all such owned and/or leased property must be contiguously owned and/or leased by such licensee from the area upon which the structure is located to all points on the mean high-water line referenced and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section; provided that no portion of such owned and/or leased property shall include any portion of the sand beach, no mean high-water line referenced and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section may be located adjacent to any portion of the sand beach and such owned and/or leased property at its narrowest point may not be less in width than required to accommodate a cruise vessel.  As used in this subparagraph (b)(iii), sand beach shall mean the natural or manmade sand beach along any natural coastline which lies adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  An imaginary line drawn from any point along the mean high-water line referenced and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section to any other point of reference to determine the legal location of the gaming floor in the structure must cross only property owned by and/or leased by and under the exclusive use, possession and control of, the person described in subparagraph (b)(i) of this section possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5.  A project must meet the minimum size, minimum improvements and other such project requirements set forth in rules and regulations adopted by the commission as authorized by Section 75-76-33 and Section 75-76-77.  Easements * * *and for rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) * * *. of this section; (c)  On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River; or (d)  That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 16.  Section 97-33-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-1.  Except as otherwise provided in Section 97-33-8, if any person shall encourage, promote or play at any game, play or amusement, other than a fight or fighting match between dogs, for money or other valuable thing, or shall wager or bet, promote or encourage the wagering or betting of any money or other valuable things, upon any game, play, amusement, cockfight, Indian ball play or duel, other than a fight or fighting match between dogs, or upon the result of any election, event or contingency whatever, upon conviction thereof, he shall be fined in a sum not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00); and, unless such fine and costs be immediately paid, shall be imprisoned for any period not more than ninety (90) days.  However, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering: (a)  On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b)  In a structure located, in whole or in part, on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i)  The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming * * *on and before August 29, 2005, legal gaming could have been conducted by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, under paragraph (a) of this section, upon a docked cruise vessel * * *under paragraph (a) of this section in the waters within the State of Mississippi adjacent to the location of the proposed structure at the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) referenced in and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section; (ii)  The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from any and all points of reference along the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to the Mississippi Sound at Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii)  In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall * * *lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, be located on property which is owned and/or leased solely by the person described in subparagraph (b)(i) of this section possessing the gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, all such owned and/or leased property shall be subject to the exclusive use, possession and control of such licensee and all such owned and/or leased property must be contiguously owned and/or leased by such licensee from the area upon which the structure is located to all points on the mean high-water line referenced and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section; provided that no portion of such owned and/or leased property shall include any portion of the sand beach, no mean high-water line referenced and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section may be located adjacent to any portion of the sand beach and such owned and/or leased property at its narrowest point may not be less in width than required to accommodate a cruise vessel.  As used in this subparagraph (b)(iii), sand beach shall mean the natural or manmade sand beach along any natural coastline which lies adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  An imaginary line drawn from any point along the mean high-water line referenced and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section to any other point of reference to determine the legal location of the gaming floor in the structure must cross only property owned by and/or leased by and under the exclusive use, possession and control of the person described in subparagraph (b)(i) of this section possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5.  A project must meet the minimum size, minimum improvements and other such project requirements set forth in rules and regulations adopted by the commission as authorized by Section 75-76-33 and Section 75-76-77.  Easements * * *and for rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) of this section; (c)  On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; or (d)  That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 17.  Section 97-33-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-7.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 97-33-8, it shall be unlawful for any person or persons, firm, copartnership or corporation to have in possession, own, control, display, or operate any cane rack, knife rack, artful dodger, punch board, roll down, merchandise wheel, slot machine, pinball machine, or similar device or devices.  Provided, however, that this section shall not be so construed as to make unlawful the ownership, possession, control, display or operation of any antique coin machine as defined in Section 27-27-12, or any music machine or bona fide automatic vending machine where the purchaser receives exactly the same quantity of merchandise on each operation of said machine.  Any slot machine other than an antique coin machine as defined in Section 27-27-12 which delivers, or is so constructed as that by operation thereof it will deliver to the operator thereof anything of value in varying quantities, in addition to the merchandise received, and any slot machine other than an antique coin machine as defined in Section 27-27-12 that is constructed in such manner as that slugs, tokens, coins or similar devices are, or may be, used and delivered to the operator thereof in addition to merchandise of any sort contained in such machine, is hereby declared to be a gambling device, and shall be deemed unlawful under the provisions of this section.  Provided, however, that pinball machines which do not return to the operator or player thereof anything but free additional games or plays shall not be deemed to be gambling devices, and neither this section nor any other law shall be construed to prohibit same. (2)  No property right shall exist in any person, natural or artificial, or be vested in such person, in any or all of the devices described herein that are not exempted from the provisions of this section; and all such devices are hereby declared to be at all times subject to confiscation and destruction, and their possession shall be unlawful, except when in the possession of officers carrying out the provisions of this section.  It shall be the duty of all law enforcing officers to seize and immediately destroy all such machines and devices. (3)  A first violation of the provisions of this section shall be deemed a misdemeanor, and the party offending shall, upon conviction, be fined in any sum not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisoned not exceeding three (3) months, or both, in the discretion of the court.  In the event of a second conviction for a violation of any of the provisions of this section, the party offending shall be subject to a sentence of not less than six (6) months in the county jail, nor more than two (2) years in the State Penitentiary, in the discretion of the trial court. (4)  Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, it shall not be unlawful to operate any equipment or device described in subsection (1) of this section or any gaming, gambling or similar device or devices by whatever name called while: (a)  On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b)  In a structure located, in whole or in part, on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i)  The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming * * *on and before August 29, 2005, legal gaming could have been conducted by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, under paragraph (a) of this section, upon a docked cruise vessel * * *under paragraph (a) of this subsection in the waters within the State of Mississippi adjacent to the location of the proposed structure at the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) referenced in and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section; (ii)  The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from any and all points of reference along the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to the Mississippi Sound at Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii)  In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall * * *lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, be located on property which is owned and/or leased solely by the person described in subparagraph (b)(i) of this section possessing the gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, all such owned and/or leased property shall be subject to the exclusive use, possession and control of such licensee and all such owned and/or leased property must be contiguously owned and/or leased by such licensee from the area upon which the structure is located to all points on the mean high-water line referenced and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section; provided that no portion of such owned and/or leased property shall include any portion of the sand beach, no mean high-water line referenced and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section may be located adjacent to any portion of the sand beach and such owned and/or leased property at its narrowest point may not be less in width than required to accommodate a cruise vessel.  As used in this subparagraph (b)(iii), sand beach shall mean the natural or manmade sand beach along any natural coastline which lies adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  An imaginary line drawn from any point along the mean high-water line referenced and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section to any other point of reference to determine the legal location of the gaming floor in the structure must cross only property owned by and/or leased by and under the exclusive use, possession and control of the person described in subparagraph (b)(i) of this section possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5.  A project must meet the minimum size, minimum improvements and other such project requirements set forth in rules and regulations adopted by the commission as authorized by Section 75-76-33 and Section 75-76-77.  Easements * * *and for rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) of this section; (c)  On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; or (d)  That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. (5)  Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, it shall not be unlawful (a) to own, possess, repair or control any gambling device, machine or equipment in a licensed gaming establishment or on the business premises appurtenant to any such licensed gaming establishment during any period of time in which such licensed gaming establishment is being constructed, repaired, maintained or operated in this state; (b) to install any gambling device, machine or equipment in any licensed gaming establishment; (c) to possess or control any gambling device, machine or equipment during the process of procuring or transporting such device, machine or equipment for installation on any such licensed gaming establishment; or (d) to store in a warehouse or other storage facility any gambling device, machine, equipment, or part thereof, regardless of whether the county or municipality in which the warehouse or storage facility is located has approved gaming aboard cruise vessels or vessels, provided that such device, machine or equipment is operated only in a county or municipality that has approved gaming aboard cruise vessels or vessels.  Any gambling device, machine or equipment that is owned, possessed, controlled, installed, procured, repaired, transported or stored in accordance with this subsection shall not be subject to confiscation, seizure or destruction, and any person, firm, partnership or corporation which owns, possesses, controls, installs, procures, repairs, transports or stores any gambling device, machine or equipment in accordance with this subsection shall not be subject to any prosecution or penalty under this section.  Any person constructing or repairing such cruise vessels or vessels within a municipality shall comply with all municipal ordinances protecting the general health or safety of the residents of the municipality. SECTION 18.  Section 97-33-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-17.  (1)  All monies exhibited for the purpose of betting or alluring persons to bet at any game, and all monies staked or betted, shall be liable to seizure by any sheriff, constable, or police officer, together with all the appliances used or kept for use in gambling, or by any other person; and all the monies so seized shall be accounted for by the person making the seizure, and all appliances seized shall be destroyed; provided, however, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering on: (a)  A cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b)  In a structure located in whole or in part on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i)  The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming * * *on and before August 29, 2005, legal gaming could have been conducted by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, under paragraph (a) of this section, upon a docked cruise vessel * * *under paragraph (a) of this subsection in the waters within the State of Mississippi adjacent to the location of the proposed structure at the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) referenced in and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section; (ii)  The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from any and all points of reference along the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to the Mississippi Sound at Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii)  In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall * * *lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, be located on property which is owned and/or leased solely by the person described in subparagraph (b)(i) of this section possessing the gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, all such owned and/or leased property shall be subject to the exclusive use, possession and control of such licensee and all such owned and/or leased property must be contiguously owned and/or leased by such licensee from the area upon which the structure is located to all points on the mean high-water line referenced and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section; provided that no portion of such owned and/or leased property shall include any portion of the sand beach, no mean high-water line referenced and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section may be located adjacent to any portion of the sand beach and such owned and/or leased property at its narrowest point may not be less in width than required to accommodate a cruise vessel.  As used in this subparagraph (b)(iii), sand beach shall mean the natural or manmade sand beach along any natural coastline which lies adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  An imaginary line drawn from any point along the mean high-water line referenced and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section to any other point of reference to determine the legal location of the gaming floor in the structure must cross only property owned by and/or leased by and under the exclusive use, possession and control of the person described in subparagraph (b)(i) of this section possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5.  A project must meet the minimum size, minimum improvements and other such project requirements set forth in rules and regulations adopted by the commission as authorized by Section 75-76-33 and Section 75-76-77.  Easements * * *and for rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) * * *. of this section; (c)  A vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; or (d)  That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. (2)  Nothing in this section shall apply to any gambling device, machine or equipment that is owned, possessed, controlled, installed, procured, repaired or transported in accordance with subsection (4) of Section 97-33-7. SECTION 19.  Section 97-33-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-25.  If any person shall sell or buy, either directly or indirectly, any chance in what is commonly called pool, upon any event whatever, or shall in any manner engage in such business or pastime, he shall be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or shall be imprisoned in the county jail not more than ninety (90) days; provided, however, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering: (a)  On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b)  In a structure located in whole or in part on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i)  The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming * * *on and before August 29, 2005, legal gaming could have been conducted by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, under paragraph (a) of this section, upon a docked cruise vessel * * *under paragraph (a) of this section in the waters within the State of Mississippi adjacent to the location of the proposed structure at the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) referenced in and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section; (ii)  The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from any and all points of reference along the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to the Mississippi Sound at Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii)  In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall * * *lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, be located on property which is owned and/or leased solely by the person described in subparagraph (b)(i) of this section possessing the gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, all such owned and/or leased property shall be subject to the exclusive use, possession and control of such licensee and all such owned and/or leased property must be contiguously owned and/or leased by such licensee from the area upon which the structure is located to all points on the mean high-water line referenced and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section; provided that no portion of such owned and/or leased property shall include any portion of the sand beach, no mean high-water line referenced and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section may be located adjacent to any portion of the sand beach and such owned and/or leased property at its narrowest point may not be less in width than required to accommodate a cruise vessel.  As used in this subparagraph (b)(iii), sand beach shall mean the natural or manmade sand beach along any natural coastline which lies adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  An imaginary line drawn from any point along the mean high-water line referenced and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section to any other point of reference to determine the legal location of the gaming floor in the structure must cross only property owned by and/or leased by and under the exclusive use, possession and control of the person described in subparagraph (b)(i) of this section possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5.  A project must meet the minimum size, minimum improvements and other such project requirements set forth in rules and regulations adopted by the commission as authorized by Section 75-76-33 and Section 75-76-77.  Easements * * *and for rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) * * *. of this section; (c)  On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; or (d)  That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 20.  Section 97-33-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-27.  If any person shall bet on a horse race or a yacht race or on a shooting match, he shall be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), and, unless the fine and costs be immediately paid, he shall be imprisoned in the county jail not more than ninety (90) days; provided, however, this section shall not apply to betting, gaming or wagering: (a)  On a cruise vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; (b)  In a structure located in whole or in part on shore in any of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi in which the registered voters of the county have voted to allow such betting, gaming or wagering on cruise vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79, if: (i)  The structure is owned, leased or controlled by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, to conduct legal gaming * * *on and before August 29, 2005, legal gaming could have been conducted by a person possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, under paragraph (a) of this section, upon a docked cruise vessel * * *under paragraph (a) of this section in the waters within the State of Mississippi adjacent to the location of the proposed structure at the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) referenced in and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section; (ii)  The part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted is located entirely in an area which is located no more than eight hundred (800) feet from any and all points of reference along the mean high-water line (as defined in Section 29-15-1) of the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay, or, with regard to the Mississippi Sound at Harrison County only, no farther north than the southern boundary of the right-of-way for U.S. Highway 90, whichever is greater; and (iii)  In the case of a structure that is located in whole or part on shore, the part of the structure in which licensed gaming activities are conducted shall * * *lie adjacent to state waters south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  When the site upon which the structure is located consists of a parcel of real property, be located on property which is owned and/or leased solely by the person described in subparagraph (b)(i) of this section possessing the gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5, all such owned and/or leased property shall be subject to the exclusive use, possession and control of such licensee and all such owned and/or leased property must be contiguously owned and/or leased by such licensee from the area upon which the structure is located to all points on the mean high-water line referenced and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section; provided that no portion of such owned and/or leased property shall include any portion of the sand beach, no mean high-water line referenced and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section may be located adjacent to any portion of the sand beach and such owned and/or leased property at its narrowest point may not be less in width than required to accommodate a cruise vessel.  As used in this subparagraph (b)(iii), sand beach shall mean the natural or manmade sand beach along any natural coastline which lies adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, including the Mississippi Sound, St. Louis Bay, Biloxi Bay and Pascagoula Bay.  An imaginary line drawn from any point along the mean high-water line referenced and used pursuant to subparagraph (b)(ii) of this section to any other point of reference to determine the legal location of the gaming floor in the structure must cross only property owned by and/or leased by and under the exclusive use, possession and control of the person described in subparagraph (b)(i) of this section possessing a gaming license, as defined in Section 75-76-5.  A project must meet the minimum size, minimum improvements and other such project requirements set forth in rules and regulations adopted by the commission as authorized by Section 75-76-33 and Section 75-76-77.  Easements * * *and for rights-of-way for public streets and highways shall not be construed to interrupt the contiguous nature of the parcel, nor shall the footage contained within the easements and rights-of-way be counted in the calculation of the distances specified in subparagraph (ii) * * *. of this section; (c)  On a vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River, and in which the registered voters of the county in which the port is located have not voted to prohibit such betting, gaming or wagering on vessels as provided in Section 19-3-79; or (d)  That is legal under the laws of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 21.  Section 29-15-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 29-15-7.  (1)  The Secretary of State, in cooperation with other state agencies, shall prepare a Preliminary Map of Public Trust Tidelands.  The preliminary map shall depict the boundary as the current mean high water line where shoreline is undeveloped and in developed areas or where there have been encroachments, such maps shall depict the boundary as the determinable mean high water line nearest the effective date of the Coastal Wetlands Protection Act. (2)  The state recognizes that the boundary of the public trust tidelands is ambulatory and that the natural inland expansion of tide waters over land not previously subject to the ebb and flow of the tide increases the land subject to the public trust, while natural accretion, the gradual and imperceptible accumulation of land by natural causes, and natural reliction, the increase of land by permanent withdrawal or retrocession of tidal waters by natural causes, diminish the land subject to the public trust and increase the property owned by the contiguous upland owner.  Likewise, the state recognizes the common law doctrine as it pertains to such tidelands, submerged lands and riparian and littoral rights and declares such to be the law of this state. (3)  The preliminary map shall be transmitted to each of the chancery clerks of the coastal counties, and each chancery clerk shall post such map in a public place in his office. The Secretary of State shall also cause to be published in a newspaper of general circulation within each coastal county a notice announcing that a copy of the Preliminary Map of Public Trust Tidelands is available for public inspection at the office of the chancery clerk of that county, and shall post a similar notice in at least three (3) public places in each coastal county in this state.  The preliminary map shall also be open to public inspection at the office of the Secretary of State. (4)  The Secretary of State shall allow sixty (60) days after publication of the preliminary map for submission of comments and/or additional documentation and may, at his discretion, revise the map accordingly.  Within twenty (20) days of the completion of the period for submission of comments, the Secretary of State shall have incorporated any revisions to the Preliminary Map of Public Trust Tidelands and certify its final adoption.  The certified map as finally adopted shall be published as provided hereinabove.  The final certified map shall be duly recorded in the land records of the chancery clerks office in Hancock, Harrison and Jackson Counties.  Upon recordation, the certified map shall be final to those properties not subject to the trust.  The Secretary of State shall issue to all consenting property owners a certificate stating that the described property does not lie within the boundary of the public trust tidelands and is not subject to the trust.  The Secretary of State shall duly file such certificates with the proper chancery clerks office for recordation. In addition, the certified map shall be placed in the Secretary of State's permanent register which shall be open to public inspection.  Within one hundred twenty (120) days of final adoption of the certified map, the Secretary of State shall determine those property owners whose lands are subject of the public trust and are in violation of such trust.  The Secretary of State shall notify all such owners by certified mail and shall include an explanation of the procedure available to the occupant to resolve any dispute with respect to this map.  The notice shall also inform occupants that after three (3) years the boundary as set forth in the certified map shall become final unless the occupant has submitted a contrary claim to the office of the Secretary of State.  Such property owner shall have six (6) months to negotiate and settle differences with the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State may allow extensions at his discretion.  A boundary determination shall be final upon agreement of the Secretary of State and the owner and an instrument setting forth the boundary agreement shall be duly executed and recorded in the chancery court where the property is located.  Any such boundary agreement shall be binding on the state and other parties thereto. (5)  If any dispute as to the location of the boundary of the public trust cannot be negotiated and settled between the affected property owners and the Secretary of State within six (6) months after notice by the state of its claim, either the state or a person claiming an interest in the property may apply to the chancery court of the county in which the property is located for a resolution of the dispute and a determination of the location of the boundary.  All persons having an interest in the property subject to the dispute shall be made a party to such proceeding. In any such action, the state shall have the burden of proof by a preponderance of evidence that any such land is subject to the trust. (6)  Nothing in this section is intended to preclude any party from pursuing remedies otherwise available at law, including but not limited to those provided in Sections 11-17-1 et seq., except that if no action is taken by the occupant within three (3) years of receipt of notice as described above, the boundary as determined by the certified map shall become final. SECTION 22.  Section 29-15-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 29-15-11.  (1)  Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, upon the proper authorized leasing of any state public trust tidelands, or submerged lands, the lessee shall be responsible for any county or municipal tax levy upon the leasehold interest. (2)  Any leases and/or subleases granted by or through the Department of Marine Resources under the provisions of Sections 49-15-27, 49-15-37 or 49-15-46 shall be exempt from any county or municipal tax levy upon the leasehold interests. SECTION 23.  Section 29-15-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 29-15-15.  The Legislature hereby declares that accurate maps of coastal areas are required for many public purposes, and a state public trust tidelands mapping program establishing uniform standards and procedures is declared to be in the public interest. SECTION 24.  Section 29-15-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 29-15-17.  (1)  After the preparation and publication of the certified preliminary map, as finally adopted and provided for in Section 29-15-7, the commission is authorized and directed to conduct a comprehensive program of public trust tidelands boundary mapping with the object of providing accurate surveys of such lands of the state. (2)  In addition to other such powers as may be specifically delegated to it, the commission is authorized to perform the following functions: (a)  To coordinate the efforts of all public and private agencies and organizations engaged in the making of tidal surveys and maps of the coastal areas of this state, with the object of avoiding unnecessary duplication and overlapping; (b)  To serve as a coordinating state agency for any program of tidal surveying and mapping conducted by the federal government; (c)  To assist any court, tribunal, administrative agency or political subdivision, and to make available to them information regarding tidal surveying and coastal boundary determinations; (d)  To contract with federal, state or local agencies or with private parties for the performance of any surveys, studies, investigations or mapping activities, for preparation and publication of the results thereof, or for other authorized functions relating to the objectives of this part; (e)  To develop permanent records of tidal surveys and maps of the state's coastal areas; (f)  To develop uniform specifications and regulations for tidal surveying and mapping coastal areas of the state; (g)  To collect and preserve appropriate survey data from coastal areas; and (h)  To act as a public repository for copies of coastal area maps and to establish a library of such maps and charts. SECTION 25.  Section 29-15-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 29-15-19.  All maps produced under this program shall conform at least to minimal national map accuracy standards. SECTION 26.  Section 29-15-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 29-15-21.  The establishment of local tidal datums and the determination of the location of the mean high water line or the mean low water line, whether by federal, state or local agencies or private parties, shall be made in accordance with the standards and procedures set forth in this chapter, and in accordance with supplementary regulations promulgated by the commission. SECTION 27.  Section 29-15-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 29-15-23.  (1)  The establishment of local tidal datums and the determination of the location of the mean high water line or the mean low water line shall be performed by qualified personnel licensed by the Board of Professional Land Surveyors or by representatives of the United States Government when approved by the commission. (2)  The location of the mean high water line or the mean low water line shall be determined by methods which are approved by the commission for the area concerned. SECTION 28.  Section 59-15-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-15-3.  All improvements and facilities constructed pursuant to this chapter shall be maintained and operated under the control of the city authorities.  The city authorities of such city, or cities, shall, subject to and in accordance with any agreement, or agreements, as may be made by any such city with the purchaser, or purchasers, of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter, prescribe, levy and collect all rent, fees, tolls, revenues, privileges, commissions, and other charges in connection with the operation, use and occupancy of the aforesaid improvements and facilities, and shall pay over all net revenues derived from the operation of said improvements and facilities to any trustee or successor thereto designated as hereinafter in this chapter provided.  The net revenues shall be deemed to be such as may be defined in any agreement, or agreements, entered into between any such city, and the purchaser, or purchasers, of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter.  The authorities of any such city, or cities, shall make a financial report to the said trustee annually of the operation of the aforesaid improvements and facilities. SECTION 29.  Section 59-15-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-15-5.  In connection with the issuance of bonds or other obligations by any municipality pursuant to this chapter or in order to secure the payment of said bonds or other obligations, such municipality shall have power: (a)  To accept grants from the United States of America, the President of the United States, or such agencies, instrumentalities or corporations as may be designated or created to make grants or loans (hereinafter termed "federal agency") pursuant to any act of the Congress of the United States providing for the construction of useful public works for or in aid of work, development authorized by this chapter. (b)  To make such contracts and execute such instruments containing such provisions, covenants and conditions as in the discretion of the authorities of any such municipalities may be necessary, proper or advisable for the purpose of obtaining or securing grants, loans, or other financial assistance from any federal agency pursuant to any act of Congress of the United States, to make such further, different or additional contracts and execute all instruments necessary or convenient in or for the furtherance of any work, development or improvement, including but not limited to all property real and personal appurtenant thereto or connected therewith and the existing work, development or improvement, if any, to which the work, development or improvement authorized by this chapter is an extension, addition, betterment or embellishment (hereinafter termed "work, development or improvement"), to carry out and perform the terms and conditions of any such contract or instrument. (c)  To pledge all or any part of the fees, rents, tolls, revenues or other charges received or receivable by such municipality from any work, development or improvement to which its right then exists or the right to which may thereafter come into existence. (d)  To covenant against the pledging of all or any part of the fees, rents, tolls, revenues or other charges received or receivable by such municipality from any work, development or improvement to which its right then exists or the right to which may thereafter come into existence so long as any of the bonds or other obligations issued under the provisions of this chapter remain unpaid. (e)  To covenant against the incumbering of all or any part of any work, development or improvement or against permitting or suffering any lien thereon so long as any of the bonds or other obligations issued under the provisions of this chapter remain unpaid. (f)  To covenant as to what other or additional debt may be incurred by such municipality. (g)  To provide for the preparation, specifications, terms, form, registration, extension, execution and authentication of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter. (h)  To provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter. (i)  To covenant as to the fees, rents, revenues, concessions or tolls to be charged, the amount to be raised each year or other period of time and as to the use and disbursement to be made thereof. (j)  To covenant to set aside or to pay over reserves and sinking funds and as to the disposal thereof. (k)  To redeem prior to maturity, with or without premium, bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter and to covenant for their prior redemption and to provide the terms and conditions thereof. (l)  To covenant against extending the time for the payment of the interest on or principal of the bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter directly or indirectly by any means or in any manner. (m)  To covenant as to books of account of such municipality and as to the inspection and audit thereof and as to the accounting methods. (n)  To covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach by such municipality of any covenant, condition or obligation assumed pursuant to this chapter. (o)  To make such covenants and do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary, convenient or desirable in order to secure any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter or in the absolute discretion of the authorities of such municipality in order to make such bonds or other obligations more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts, or things may not be enumerated herein or expressly authorized herein; it being the intention hereby to give the authorities of any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this chapter the power to do all things in the issuance of said bonds or other obligations and for their execution that may not be inconsistent with the constitution of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 30.  Section 59-15-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-15-7.  Any city as is described in Section 59-15-1, is hereby given authority, upon the adoption of a resolution to such effect, to issue bonds or other obligations for any or all of the purposes as in this chapter herein provided; but such bonds or other obligations shall not be issued unless and until the governing authorities of the municipality are first authorized and requested so to do by a petition signed by not less than seventy-five per cent of the qualified electors of the municipality, or until authorized so to do by two-thirds of the qualified electors of the municipality who vote in an election called for that purpose. Said petition, or the ballot used in such election, as the case may be, shall disclose the purposes for which said funds are sought, and all funds derived thereunder shall be kept in a separate account by the municipality and shall be used solely for the purposes set forth in said petition, or upon the aforesaid ballot, as the case may be.  The books of accounts and other sources of information pertaining to duties under the provisions of this chapter of any such city shall be and remain at all times open to inspection and subject to audit by the holder or holders of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter. SECTION 31.  Section 59-15-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-15-9.  The bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality of the State of Mississippi pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be secured as to payment as hereinafter in this chapter provided, and in addition thereto shall be secured as to payment by the full faith and credit of the municipality issuing the same, and the governing authorities of such municipality shall annually levy a tax on all the taxable property of such municipality sufficient to produce an amount, which, when added to the net revenues hereinafter in this chapter authorized to be pledged for the payment thereof, will be sufficient to pay all interest and principal of such bonds which may mature during such annual period. Such bonds or other obligations so issued, being additionally secured as to payment as hereinafter in this chapter provided, shall not be construed as a debt within the meaning of any statutory limitation as to the amount of which may be incurred by any such municipality. SECTION 32.  Section 59-15-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-15-11.  The power to issue bonds or other obligations authorized by Sections 59-15-1 through 59-15-9, shall be vested in, and may be exercised from time to time by, the governing body of any municipality described in said sections. Such bonds or other obligations shall be authorized by resolution of the governing body of any such municipality and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, not exceeding twenty-five years from their respective dates, bear interest at such rate or rates, not exceeding four per centum per annum, be in such denomination, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of prior redemption, with or without premium as such resolution or resolutions may provide. Such bonds or other obligations may be sold at public or private sale for such price or prices as the governing body of such municipality shall determine, provided that the interest cost to maturity of the money received from any issue of said bonds or other obligations shall not exceed four per centum per annum.  Such bonds or other obligations may be issued by any municipality described in Sections 59-15-1 through 59-15-9 in a principal amount not exceeding in the aggregate One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), for any purpose or purposes authorized by said sections.  Such municipality shall have power out of any funds available to purchase any bonds or other obligations issued by it pursuant to this chapter, and all bonds or other obligations so purchased shall be canceled and no bonds or other obligations shall be issued in lieu thereof.  In anticipation of the issuance of the definitive bonds authorized by this chapter, any such municipality may issue interim certificates.  Such interim certificates shall be in such form, contain such terms, conditions or provisions, bear such date or dates, and evidence such agreement or agreements relating to their discharge by payment or by the delivery of the definitive bonds, as such municipality by resolution of its governing body may determine.  Any bonds, interim certificates or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter shall be fully negotiable within the meaning and for all the purposes of the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code. SECTION 33.  Section 59-15-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-15-13.  The proceeds from the sale of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter shall be placed to the credit of the municipality issuing such bonds in a bank or banks which are members of the Federal Reserve System and may be withdrawn therefrom in accordance with any agreement or agreements entered into between such municipality and the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds or other obligations and shall be used for no other purpose than the purpose or purposes set forth in the original resolution of the governing body of such municipality.  Any officer or other person diverting or assisting to divert any such funds to any other purpose or purposes than the purpose or purposes originally set forth in said resolution of the governing body of such municipality shall be guilty of a felony and punishable accordingly, and shall be liable both personally and on official bond for such diversion.  Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as a guarantee on the part of such city to pay the principal of or interest on any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter. SECTION 34.  Section 59-15-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-15-15.  Any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this chapter by resolution or resolutions duly adopted, is hereby given authority to execute and deliver a mortgage or deed of trust on any or all lands, properties, improvements and facilities, the acquisition, construction, maintenance or operation of which are provided for by this chapter. Such resolution or resolutions of such municipality shall prescribe the provisions, covenants and conditions of any such mortgage or deed of trust.  Such provisions, covenants and conditions, if not self-executing, may be enforced by appropriate proceedings, either in law or in equity. SECTION 35.  Section 59-15-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-15-17.  Bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter and any interest thereon or income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation, except gift, transfer or inheritance taxes, in so far as may be within the power of the State of Mississippi so to provide. SECTION 36.  Section 59-15-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-15-19.  Any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this chapter shall, so long as any such bonds or other obligations remain outstanding and unpaid, by resolution or resolutions duly adopted, authorize and appoint a trustee, satisfactory to the purchaser or purchasers of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter, or any successor thereto, with the following powers and duties: (a)  Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall receive and receipt for all money paid or to be paid to it in accordance with Section 59-15-3, constituting the net revenues derived from the operation of the improvements and facilities authorized by this chapter; (b)  Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall deposit all money received or to be received, in a special account or accounts in a bank or banks which are members of the Federal Reserve System, with such provisions for security therefor as may be incorporated in any agreement or agreements entered into between any such municipality and the purchaser or purchasers of any such bonds or other obligations; (c)  Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall use and apply all such money so received to the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this chapter, as the same become due, and shall use and apply any surplus remaining after such payment or payments for the prior redemption, with or without premium, of bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this chapter, or in accordance with the provisions of any agreement or agreements as may be made between any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this chapter and the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds or other obligations; (d)  Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall have and be vested with all rights, powers and duties, in addition to the foregoing, as may be provided for in any agreement or agreements between any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this chapter and the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds or other obligations; (e)  Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall by an instrument in writing, accept such trust and shall file such written acceptance of such trust with the clerk of the municipality so appointing such trustee; (f)  If such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall die, fail, neglect or refuse to perform any of the duties herein imposed or that may be imposed by reason of any of the provisions of any agreement or agreements as aforesaid, such trustee, or any successor thereto, shall, on the written request of the holder or holders of twenty per centum or more in aggregate principal amount of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter then outstanding and unpaid, be removed, by resolution duly adopted by the municipality by which such trustee, or any successor thereto, was appointed; and in such event, it shall be the duty of any such trustee so removed to effectuate a valid transfer of all money then in the possession or under the control of such trustee so removed to a duly appointed successor, and a failure on the part of such trustee so removed to do so shall constitute an embezzlement of such money and shall be punishable accordingly; (g)  In the event any such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall die or be removed as hereinabove provided, it shall be the duty of any such municipality immediately by resolution duly adopted to appoint a trustee, as successor thereto, who is satisfactory to said holder or holders of twenty per centum or more in aggregate principal amount of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter then outstanding and unpaid. SECTION 37.  Section 59-7-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-1.  In all counties in the State of Mississippi in which there is located a harbor or port of entry where commodities are exported to foreign nations, and where there is maintained a channel and/or harbor or port to a depth of not less than twenty feet, the tax collector of said county shall pay into the county depository, the amount of two mills of all ad valorem taxes due by said county to the State of Mississippi which is collected by the tax collector of said county or which may be collected by any other lawful taxing agency of such county and state for such county. SECTION 38.  Section 59-7-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-3.  The board of supervisors of the county or counties designated in section 59-7-1 shall place all money so retained and collected in the county depository in the county to the credit of a fund which shall be known as a port fund, and such fund so deposited shall be used only for the maintenance, construction, promotion, advertising and general advancement of the port of entry so located in said county, and the fund shall be expended by the board of supervisors of the county for the maintenance, construction, promotion, advertisement, and general advancement of any port or ports of entry in said county or counties and the payment of any outstanding bonds and interest thereon heretofore or hereafter issued for port purposes by any municipality in which said port or ports are located as hereinafter provided. SECTION 39.  Section 59-7-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-5.  The authorities of any municipality in which there is situated and located, in whole or in part, a port of entry through which commodities are imported and exported to foreign nations, which maintains a channel and/or harbor to a depth of not less than twenty feet, are hereby given the authority to engage in, through the agency hereinafter provided and designated and such other agencies as hereinafter may be provided by law, work of internal improvement, or promoting, developing, constructing, maintaining, and operating harbors or seaports within the state and its jurisdiction, acting through the commission hereinafter provided for, shall have the power to acquire, purchase, install, lease, construct, own, hold, maintain, equip, use, control and operate at seaports, wharves, piers, docks, quays, grain elevators, cotton compresses, warehouses and other water and rail terminals and other structures, and facilities needful for the convenient use of the same in the aid of commerce including the dredging of approaches thereto, provided that such work on improvements and facilities shall always be and remain under the management and control of said municipality through the governing agency hereinafter provided and designated, or other such governing agency or agencies as hereinafter may be provided by law.  The entire cost of the said municipality of engaging in such work or development shall not exceed the sum of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00). SECTION 40.  Section 59-7-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-7.  All improvements, constructed by and under the provisions of this article, shall be operated under the control of a port commission as provided in Chapter 1 of this title. All revenue created or collected from the use of said docks, harbors and facilities of whatsoever nature shall be paid into the city treasury of said port of entry to be used exclusively for the advancement, development and advertising of said port in whatsoever method or manner said port commissioners shall see fit, and all revenue provided for in this article, either by levy or collection from said docks and harbor facilities may be paid to the retirement of any bonds heretofore issued or hereafter issued by any such municipality for wharf construction or other port purposes, regardless of the time of issuance of such bonds.  Said port commissioners of said port of entry shall make an annual report to the Governor of the State of Mississippi, to the State Legislature, to the board of supervisors, and to the municipal governing authorities. SECTION 41.  Section 59-7-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-9.  All monies accruing by virtue of this article, either through revenues, tariffs, or bonds, or through other sources, shall be expended at the direction of the port commission appointed for any port of entry, as designated herein, and any bond issue hereunder by any municipality, coming under the provisions of this article, shall be exclusive of any and all other bonds issued by said municipality, and the same shall not be limited as now provided by law. SECTION 42.  Section 59-7-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-11.  The authorities of any municipality in which there is situated and located in whole or in part a port of entry through which commodities are imported or exported are hereby given authority to issue bonds or other obligations to construct all needful improvement or improvements in harbors within their corporate limits, and including the deepening of any part of said harbor or extending, enlarging and adding to the same by dredging of any part of said harbor or extending inland, to acquire, construct, repair and improve public wharves and docks of said municipality in connection with said harbor; to own, construct, lease and maintain sheds, warehouses, elevators, compresses and other works of public improvement, including roadways or rail trackage necessary or useful for such port, harbor and/or docks and wharf purposes. SECTION 43.  Section 59-7-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-13.  All of the bonds issued pursuant to the authority set forth in Section 59-7-11 shall be lithographed or engraved, and printed in two (2) or more colors, to prevent counterfeiting, and shall be in sums not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) each, and shall be registered as issued, be numbered in a regular series from one (1) upward, be signed by the mayor and countersigned by the clerk who shall impress the municipal seal upon each bond as it is issued; and every bond shall specify on its face the purpose for which it was issued; and the total amount authorized to be issued and each shall be payable to bearer.  All such monies above referred to, as retained by the boards of supervisors, shall first be appropriated by the boards of supervisors for the payment of interest and sinking fund for any and all bonds issued by the municipality for port purposes and the balance, if any, shall be expended by the boards of supervisors by and under the direction and advice of the port commission of said municipality.  However, in case there is not sufficient money to pay the interest and sinking funds on said bonds, the corporate authorities of municipalities issuing said bonds shall levy annually a special levy to be used exclusively in paying the interest on each bond and bonds maturing within the year providing a sinking fund for the redemption of the bonds issued.  However, such tax levy shall not be made by municipalities to pay bonds, nor the interest thereon, issued under Article 7 of this chapter. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, bonds referred to hereinabove may be issued pursuant to the supplemental powers and authorizations conferred by the provisions of the Registered Bond Act, being Sections 31-21-1 through 31-21-7. SECTION 44.  Section 59-7-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-15.  Before issuing the bonds authorized by Section 59-7-11, the corporate authorities shall by resolution spread upon the minutes, declare their intention of issuing said bonds, fixing in said resolution the maximum amount thereof, and the purpose for which they are issued and where an election is required shall fix in such resolution a date upon which an election shall be held in said municipality, of which not less than three (3) weeks' notice shall be given by the clerk by a notice published in a newspaper published in said municipality once a week for three (3) weeks preceding said election at three (3) public places in said municipality.  Such election shall be held as far as practicable, as other elections are held in municipalities. SECTION 45.  Section 59-7-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-17.  At an election required by Section 59-7-15, all qualified electors of said municipality may vote, and the ballots used shall have printed thereon a brief statement of the amount and purpose of the proposed bond issue and the words, "For the bond issue," and the words, "Against the bond issue," and the voter shall vote by placing a cross (X) opposite his choice of the proposition.  In cities of less than twelve thousand inhabitants, when the amount to be issued is not more than Thirty Thousand Dollars the corporate authorities shall publish the resolution in some newspaper published in the county for three full consecutive weeks as herein provided, declaring their intention to issue said bonds, giving the day and date upon which said bonds are to be issued and if twenty percent of the qualified electors of the municipality file a written protest against the issuance of said bonds, on or before said date, then an election shall be had as herein provided, and if no protest shall be filed, said bonds shall be issued without an election. SECTION 46.  Section 59-7-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-19.  Should the election provided for in Sections 59-7-15 and 59-7-17 result in favor of the issuance of the bonds, the corporate authorities may issue said bonds, either in whole or in part within one (1) year after the date of such election or within one (1) year after final favorable determination of any litigation affecting such bonds, as may be deemed best, and should the bonds be issued by the municipalities without an election therefor as provided.  All bonds shall mature annually, with all maturities not longer than twenty (20) years, with not less than one-fiftieth (1/50) of the total issue to mature each year during the first five (5) years of the life of said bonds, and not less than one-twenty-fifth (1/25) of the said total issue to mature annually during the succeeding ten-year period of the life of said bonds, and the remainder to be divided into approximately equal payments, one (1) payment to mature during each year of the remaining life of the bonds.  Said bonds shall not bear a greater rate of interest than that allowed in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, payable semiannually, the denomination and form and place of payment to be fixed in the ordinance of the corporate authorities issuing said bonds, and they shall be prepared and signed by the mayor and clerk of said municipality with the seal of the municipality affixed thereto, but the coupons may only bear a facsimile signature of such mayor and clerk.  Such bonds, when issued, shall constitute a lien on all the taxable property in such municipality and county and the corporate authorities shall annually levy a special tax on all such property sufficient to pay the principal and interest of such bonds as the same falls due, if there not be sufficient funds provided herein. SECTION 47.  Section 59-7-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-21.  The proceeds of any bonds issued under the authority of this article shall be placed in the municipal treasury or depository, if there be one, as a special fund and shall be used for no other purpose than the purpose set forth in the original resolution of the corporate authorities of such municipality, and any officer diverting or assisting to divert any such funds to any other purpose than the purpose originally set forth in said resolution of the corporate authorities of said municipality shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and punishable accordingly, and shall be liable both personally and on his official bond for such diversion.  Nothing in this article shall be construed as a guarantee on the part of the State of Mississippi to pay the interest or principal on any bonds issued under this article. SECTION 48.  Section 59-7-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-101.  This article is supplementary and in addition to Article 1 of this chapter, and shall not apply to any county or counties of the state already receiving two mills of the state ad valorem taxes for port or harbor purposes. SECTION 49.  Section 59-7-103, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-103.  (1)  In order to provide for the improvement, promotion, development, construction, maintenance and operation of harbors or ports in counties having or hereafter providing harbors or ports where wharf or terminal or other facilities exist for the handling of inbound or outbound waterborne cargo moving in interstate or foreign commerce and where there is maintained a channel, harbor or port with a depth of not less than nine (9) feet, there shall be and there is hereby created in each such county electing to exercise the provisions of this article a special fund to be known as the "Port Fund," into which payments shall be made as follows: (a)  The tax collector of each such county electing to come under this article shall deduct from all state ad valorem taxes collected by him a sum equal to the avails of a levy of two (2) mills on the dollar of the assessed valuation of taxable property within such county upon which state ad valorem taxes are levied and collected. The amount so deducted shall be set aside by the tax collector and shall by him be paid into the said port fund of such county.  Such payments shall be continued as long as there remains unpaid and outstanding any bonded indebtedness created by the board of supervisors of such county as hereinafter provided. (b)  The board of supervisors of each such county electing to exercise the provisions of this article shall pay or cause to be paid into the aforesaid port fund a sum equal to one-fourth (1/4) of the sum paid into said fund under subsection (a) above and such payments shall be continued as long as there remains unpaid and outstanding any bonded indebtedness created by such board of supervisors as hereinafter provided.  Any such board of supervisors shall provide the sum herein required either by appropriation from any available funds of the county or by the levy, in addition to all other county taxes, of a tax of not more than two (2) mills on the dollar of the assessed valuation of taxable property within such county upon which taxes for the general county fund are levied and collected.  In case of a special tax levy as herein authorized, the tax collector of each such county shall set aside the avails of such levy and shall pay the same directly into the port fund of such county. (c)  The port commission hereinafter provided for shall pay into the port fund all of the revenues of whatsoever nature which may be derived from or through the use of the harbor, port, wharf or terminal facilities under its jurisdiction as hereinafter provided. (2)  In order to come within the provisions of this article, the board of supervisors of any such county shall, by appropriate resolution spread upon its minutes, declare its intention so to do and shall annually provide for the necessary matching county funds.  A certified copy of such resolution shall be filed with the tax collector of such county and shall constitute his authority to set aside the taxes hereinabove referred to and to pay the same into the aforesaid port fund. Provided further, that any county in the State of Mississippi through which a river or other stream flows, and which stream is classed as navigable and maintained as such by any agency of the federal government, and wherein harbors, wharves, ports, terminals or other facilities exist or are proposed or established hereafter for the handling of inbound or outbound waterborne cargo moving in interstate or foreign commerce, and where there is maintained a channel, harbor or port of such depth necessary for said purposes, then in such event such county may come under the provisions of this article if and when its application to come under the provisions of this article is approved by the Mississippi Board of Economic Development, which board shall adjudicate and determine the feasibility of said project so applied for and whether or not it is economically feasible. Certified copies of the order of said board shall be filed with the Auditor of Public Accounts and the tax collector of such county affected. SECTION 50.  Section 59-7-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-105.  To provide additional or supplemental funds for the aforesaid purposes, and in connection therewith to acquire and develop water, air and rail terminals, rail lines, and such other structures, facilities, lands, property or rights therein needful for the convenient use of the same in the aid of commerce, and land for industrial operations, including the establishment and development of industrial parks, as provided in Section 59-9-17 and related sections, the board of supervisors of any such county may issue bonds of such county in an amount not exceeding the principal sum of Eleven Million Dollars ($11,000,000.00).  No county shall issue bonds under the provisions of this article which will result in outstanding bonded indebtedness incurred under the provisions of this article in excess of Eight Million Dollars ($8,000,000.00) unless and until the question of the issuance of such bonds shall have been submitted to and approved by a majority of the qualified electors of the county voting in an election called and held for the purpose of considering whether or not such bonds should be issued.  The first Six Million Dollars ($6,000,000.00) in aggregate original principal amount of bonds issued under authority of this article shall not be included in computing any present or future debt limit of such county under any present or future law. SECTION 51.  Section 59-7-107, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-107.  All bonds authorized by Section 59-7-105 shall be negotiable instruments within the meaning of the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code, shall be lithographed or engraved, and printed in two (2) or more colors, to prevent counterfeiting, shall be registered as issued, shall be numbered in a regular series from one (1) upward, and each bond shall specify on its face the purpose for which it was issued and the total amount authorized to be issued, shall be payable to bearer, and the interest to accrue thereon shall be evidenced by proper coupons to be attached thereto.  Such bonds shall be executed by the manual or facsimile signature of the president of the board of supervisors, or the vice president in the absence or disability of the president, and countersigned by the manual or facsimile signature of the clerk thereof, with the official seal of the county affixed thereto.  At least one (1) signature on each bond shall be a manual signature, as specified in the issuing resolution. The coupons may bear only the facsimile signatures of such president, or vice president and clerk.  All such bonds shall be sold at public sale as provided by law, and no such bonds shall be issued and sold for less than par and accrued interest, and not more than one (1) series of interest coupons shall be attached to any such bonds.  All interest accruing on such bonds shall be payable semiannually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may represent interest for any period not exceeding one (1) year. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, bonds referred to hereinabove may be issued pursuant to the supplemental powers and authorizations conferred by the provisions of the Registered Bond Act, being Sections 31-21-1 through 31-21-7. SECTION 52.  Section 59-7-109, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-109.  All bonds authorized by Section 59-7-105 shall mature annually, with all maturities not longer than twenty (20) years, with not less than one-fiftieth (1/50) of the total issue to mature each year during the first five (5) years of the life of such bonds, not less than one-twenty-fifth (1/25) of the total issue to mature each year during the succeeding ten-year period of the life of such bonds, and the remainder to be divided into approximately equal annual payments, one (1) payment to mature each year for the remaining life of such bonds.  Such bonds shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972.  The denomination, form and place or places of payment of such bonds shall be fixed in the resolution or order of the board of supervisors issuing such bonds. No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon, and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted.  The lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than sixty percent (60%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue.  The interest rate of any one (1) interest coupon shall not exceed the maximum interest rate allowed on such bonds. Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%), and a zero rate of interest cannot be named. SECTION 53.  Section 59-7-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-111.  The board of supervisors of any county which shall have issued bonds under the provisions of this article shall, unless there be sufficient funds otherwise available therefor in the port bonds interest and sinking fund, annually levy a special tax upon all of the taxable property within such county at a rate which shall be sufficient to provide for the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds according to the terms thereof.  All taxes thus collected shall be credited to a special fund in the county treasury of such county to be known and designated as the "port bonds interest and sinking fund," and all sums credited to said fund shall be used to pay such bonds as they mature and the interest thereon as it accrues, and for no other purpose.  It shall be the mandatory duty of such board of supervisors to transfer funds from said port fund to the port bonds interest and sinking fund in amounts sufficient to pay maturing principal and accruing interest on bonds issued hereunder, if balances standing to the credit of said port fund are sufficient for that purpose.  To the extent that funds are thus made available for the payment of such bonds and the interest thereon, the special tax levy hereinabove provided for may be correspondingly reduced.  The said bonds nevertheless shall be general obligations of the county issuing the same, and the full faith, credit and resources of such county shall be pledged to the payment thereof and the interest thereon. SECTION 54.  Section 59-7-113, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-113.  Before issuing any bonds for any of the purposes herein enumerated, the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention so to do, stating the amount of bonds proposed to be issued and the purpose for which the bonds are to be issued, and the date upon which the board proposes to direct the issuance of such bonds.  Such resolution shall be published once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper published in such county. The first publication of such resolution shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date fixed in such resolution for the issuance of the bonds, and the last publication shall be made not more than seven (7) days prior to such date.  If no newspaper be published in such county, then such notice shall be given by publishing the resolution for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such county and, in addition, by posting a copy of such resolution for at least twenty-one (21) days next preceding the date fixed therein at three (3) public places in such county.  If twenty percent (20%) of the qualified electors of the county shall file a written protest against the issuance of such bonds on or before the date specified in such resolution, then an election on the question of the issuance of such bonds shall be called and held as is herein provided.  If no such protest be filed, then such bonds may be issued without an election on the question of the issuance thereof, at any time within a period of two (2) years after the date specified in the above-mentioned resolution.  However, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may nevertheless call an election on such question, in which event it shall not be necessary to publish the resolution declaring its intention to issue such bonds as herein provided. SECTION 55.  Section 59-7-115, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-115.  Where an election is to be called, as provided in Section 59-7-113, notice of such election shall be signed by the clerk of the board of supervisors and shall be published once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks, in at least one (1) newspaper published in such county.  The first publication of such notice shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date fixed for such election and the last publication shall be made not more than seven (7) days prior to such date.  If no newspaper is published in such county, then such notice shall be given by publishing the same for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such county, and, in addition, by posting a copy of such notice for at least twenty-one (21) days next preceding such election at three (3) public places in such county. SECTION 56.  Section 59-7-117, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-117.  The election provided for in Sections 59-7-113 and 59-7-115 shall be held, as far as is practicable, in the same manner as other elections are held in counties.  At such election, all qualified electors of such county may vote, and the ballots used at such election shall have printed thereon a brief statement of the amount and purpose of the proposed bond issue and the words "FOR THE BOND ISSUE" and "AGAINST THE BOND ISSUE," and the voter shall vote by placing a cross (x) or check mark (✓) opposite his choice on the proposition. SECTION 57.  Section 59-7-119, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-119.  When the results of the election on the question of the issuance of bonds under the provisions of this article shall have been canvassed by the election commissioners of such county and certified by them to the board of supervisors of such county, it shall be the duty of such board of supervisors to determine and adjudicate whether or not three-fifths (3/5ths) of the qualified electors who voted in such election voted in favor of the issuance of such bonds and, unless three-fifths (3/5ths) of the qualified electors who voted in such election shall have voted in favor of the issuance of such bonds, then such bonds shall not be issued. Should three-fifths (3/5ths) of the qualified electors who vote in such election vote in favor of the issuance of such bonds, then the board of supervisors of the county may issue such bonds, either in whole or in part, within two years from the date of such election, or within two years after the final favorable termination of any litigation affecting the issuance of such bonds, as such board shall deem best. SECTION 58.  Section 59-7-121, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-121.  The proceeds of any bonds issued by any county pursuant to the provisions of this article shall be placed in the county treasury or depository, if there be one, in a special fund and shall be expended by the board of supervisors of such county for the purpose or purposes for which the bonds were authorized to be issued, and for no other.  If the board of supervisors of any such county or any member thereof or any other officer shall willfully divert or aid or assist in diverting any such fund, or any part thereof, to any purpose other than that for which such bonds were authorized to be issued, such person shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment in the State Penitentiary for a term not exceeding five (5) years and, in addition, shall be liable personally on his official bond for the amount so diverted.  Any member of such board of supervisors may escape the penalty herein provided for by having his vote recorded in the negative on any illegal diversion of the proceeds of such bonds. SECTION 59.  Section 59-7-123, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-123.  Whenever a balance shall remain in the proceeds of any bond issue after the purpose for which such bonds were issued shall have been accomplished, such balance shall forthwith be transferred to the port bonds interest and sinking fund hereinabove provided for. SECTION 60.  Section 59-7-125, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-125.  (1)  All improvements constructed by the board of supervisors under the provisions of this article shall be operated and maintained by a port commission composed of five (5) residents of such county who shall be qualified electors therein. Such commission shall have jurisdiction over the port, terminals, harbors and passes leading thereto, and all vessels, boats and wharves, common carriers, and public utilities therein, using the same, within their respective counties.  Such port commission shall be appointed as follows:  one (1) member shall be appointed by the Governor, two (2) shall be appointed by the board of supervisors of the county, and two (2) shall be appointed by the governing body of the municipality which is the county seat of such county in such cases where the county seat of such county is situate on or adjacent to such port facilities, otherwise, four (4) members shall be appointed by the board of supervisors.  A county and a municipality may by joint resolution dissolve a port commission created under this section which is governed by a commission with two (2) commissioners appointed by each.  The joint resolution must provide that the municipality relinquishes its duties and obligations related to the port, and that the county assumes all duties and obligations related to the port.  Any commission so dissolved shall be reconstituted to consist of five (5) members, one (1) member appointed from each supervisor district.  The board of supervisors shall provide for staggered terms in its order providing for the appointment of the reconstituted port commission.  Before entering upon the duties of the office, each of such commissioners shall take and subscribe to the oath of office required by Section 268 of the Constitution of the State of Mississippi, and shall give bond, to be approved by the board of supervisors, in the sum of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), conditioned upon the faithful performance of their duties.  Such bond shall be made payable to the county and in case of breach thereof, suit may be brought on the relation of the county for the benefit of such port commission.  Such commissioners shall hold office for a term of four (4) years from the date of their appointment and qualification and until their successor or successors shall be appointed and qualified as set out herein.  Three (3) members of the port commission shall be necessary to constitute a quorum for the conducting of business. (2)  The members of the board of supervisors shall be ex officio members of the port commission, but no bond shall be required of them in such capacity; provided, however, the members of the board of supervisors shall be nonvoting members of the port commission and shall not be included or counted for the determination of a quorum for conducting of business by the port commission unless and until the board of supervisors of a particular county, by order entered on its minutes, expressly provides that the members of the board of supervisors shall be voting members of the port commission and the number of members required for a quorum to conduct business of the port commission, but in no event shall the number required for a quorum to conduct business of the port commission be less than three (3). (3)  All actions heretofore taken by the various port commissions at which at least three (3) members were present and which would otherwise have been legal actions except for the absence of a legal quorum being present and voting are hereby ratified, confirmed and approved. SECTION 61.  Section 59-7-127, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-127.  When such port commissioners provided for in Section 59-7-125 shall have been appointed and shall have been qualified as set out herein, they shall meet at the regular meeting place of the board of supervisors of such county, after giving at least five (5) days' notice of the time and place of such meeting by publication in a newspaper published at the county seat of such county.  At such meeting they shall elect a president and a secretary who shall be members of the commission, and adopt such rules as may govern the time and place for holding meetings, regular and special, not inconsistent with the provisions of this article. SECTION 62.  Section 59-7-129, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-129.  The duties and powers of such port commission provided for in Section 59-7-125 shall be the same as those which are set forth and prescribed in Sections 59-1-9 and 59-1-27, except that the salary of the port director shall be subject to the approval of the board of supervisors. SECTION 63.  Section 59-7-131, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-131.  It shall be the duty of such port commission, from time to time, to make recommendations to the board of supervisors of such county concerning expenditures to be made for the improvement, promotion, development, construction, maintenance and operation of the harbor and port facilities of such county, and shall annually submit to such board of supervisors a proposed budget for the operation and maintenance of such harbor and port facilities, which recommendations and budget shall be subject to approval of the board of supervisors.  Except as provided in Section 59-7-111, the port fund shall be subject to expenditure by the port commission. The port commission may recommend to the Legislative Budget Office, the State Fiscal Management Board, and the county board of supervisors that certain excess funds in the port fund be transferred to any industrial development authority within the county.  Upon approval by the State Fiscal Management Board and the county board of supervisors, the port commission may transfer such excess funds, or any portion thereof which may be designated by the State Fiscal Management Board and county board of supervisors, as provided herein. The port commission in any county bordering the Mississippi River and having a population of more than fifty-one thousand (51,000) but less than fifty-two thousand (52,000) according to the 1980 federal census may recommend to the board of supervisors the expenditure of excess funds in the port fund for the acquisition of lands in the county to be used for industrial development purposes.  Upon the aquisition of such lands, excess funds in the port fund may also be expended to provide necessary utilities and other improvements the board of supervisors deems necessary and requisite for industrial development.  Any lands acquired hereunder shall be titled in the name of the county. For the purposes of this section, the term "excess funds" means monies determined to be in excess of those necessary to fund the budget for the fiscal year. SECTION 64.  Section 59-7-201, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-201.  This article shall be applicable to all counties electing to come under the terms and provisions of Article 3 of this chapter and in which a flood control project has been authorized or may be authorized by the federal government which either directly or indirectly involves, or has the result of creating, a potential industrial area or the protection of such an area. This article is supplementary to said Article 3 of this chapter, and all other laws of this state concerning ports and harbors and shall not be construed by way of limitation on any of the powers or authority heretofore granted, but the authority conferred herein is in addition and cumulative thereto. SECTION 65.  Section 59-7-203, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-203.  Where any county in connection with any such flood control project has given or may give assurances of local cooperation required by the federal authorities, as authorized by law, the board of supervisors of such county shall have the added power and authority, if necessary or desirable for the fulfillment of such assurances, to acquire all lands and easements and rights-of-way, and the fee title to such lands where advisable, either by purchase or by condemnation and, if by condemnation, according to the existing statutes applicable to the acquisition by counties of property for public use. Where any county of the state which operates any such project has been required to give its assurances by the federal authorities or other agency of the government of the United States of local cooperation and participation in any such project by agreeing to pay any part of the construction costs of such project or projects, then the board of supervisors of such county shall have the added power and authority, if necessary and desirable for the fulfillment of such assurances, to sign agreements with such federal authorities or other agency of the government of the United States whereby such participating county agrees to pay its part of the cost of such construction or any fractional part thereof, including interest of not more than three percent (3%) per annum, and provided further that said assurances shall be due and payable within the primary term of forty years from the time such assurances are given. SECTION 66.  Section 59-7-205, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-205.  (1)  In any county where a port commission has been established or may be established and where the board of supervisors of said county directs that said commission undertake, on behalf of such county, jurisdiction over and duties in connection with the fulfillment of the assurances of local cooperation and handling of the harbor project upon which construction may be done by the federal government, as contemplated by Section 59-7-201, and where either all or over half of the lands and properties involved in said project are beyond the confines of any municipality lying within said county, then the board of supervisors of said county shall appoint four (4) members of said port commission in accordance with the terms and provisions of Section 59-7-125, and, where such port commission has been established or may be established in such instance, then said port commission shall undertake and perform the duties assigned to it by said board, as hereby authorized, and said commissions shall, in addition, manage and control all port facilities which may be authorized and constructed by virtue of the terms and provisions of Article 3 of this chapter, and all appurtenant and physical properties connected therewith, both real and personal, and shall provide for the regular inspection, repair, maintenance and improvement of said port facilitates. Said port commission, in the performance of its duties, may make any contract and authorize any purchases from any funds on hand in the port fund of any such county, which said contracts and purchases shall be made in accordance with Section 31-7-1 et seq.  Said contracts and purchases shall include all contracts and purchases incidental to or necessary for the proper establishment, insurance, maintenance, repair, improvement and operation of said port facilities, including, if indicated for their protection, workmen's compensation insurance for the benefit of any employees of said port commission. Any such port commission is further authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to own and operate any or all dock, terminal, warehouse or railroad facilities which may by it be deemed necessary or desirable to promote the development of any port or industrial facilities under its control or supervision and to such end such port commission is authorized and empowered to acquire by purchase, construction or lease any buildings, structure or equipment, to employ any personnel or technical assistance, to enter into any contracts with any persons, firms or corporations, and to establish, charge and collect any tariffs, rates or other charges in connection therewith, as may be deemed necessary or advisable to accomplish such purposes.  Said port commission is likewise authorized and empowered to operate such dock, terminal, warehouse or railroad facilities through agents or lessees by such contractual or lease agreements as may be entered into by said port commission upon such terms and conditions as said commission may deem proper.  The authority granted hereby shall extend only to the lands under the control and supervision of said port commission. (2)  The powers and authority granted by this section are supplemental to all other powers and authority granted to said port commission and the same shall in nowise be construed to limit any such powers and authority heretofore granted. SECTION 67.  Section 59-7-207, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-207.  The commission referred to in Section 59-7-205 may establish and operate said port facilities on such plan as it may determine upon, including the right to employ, or delegate to the port director the employment of such engineering and legal assistants and such subordinate personnel as the commission may deem necessary, to provide for the wages and compensation of the port director and all other employees; and, in their discretion, to require that the port director and such other subordinate personnel as may be deemed necessary and desirable post a bond written by a surety company or companies authorized to do business in the State of Mississippi in such amount as the commission may designate, conditioned on the faithful discharge of all of their duties as such employees, the premiums on such bonds to be paid from said port fund in the discretion of the commission. SECTION 68.  Section 59-7-209, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-209.  The board of supervisors of any such county described in Section 59-7-201 may prescribe such further duties, powers and rights of such commission as may be within the authority of such board to delegate and provide for the reasonable compensation, if any, of the chairman and members of the commission, and shall provide that the acts of such commissioners shall regularly, and not less than quarterly or more than monthly, be reported to said board and be subject to its approval and concurrence by order spread upon the minutes of said board generally approving such reports and minutes.  The obligations incurred and the expenditures authorized to be made by said commission shall in the manner herein set forth be subject to the approval of the board of supervisors of said county; and when and should the board decline to grant its approval of any act of said commission, it shall signify its reason for withholding that approval on the minutes of said board.  All expenditures so authorized and provided for shall be made upon special port commission warrants to be countersigned by the clerk of said board.  There shall be no personal obligation or liability on the part of any member of said commission except for a wilful wrong, nor shall there be any general obligation or liability on said county other than from the revenues derived from the operation of said port and revenues allocated by law to the aforesaid port fund of said county, except for the obligation of a condemnation award or for any such obligation which may be provided for in any trust indenture or resolution under which bonds are issued under the terms and provisions of Article 3 of this chapter. SECTION 69.  Section 59-7-211, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-211.  In all such counties, described in Section 59-7-201, upon and with the approval of the board of supervisors, the port commission shall have the power and authority to sell or lease any lands or easements acquired by any such county in conjunction with the establishment and construction of any port or harbor under the jurisdiction of said commission for the purposes of industrial development, but the terms and provisions of any such sales or lease shall include limitations as to the use of such lands and easements for industrial activities integrated to water transportation in accordance with the terms and provisions of such assurances of local cooperation as may have been given by virtue of Section 51-35-15 or Section 51-35-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, and the provisions of this article. Furthermore, said port commission, upon and with the approval of the board of supervisors, shall have the power and is hereby authorized, in its discretion, to sell and convey to the United States of America, without any limitations whatsoever, by general or special warranty deed or other acceptable form or conveyance, the full title to any lands acquired or held by any such county in connection with the establishment and development of any harbor or port project under the jurisdiction of said commission in exchange for the title to lands of the United States of America deemed useful for or needed by any county in connection with the establishment, enlargement, development, construction or maintenance of any port or harbor project under the jurisdiction of said commission, or for such other consideration as said commission and said board find to be adequate and sufficient.  Said port commission, upon and with the approval of the board of supervisors of the county, is further hereby authorized to donate and/or sell and convey, without any limitations, upon such terms and conditions as may be deemed proper by the said commission and said board of supervisors, to the United States of America any of the lands needed by the United States of America for navigation and/or flood control purposes, or in fulfillment of any authorized assurances which have been given or which may be given by said county to the United States of America, or for the purpose of the display of the Gunboat Cairo. SECTION 70.  Section 59-7-213, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-213.  The port commission shall keep regular minutes of all its official actions and shall provide for an adequate bookkeeping system and regular audits and keep or cause to be kept full and correct records of the finances of said port commission and shall, from said port funds, provide for, and pay to the clerk of said board fees and sums as are found to be proper and reasonable for the extra duties and work hereby imposed upon him.  All such minutes, books and records shall be kept in the office of the chancery clerk of the county in which the port is located or in such other place as the board of supervisors may designate by order spread upon their minutes to the end that such minutes, books and records shall, under reasonable conditions, be available at all times to the public for inspection. SECTION 71.  Section 59-7-301, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-301.  This article, as to the subject matters hereof, shall supersede all other laws, general, special or local, including charters of municipalities.  Any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article shall have no power thereafter to issue bonds or other obligations pursuant to the provisions of Article 1 of this chapter, unless and until all bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article, and interest thereon, have been fully paid and discharged. SECTION 72.  Section 59-7-303, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-303.  An ad valorem tax of two mills on each one dollar of the total assessed valuation of all the taxable property in each county or counties in the State of Mississippi, in which there is located a harbor or port of entry where commodities are exported to foreign nations, and where there is maintained a channel and/or harbor or port to a depth of not less than twenty feet, be, and the same is hereby, levied on all said taxable property, in or for each year in which the principal of or interest on any bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this article becomes due.  The receipts from said two-mill tax shall be withheld by the tax collector of said county, and/or by any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for the collection of said taxes, from receipts from state ad valorem taxes now in effect or which may be hereafter levied, so long as the state ad valorem taxes shall be not less than the two-mill tax herein levied. However, if no state ad valorem taxes equal to or greater than the said two-mill tax herein levied is now or shall be hereafter levied, then and in that event, the said two-mill tax herein levied shall continue to be levied and collected as herein provided in each such county or counties in or for each year in which the principal of or interest on any bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this article becomes due. The tax collector, and/or any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for the collection of said taxes, shall pay over all moneys collected or to be collected as receipts from said two-mill tax to any trustee or successor thereto established as hereinafter in this article provided, and in the event that there is no such trustee, then said tax collector, and/or any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for collection of said taxes, shall pay over all such moneys into the county depository of each such county to the credit of a fund which shall be known as a port fund.  Any such moneys so paid into the county depository of each such county to the credit of said port fund may be expended at the direction of the port commission, appointed for any port of entry as designated in Chapter 1 of this title.  But in no county within the terms of this article shall there be withheld from the state treasury under the provisions of this article and Article 1 of this chapter, for any one year an amount in excess of the receipts from said two-mill tax.  The provisions of this article shall be deemed to be a contract with the holders of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article. SECTION 73.  Section 59-7-305, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-305.  The authorities of any municipality in which there is situated and located, in whole or in part, a port of entry through which commodities are imported and exported to foreign nations, which maintains a channel and/or harbor to a depth of not less than twenty feet, are hereby given the authority to engage in, either directly or through the commission hereinafter provided and designated and such other agencies as hereafter may be provided by law, work of internal improvement, or promoting, developing, constructing, maintaining, and operating harbors or seaports within the state and its jurisdiction, and either directly or through the commission hereinafter provided for, shall have the power to acquire, purchase, install, rent, lease, mortgage, and/or otherwise encumber, to construct, own, hold, maintain, equip, use, control and operate at seaports, wharves, piers, docks, quays, grain elevators, cotton compresses, warehouses, floating dry docks, graving docks, marine railways, tugboats, cold storage facilities and other water and rail terminals and other structures, and facilities needful for the convenient use of the same in the aid of commerce including the dredging of approaches thereto. SECTION 74.  Section 59-7-307, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-307.  All improvements and facilities constructed pursuant to Article 1 of this chapter, and/or constructed pursuant to this article, shall be maintained and operated under the control of the port commission as provided in Chapter 1 of this title.  The said port commission shall, subject to and in accordance with any agreement or agreements as may be made by any such municipality with the purchaser or purchasers of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article, prescribe, levy and collect all rents, fees, tolls, revenues, and/or other charges in connection with the use and occupancy of the aforesaid improvements and facilities, and shall pay over all net revenues derived from the operation of said improvements and facilities to any trustee, or successor thereto, established as hereinafter in this article provided.  Net revenues shall be deemed to be such as may be defined in any agreement or agreements entered into between any such municipality and the purchaser or purchasers of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article.  The said port commission shall make an annual report to the Governor of the State of Mississippi, to the municipality having such port of entry, and to the State Legislature. SECTION 75.  Section 59-7-309, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-309.  Any municipality, in which there is situated and located in whole or in part a port of entry through which commodities are imported or exported as aforesaid, is hereby given authority, upon the adoption of a resolution to such effect, to issue bonds or other obligations for any or all of the purposes as provided in this article.  The books of account and other sources of information pertaining to duties under the provisions of this article, of any port commission, municipality and/or county affected by this article, shall be and remain at all times open to inspection and subject to audit by the holder or holders of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article. SECTION 76.  Section 59-7-311, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-311.  The power to issue bonds or other obligations authorized by this article and Section 59-5-31, shall be vested in and may be exercised from time to time by the governing bodies of any municipality or county so authorized in such laws. Such revenue bonds may be issued without an election upon the adoption of a resolution of the board of supervisors of such county, declaring its intention to issue such bonds, and shall not be subject to any limitation as to amount, and shall not be included or computed in the statutory limitation of indebtedness of any such county. Such bonds shall bear date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates, be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges, and shall be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the board of supervisors of such county.  Such bonds shall mature in annual installments beginning not more than five (5) years from date thereof and extending not more than thirty-five (35) years from date thereof. Such bonds shall be signed by the president of the board of supervisors of such county, and the official seal of the county shall be affixed thereto, attested by the clerk of the board of supervisors of such county.  The interest coupons to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of said officers.  Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials herein designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers prior to the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until the delivery of the same to the purchaser or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear. All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of this article shall have and are hereby declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code.  Such bonds and income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation within the State of Mississippi. The board of supervisors of such county shall sell such bonds in such manner and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of said county, but no such sale shall be made at a price less than par plus accrued interest to date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser.  Notice of the sale of any such bonds shall be published at least one time not less than ten (10) days prior to the date of sale and shall be published in a newspaper published in and having general circulation within the county. The proceeds of such bonds shall be paid into a special fund or funds in banks qualified to act as depositories for such county.  The proceeds of such bonds shall be solely for the purposes for which they were issued, and the redeeming of any outstanding bonds, and shall be disbursed upon the order of the board of supervisors of such county, with such restrictions, if any, as the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds may provide.  If the proceeds of such bonds, by error of calculation or otherwise, shall be less than the cost of the purpose for which they were issued, and the redeeming of any outstanding bonds, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit which, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same purpose.  If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the amount required for the purpose for which the bonds were issued, the surplus shall be paid into the fund established for the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds. Such bonds may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, and things which are specified or required by this article.  The bonds authorized under the authority of this article may, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of such county, be validated in the chancery court of such county in the manner and with the force and effect provided by Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district, and other bonds. The revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall be payable solely out of the revenues to accrue from the operation of such project, development, improvement or utility systems, and the full faith and credit of the county shall not be pledged therefor, nor shall any ad valorem tax be levied therefor. SECTION 77.  Section 59-7-313, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-313.  The proceeds from the sale of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article shall be placed to the credit of such municipality in a bank or banks which are members of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and may be withdrawn therefrom in accordance with any agreement or agreements entered into between such municipality and the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds or other obligations and in accordance with the laws regulating the disbursement of municipal funds and shall be used for no other purpose than the purpose or purposes set forth in the original resolution of the governing body of such municipality. Any officer or other person diverting or assisting to divert any such funds to any other purpose or purposes than the purpose or purposes originally set forth in said resolution of the governing body of said municipality shall be guilty of a felony and punishable accordingly, and shall be liable both personally and on official bonds for such diversion.  Nothing in this article shall be construed as a guarantee on the part of the State of Mississippi to pay the principal of or interest on any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article. SECTION 78.  Section 59-7-315, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-315.  Any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article by resolution or resolutions duly adopted, is hereby given authority to execute and deliver a mortgage or deed of trust, in such form, with such validity and with such remedies as at present authorized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, on any or all properties, improvements and facilities, the acquisition, construction, maintenance and/or operation of which are provided for by this article.  Such resolution or resolutions of said municipality shall prescribe the provisions, covenants and conditions of any such mortgage or deed of trust.  Such provisions, covenants and conditions, if not self-executing, may be enforced by appropriate proceedings, either in law or in equity. SECTION 79.  Section 59-7-317, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-317.  The bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality of the State of Mississippi pursuant to this article shall not constitute a debt within the meaning of any statutory limitation as to the amount of debt which may be incurred by any such municipality, nor shall such bonds or other obligations be payable out of any funds other than the revenue collected or collectible from the use of said docks, harbors and facilities of whatsoever nature, and out of the receipts from the said two-mill ad valorem tax, in accordance with the provisions of Section 59-7-303. SECTION 80.  Section 59-7-319, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-319.  Bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article and any interest thereon or income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation, except gift, transfer and inheritance taxes, in so far as may be within the power of the State of Mississippi so to provide. SECTION 81.  Section 59-7-321, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-321.  In connection with the issuance of bonds or other obligations by any municipality pursuant to this article, or in order to secure the payment of said bonds or other obligations, such municipality shall have power: (a)  To accept grants from the United States of America, the president of the United States, the federal emergency administrator of public works, or such other agencies, instrumentalities or corporations as may be designated or created to make grants or loans (hereinafter termed "federal agency") pursuant to the national industrial recovery act and any further act of the congress of the United States providing for the construction of useful public works (hereinafter termed "national industrial recovery act"), for or in aid of work, development or improvement authorized by this article. (b)  To make such contracts and execute such instruments containing such provisions, covenants and conditions as in the discretion of the authorities of any such municipalities may be necessary, proper or advisable for the purpose of obtaining or securing grants, loans, or other financial assistance from any federal agency pursuant to the national industrial recovery act; to make such further, different or additional contracts and execute all instruments necessary or convenient in or for the furtherance of any work, development or improvement, including but not limited to all property real and personal appurtenant thereto or connected therewith and the existing work, development or improvement, if any, to which the work, development or improvement authorized by this article is an extension, addition, betterment or embellishment (hereinafter termed "work, development or improvement"), to carry out and perform the terms and conditions of any such contract or instrument. (c)  To pledge all or any part of the fees, rents, tolls, revenues or other charges received or receivable by such municipality and/or port commission from any work, development or improvement to which its right then exists or the right to which may thereafter come into existence. (d)  To covenant against the pledging of all or any part of the fees, rents, tolls, revenues or other charges received or receivable by such municipality and/or port commission from any work, development or improvement to which its right then exists or the right to which may thereafter come into existence. (e)  To covenant against the encumbering of all or any part of any work, development or improvement or against permitting or suffering any lien thereon. (f)  To covenant as to what other or additional debt may be incurred by such municipality. (g)  To provide for the preparation, specifications, terms, form, registration, extension, execution and authentication of any bonds or other obligations, issued pursuant to this article. (h)  To provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article. (i)  To covenant as to the fees, rents, revenues or tolls to be charged, the amount to be raised each year or other period of time and as to the use and disbursement to be made thereof. (j)  To covenant to set aside or to pay over reserves and sinking funds and as to the disposal thereof. (k)  To redeem prior to maturity, with or without premium, bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article and to covenant for their prior redemption and to provide the terms and conditions thereof. (l)  To covenant against extending the time for the payment of the interest on or principal of the bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article directly or indirectly by any means or in any manner. (m)  To covenant as to books of account of such municipality and as to the inspection and audit thereof and as to the accounting methods. (n)  To covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach by such municipality of any covenant, condition or obligation assumed pursuant to this article. (o)  To make such covenants and do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary, convenient or desirable in order to secure any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article, or in the absolute discretion of the authorities of such municipality in order to make such bonds or other obligations more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts, or things may not be enumerated herein or expressly authorized herein; it being the intention hereby to give the authorities of any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article the power to do all things in the issuance of said bonds or other obligations and for their execution that may not be inconsistent with the constitution of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 82.  Section 59-7-323, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-323.  Any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article shall, so long as any such bonds or other obligations remain outstanding and unpaid, by resolution or resolutions duly adopted, authorize and appoint a trustee, satisfactory to the purchaser or purchasers of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article or any successor thereto, with the following powers and duties: (a)  Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall receive and receipt for all monies collected or to be collected as receipts from the aforesaid two-mill tax by the aforesaid tax collector, and/or any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for the collection of said taxes, as provided for in Section 59-7-303; (b)  Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall receive and receipt for all monies paid or to be paid to it in accordance with Section 59-7-307, constituting the net revenues derived from the operation of the improvements and facilities authorized by this article; (c)  Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall deposit all monies received or to be received, in a special account or accounts in a bank or banks which are members of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, with such provisions for security therefor as may be incorporated in any agreement or agreements entered into between any such municipality and the purchaser or purchasers of any such bonds or other obligations; (d)  Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall use and apply all such monies so received to the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this article, as the same become due, and shall use and apply any surplus remaining after such payment or payments for the prior redemption, with or without premium, of bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this article, or in accordance with the provisions of any agreement or agreements as may be made between any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article and the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds or other obligations; (e)  Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall have and be vested with all rights, powers and duties, in addition to the foregoing, as may be provided for in any agreement or agreements between any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article and the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds, or other obligations; (f)  Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall by an instrument in writing, accept such trust and shall file such written acceptance of such trust with the clerk of the municipality so appointing such trustee; (g)  If such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall fail, neglect or refuse to perform any of the duties herein imposed or that may be imposed by reason of any of the provisions of any agreement or agreements as aforesaid, such trustee, or any successor thereto, shall, on the written request of twenty per centum or more in aggregate principal amount of the holder or holders of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article, be removed, by resolution duly adopted by the municipality by which such trustee, or any successor thereto, was appointed; and in such event, it shall be the duty of any such trustee so removed to effectuate a valid transfer of all monies then in the possession or under the control of such trustee so removed to a duly appointed successor, and a failure on the part of such trustee so removed to do so shall constitute an embezzlement of such monies and shall be punishable accordingly; (h)  In the event any such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall be removed as hereinabove provided, it shall be the duty of any municipality, which shall have removed any such trustee, immediately by resolution duly adopted to appoint a trustee, as successor thereto, who is satisfactory to said holder or holders of twenty per centum or more in aggregate principal amount of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article. SECTION 83.  Section 59-7-401, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-401.  Nothing in this article shall be construed as repealing or altering any existing laws now on the statute books affecting any ports or port laws, and this article is to be considered supplementary, and any word, sentence or paragraph in this article that may be in conflict with the provisions of any other law shall not affect any such law.  The constitutionality of this article shall not affect any existing law now on the statute, nor shall the constitutionality of any law now on the statutes be questioned with this article. SECTION 84.  Section 59-7-403, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-403.  An ad valorem tax of one mill on each one dollar of the total assessed valuation of all the taxable property in each county or counties in the State of Mississippi, in which there is located a port or harbor where there is maintained a channel to a depth of not less than eight feet, is hereby levied on all taxable property, in or for each year in which the principal of or interest on any bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this article becomes due. The receipts from said one mill tax shall be withheld by the tax collector of said county, and/or by any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for the collection of said taxes, from receipts from state ad valorem taxes now in effect or which may be hereafter levied, so long as said state ad valorem taxes shall be not less than the said one mill tax herein levied.  However, if no state ad valorem taxes equal to or greater than the said one mill tax herein levied is now or shall be hereafter levied, then and in that event, the said one mill tax herein levied shall continue to be levied and collected as herein provided in each such county or counties in or for each year in which the principal of or interest on any bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this article becomes due.  The said tax collector, and/or any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for the collection of said taxes, shall pay over all moneys collected or to be collected as receipts from the one mill tax to any trustee or successor thereto established as hereinafter provided in Section 59-7-429, and in the event that there is no such trustee, then said tax collector, and/or any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for collection of said taxes, shall pay over all such moneys into the county depository of each such county to the credit of a fund which shall be known as a port fund.  Any such moneys so paid into the county depository of each such county to the credit of said port fund may be expended at the direction of the port commission, appointed for any port or harbor through which commerce flows and having not less than eight industries engaged in the seafood industry.  The provisions of this article shall be deemed to be a contract with the holders of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article. SECTION 85.  Section 59-7-407, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-407.  A port commission created under this article shall consist of six (6) members who shall be qualified electors of the municipality operating under this article, and shall be appointed as follows:  two (2) shall be appointed by the Governor, two (2) shall be appointed by the governing authorities of the municipality, and two (2) shall be appointed by the board of supervisors of the county.  The commission shall have jurisdiction over the port, terminals, harbors and passes leading thereto, and all vessels, boats and wharves, common carriers and public utilities using the port.  Commissioners shall be paid the uniform per diem compensation authorized in Section 25-3-69 for the discharge of official duties at meetings called in accordance with Section 59-7-409. In the first instance, the two (2) commissioners appointed by the Governor shall be appointed for terms of five (5) and four (4) years, respectively, from the date of appointment; one (1) member appointed by the board of supervisors shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years from the date of appointment, and the members appointed by the governing authorities of the municipality shall be appointed for terms of two (2) and one (1) years, respectively, from the date of appointment.  The additional member appointed by the board of supervisors shall be appointed to a term of five (5) years.  After the first appointments, thereafter each member appointed shall be appointed for a term of five (5) years. The commission shall, upon appointment, organize as provided in Section 59-7-409. A port commission created under this article may be dissolved by the governing authorities of the municipality as provided under Section 59-7-408. SECTION 86.  Section 59-7-408, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-408.  (1)  The governing authorities of a municipality may dissolve a port commission created under this article by adopting a resolution in which they determine that the dissolution of the port commission is in the best interest of the citizens of the municipality and authorizing the municipality to assume the powers and duties of the port commission. (2)  After the adoption of the dissolution resolution, the port commission shall enter into an agreement with the municipality which shall provide for: (a)  the transfer of all powers, duties, and responsibilities of the port commission to the municipality; (b)  the transfer of all property and assets, real and personal, of the port commission to the municipality; (c)  the assignment of all contracts, leases, agreements and revenue generated by the port commission to the municipality; (d)  the assumption by the municipality of all just claims and obligations of the port commission associated with the operation and maintenance of the port facilities; and (e)  any other provisions necessary for the implementation of the dissolution. (3)  All tax levies and assessments used for existing bonded indebtedness shall continue until such indebtedness is paid. SECTION 87.  Section 59-7-409, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-409.  The port commission established by Section 59-7-407 shall meet at a regular place to be designated by the port commission for organization as a port commission, after giving at least ten (10) days' notice of the time and place of the meeting by publication in a newspaper published in the city, and they shall elect a president and secretary who shall be members of the commission.  The president shall be elected annually and shall vote only in cases of a tie vote. SECTION 88.  Section 59-7-411, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-411.  It shall be the duty of the commission to keep a minute book in which shall be recorded all of their acts, orders, rules and regulations.  It shall be the duty of said commission to adopt rules and regulations not inconsistent with law to govern their official acts.  It shall be the duty of said commission to make and publish all needful rules and regulations to govern the harbor, docks, and passes within its jurisdiction, and to fix tariffs, fees, fines, penalties and forfeitures for the violations of the rules and regulations of said commission, and said commission shall have the power to fix and determine all port and terminal charges, and it may enforce the collection thereof through any court of competent jurisdiction in this state.  This section shall not apply to public utilities nor to railroad terminal charges covered by or carried in approved tariffs authorized by Interstate Commerce Commission nor to lawful railroad operation and activities. It shall be the duty of said commission to employ such help, including a port director, secretary, and such other help as will be necessary to carry on the business and work of such commission, and it will be the duty of said port commissioners to see that all port employees, such as harbormaster, pilots, and any and all other necessary employees for the operation of said port, perform any and all such duties as required for the operation of said port, at salaries to be determined by said port commission. SECTION 89.  Section 59-7-413, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-413.  All improvements and facilities constructed pursuant to this article shall be maintained and operated under the control of the port commission as provided by this article. The port commission shall, subject to and in accordance with any agreement or agreements as may be made by any such municipality with the purchaser or purchasers of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article, prescribe, levy and collect all rents, fees, tolls, revenues and/or other charges in connection with the use and occupancy of the aforesaid improvements and facilities, and shall pay over all net revenues derived from the operation of said improvements and facilities to any trustee, or successor thereto, established as hereinafter provided in Section 59-7-429.  The net revenues shall be deemed to be such as may be defined in any agreement or agreements entered into between any such municipality and the purchaser or purchasers of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article.  The port commission shall make an annual report to the Governor of the State of Mississippi, to the municipality having such port or harbor, and to the State Legislature. SECTION 90.  Section 59-7-415, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-415.  Any municipality, in which there is situated and located in whole or in part a port or harbor through which commerce flows and having not less than eight industries engaged in the seafood industry as aforesaid, is hereby given authority, upon the adoption of a resolution to such effect, to issue bonds or other obligations for any or all of the purposes as provided in this article.  The books of account and other sources of information pertaining to duties under the provisions of this article, or any port commission, municipality and/or county affected by this article, shall be and remain at all times open to inspection and subject to audit by the holder or holders of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article. SECTION 91.  Section 59-7-417, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-417.  The power to issue bonds or other obligations authorized by Section 59-7-415 shall be vested in, and may be exercised from time to time by the governing body of any such municipality described in said section.  Such bonds or other obligations shall be authorized by resolution of the governing body of any such municipality and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, not exceeding twenty (20) years from their respective dates, be in such denomination, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such a manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of prior redemption, with or without premium, as such resolution or resolutions may provide.  Such bonds shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-103.  No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest; each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid; all bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity; all interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year. No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted.  The lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than seventy percent (70%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue.  The interest rate of any one (1) interest coupon shall not exceed the maximum interest rate on such bonds. Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%).  Such bonds shall be executed by the manual or facsimile signature of the mayor and clerk of such municipality, with the seal of the municipality affixed thereto.  At least one (1) signature on each bond shall be a manual signature, as specified in the resolution.  The coupons may bear only the facsimile signatures of such mayor and clerk. Such bonds or other obligations may be sold at public or private sale for such price or prices as the governing body of such municipality shall determine, but in no case to exceed the rate of interest hereinbefore provided.  No bonds shall be issued and sold under the provisions of this article for less than par and accrued interest. Such bonds or other obligations may be issued by any municipality described in Section 59-7-415 in a principal amount not exceeding Seven Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($7,500,000.00) outstanding at any one time for any purpose or purposes authorized by Section 59-7-405.  Such municipality shall have power, out of any funds available, to purchase any bonds or other obligations issued by it pursuant to this article, and all bonds or other obligations so purchased shall be cancelled, and no bonds or other obligations shall be issued in lieu thereof.  In anticipation of the issuance of the definitive bonds authorized by this article, any such municipality may issue interim certificates.  Such interim certificates shall be in such form, contain such terms, conditions or provisions, bear such date or dates, and evidence such agreement or agreements, relating to their discharge by payment or by the delivery of the definitive bonds, as such municipality, by resolution of its governing body, may determine.  Any bonds, interim certificates or other obligations issued pursuant to this article shall be fully negotiable within the meaning and for all the purposes of the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code, and may be validated as provided by statute. SECTION 92.  Section 59-7-419, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-419.  The proceeds from the sale of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article shall be placed to the credit of such municipality in a bank or banks, which are members of the federal deposit insurance corporation and may be withdrawn therefrom in accordance with any agreement or agreements entered into between such municipality and the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds or other obligations and shall be used for no other purpose than the purpose of such municipality.  Any officer or other person diverting or assisting to divert any such funds to any other purpose or purposes than the purpose or purposes originally set forth in said resolution of the governing body of said municipality shall be guilty of a felony and punishable accordingly, and shall be liable both personally and on official bonds for such diversion. Nothing in this article shall be construed as a guarantee on the part of the State of Mississippi to pay the principal or interest on any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article. SECTION 93.  Section 59-7-421, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-421.  Any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article by resolution or resolutions duly adopted, is hereby given authority to execute and deliver a mortgage or deed of trust, in such form, with such validity and with such remedies as at present authorized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, on any or all properties, improvements and facilities, the acquisition, construction, maintenance and/or operation of which are provided for by this article. Such resolution or resolutions of said municipality shall prescribe the provisions, covenants and conditions of any such mortgage or deed of trust. Such provisions, covenants and conditions, if not self-executing, may be enforced by appropriate proceedings, either in law or in equity. SECTION 94.  Section 59-7-423, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-423.  The bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality of the State of Mississippi pursuant to this article shall not constitute a debt within the meaning of any statutory limitation as to the amount of debt which may be incurred by any such municipality, nor shall such bonds or other obligations be payable out of any funds other than the revenue collected or collectible from the use of said docks, harbors and facilities of whatsoever nature, and out of the receipts the said one mill ad valorem tax, in accordance with the provisions of Section 59-7-403. SECTION 95.  Section 59-7-425, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-425.  Bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article and any interest thereon or income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation, except gift, transfer and inheritance taxes, in so far as may be within the power of the State of Mississippi so to provide. SECTION 96.  Section 59-7-427, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-427.  In connection with the issuance of bonds or other obligations by any municipality pursuant to this article, or in order to secure the payment of said bonds or other obligations, such municipality shall have power: (a)  To accept grants from the United States of America, the president of the United States, the federal emergency administrator of public works, or such other agencies, instrumentalities or corporations as may be designated or created to make grants or loans (hereinafter termed "federal agency") pursuant to the national industry recovery act and any further act of the congress of the United States providing for the construction of useful public works (hereinafter termed "national industrial recovery act"), for or in aid of work, development or improvement authorized by this article. (b)  To make such contracts and execute such instruments containing such provisions, covenants and conditions as in the discretion of the authorities of any such municipalities may be necessary, proper or advisable for the purpose of obtaining or securing grants, loans, or other financial assistance from any federal agency pursuant to the national industrial recovery act; to make such further, different or additional contracts and execute all instruments necessary or convenient in or for the furtherance of any work, development or improvement, including but not limited to all property, real and personal, appurtenant thereto or connected therewith and the existing work, development or improvement, if any, to which the work, development or improvement authorized by this article is an extension, addition, betterment or embellishment (hereinafter termed "work, development or improvement") to carry out and perform the terms and conditions of any such contract or instrument. (c)  To pledge all or any part of the fees, rents, tolls, revenues or other charges received or receivable by such municipality and/or port commission from any work, development or improvement to which its right then exists or the right to which may thereafter come into existence. (d)  To covenant against the pledging of all or any part of the fees, rents, tolls, revenues or other charges received or receivable by such municipality and/or port commission from any work, development or improvement to which its right then exists or the right to which may thereafter come into existence. (e)  To covenant against the encumbering of all or any part of any work, development or improvement or against permitting or suffering any lien thereon. (f)  To covenant as to what other or additional debt may be incurred by such municipality. (g)  To provide for the preparation, specifications, terms, form, registration, extension, execution and authentication of any bonds or other obligations, issued pursuant to this article. (h)  To provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article. (i)  To covenant as to the fees, rents, revenues or tolls to be charged, the amount to be raised each year or other period of time and as to the use and disbursement to be made thereof. (j)  To covenant to set aside or to pay over reserves and sinking funds and as to the disposal thereof. (k)  To redeem prior to maturity, with or without premium, bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article and to covenant for their prior redemption and to provide the terms and conditions thereof. (l)  To covenant against extending the time for the payment of the interest on or principal of the bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article directly or indirectly by any means or in any manner. (m)  To covenant as to books of account of such municipality and as to the inspection and audit thereof and as to the accounting methods. (n)  To covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach by such municipality of any covenant, condition or obligation assumed pursuant to this article. (o)  To make such covenants and do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary, convenient or desirable in order to secure any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article, or in the absolute discretion of the authorities of such municipality in order to make such bonds or other obligations more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts, or things may not be enumerated herein or expressly authorized herein; it being the intention hereby to give the authorities of any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article the power to do all things in the issuance of said bonds or other obligations and for their execution that may not be inconsistent with the constitution of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 97.  Section 59-7-429, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-429.  Any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article shall, so long as any such bonds or other obligations remain outstanding and unpaid, by resolution or resolutions duly adopted, authorize and appoint a trustee, satisfactory to the purchaser or purchasers of any bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article, or any successor thereto, with the following powers and duties: (a)  Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall receive and receipt for all moneys collected or to be collected as receipts from the aforesaid two-mill tax by the aforesaid tax collector, and/or any other tax collecting agency authorized by law for the collection of said taxes, as provided for in Section 59-7-403; (b)  Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall receive and receipt for all moneys paid or to be paid to it in accordance with Section 59-7-407, constituting the net revenues derived from the operation of the improvements and facilities authorized by this article; (c)  Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall deposit all moneys received or to be received, in a special account or accounts in a bank or banks which are members of the federal deposit insurance corporation, with such provisions for security therefor as may be incorporated in any agreement or agreements entered into between any such municipality and the purchaser or purchasers of any such bonds or other obligations; (d)  Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall use and apply all such moneys so received to the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this article, as the same becomes due, and shall use and apply any surplus remaining after such payment or payments for the prior redemption, with or without premium, of bonds or other obligations issued by any municipality pursuant to this article, or in accordance with the provisions of any agreement or agreements as may be made between any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article and the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds or other obligations; (e)  Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall have and be vested with all rights, powers and duties, in addition to the foregoing, as may be provided for in any agreement or agreements between any municipality issuing bonds or other obligations pursuant to this article and the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds or other obligations; (f)  Such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall by an instrument in writing, accept such trust and shall file such written acceptance of such trust with the clerk of the municipality so appointing such trustee; (g)  If such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall fail, neglect or refuse to perform any of the duties herein imposed or that may be imposed by reason of any of the provisions of any agreement or agreements as aforesaid, such trustee, or any successor thereto, shall, on the written request of twenty per centum or more in aggregate principal amount of the holder or holders of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article, be removed, by resolution duly adopted by the municipality by which such trustee, or any successor thereto, was appointed; and in such event, it shall be the duty of any such trustee so removed to effectuate a valid transfer of all moneys then in the possession or under the control of such trustee so removed to a duly appointed successor, and a failure on the part of such trustee so removed to do so shall constitute an embezzlement of such moneys and shall be punishable accordingly; (h)  In the event any such trustee so appointed, or any successor thereto, shall be removed as hereinabove provided, it shall be the duty of any municipality which shall have removed any such trustee, immediately by resolution duly adopted to appoint a trustee as successor thereto, who is satisfactory to said holder or holders of twenty per centum or more in aggregate principal amount of bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this article. SECTION 98.  Section 59-7-451, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-451.  Any county in the State of Mississippi bordering on the Mississippi River which has not heretofore created a county port authority or county port commission is hereby authorized, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of such county, as evidenced by a resolution adopted by such board of supervisors, to create a county port commission. SECTION 99.  Section 59-7-453, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-453.  Such county port commission shall consist of seven (7) members to be appointed by the board of supervisors, one (1) of whom shall represent each of the supervisors districts of the county and shall be a resident of such supervisors district, and two (2) members shall be appointed from the county at large and be residents of the county.  The two (2) at-large members shall be designated as post 1 and post 2.  The initial terms of office of the members representing the supervisors districts shall expire as follows:  District 1, July 1, 1974; District 2, July 1, 1975; District 3, July 1, 1976; District 4, July 1, 1977; District 5, July 1, 1978.  The at-large members terms shall expire as follows: post 1 shall expire July 1, 1979, and post 2 shall expire July 1, 1981.  All succeeding terms shall be for terms of five (5) years.  Any vacancy occurring therein shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment of the board of supervisors.  Where such port commission has been established or may be established as herein provided, the said port commission shall undertake and perform the duties assigned to it by the board of supervisors, and said commission shall manage and control all port facilities which may be authorized and constructed by virtue of the terms and provisions of Sections 59-7-101 through 59-7-131, 59-7-201 through 59-7-213, and 59-7-501 through 59-7-519, and all appurtenant and physical properties connected therewith, both real and personal, and shall provide for the regular inspection, repair, maintenance and improvement of said port facilities as provided therein. In addition to the authority granted herein, and notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the commission may, subject to the approval of the board of supervisors, purchase any existing railroad or railroad facilities, within or without such county, which it deems necessary for the development of its port facilities. In addition to any other authority to borrow funds for the purposes of this chapter, the board of supervisors may borrow funds from any agency of the United States government on such terms as the board determines to be in the best interest of the county. Any railroad or railroad facilities purchased under the provisions of this section may be operated by the county or others on behalf of the county, or may be leased to others by the county.  The commission may establish, charge and collect any tariffs, rates or other charges in connection therewith as may be necessary or advisable to accomplish the purposes of this section. SECTION 100.  Section 59-7-455, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-455.  The duties and authority conferred in Sections 59-7-101 through 59-7-131, through 59-7-201 through 59-7-211, 59-7-501 through 59-7-519, and Sections 27-39-3 through 27-39-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall apply to any county coming within the provisions of this article commencing on the date of the adoption of the aforesaid resolution by the board of supervisors of said county; provided, however, that the members of such port commission shall be appointed by the method and for the terms as herein provided.  In addition to the authority granted herein, the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, expend funds from any available source, including the county general fund and federal revenue sharing funds, to carry out the purposes of this article. SECTION 101.  Section 59-7-501, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-501.  The board of supervisors of any county which has elected or hereafter may elect to establish a port commission under the provisions of Article 3 of this chapter, and which desires to improve its port and harbor facilities by the construction, maintenance and operation of any revenue-producing port and/or harbor facility or facilities may issue revenue bonds of such county to provide funds for such purpose. SECTION 102.  Section 59-7-503, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-503.  Revenue bonds authorized by Section 59-7-501 may be issued without an election thereon upon the adoption of a resolution by the board of supervisors of such county upon the request and recommendation of the port commission of such county. Such revenue bonds shall not be subject to any limitation as to amount and shall not be included in computing the statutory limitation of indebtedness of such county under any present or future law.  Such bonds shall bear date or dates, shall be of such denomination or denominations, shall be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature at such time or times and upon such terms and may be made redeemable prior to maturity with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges and shall be in substantially such form as shall be determined by resolution of the board of supervisors of such county.  Such bonds shall mature in annual installments beginning not more than five (5) years from the date thereof and extending not more than twenty-five (25) years from the date thereof.  Such bonds shall be signed by the president of the board of supervisors of such county and the official seal of the county shall be affixed thereto, attested by the clerk of the board of supervisors of such county.  The interest coupons to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of such officers. Whenever such bonds shall have been signed by the officials designated to sign the same who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers prior to the date of the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until the delivery of the same to the purchaser or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear. SECTION 103.  Section 59-7-505, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-505.  All bonds shall bear interest at such rate or rates as may be determined by resolution of the board of supervisors of the county issuing them, not to exceed an overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-103, Mississippi Code of 1972.  No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest; each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid; all bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity; all interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year. No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted; the lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than sixty percent (60%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue.  The interest rate of any one (1) interest coupon shall not exceed the maximum interest rate allowed on such bonds. Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%), and a zero rate of interest cannot be named. SECTION 104.  Section 59-7-507, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-507.  All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of this article shall have and hereby are declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the Uniform Commercial Code of the State of Mississippi. Such bonds and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation within the State of Mississippi. SECTION 105.  Section 59-7-509, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-509.  The board of supervisors of any county issuing bonds under the provisions of this article shall sell such bonds on sealed bids at not less than par plus accrued interest to date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, and in the manner provided in Section 31-19-25, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 106.  Section 59-7-511, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-511.  The proceeds of the revenue bonds shall be paid into a special fund designated as the "special project port improvement fund" in a bank or banks qualified as depositories for the county issuing bonds under the provisions of this article, and such proceeds shall be used solely for the purposes for which such bonds were issued, except as hereinafter provided, and shall be disbursed upon order of the board of supervisors of such county with such restrictions, if any, as the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds may provide.  If the proceeds of such bonds, by error of calculation or otherwise, shall be less than the cost of the project for which such bonds were issued, and the redeeming of any outstanding bonds, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit which, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same funds without preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same purpose.  If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the amount required for the project for which the bonds were issued, such surplus shall be paid into the fund established for the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds. SECTION 107.  Section 59-7-513, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-513.  The revenue bonds authorized to be issued by the provisions of this article may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those specified or required by this article.  In the discretion of the board of supervisors of such county the bonds authorized and issued hereunder may be submitted to validation in the chancery court of such county in the manner and with the force and effect now or hereafter provided by Sections 31-13-1 through 31-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds. SECTION 108.  Section 59-7-515, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-515.  The revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this article shall be payable, both principal and interest, solely out of the revenues to accrue from the operation of the facilities provided through the special project for which such bonds are issued, and the full faith and credit of the county shall not be pledged therefor, nor shall any ad valorem tax be levied for the payment of such bonds or the interest thereon, and such facts shall be recited on the face of the bonds. SECTION 109.  Section 59-7-517, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-517.  Any county issuing revenue bonds under the provisions of this article is hereby authorized by contract or otherwise to provide for the operation and maintenance of facilities provided through the special project for which such bonds are issued and to establish the rates, fees and charges to be paid by users of such port and/or harbor facilities and shall provide for a revision of such rates, fees and charges from time to time as may be necessary to assure the sufficiency of funds to meet the covenants and pledges made in the resolution pursuant to which such bonds were issued. SECTION 110.  Section 59-7-519, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-7-519.  All revenues of every kind and character derived from the operation of the facilities of any special project authorized by the provisions of this article shall be paid into the port fund of such county and into a special account in said fund to be designated as the "special project revenue fund" and the resolution of the board of supervisors directing the issuance of such bonds shall require that such revenues shall be allocated to and shall be pledged for the following purposes: (a)  An operation and maintenance fund out of which there shall be paid the usual and necessary expenses for the operation and maintenance of the project facilities; (b)  A renewal and replacement fund sufficient to assure that the project facilities, including equipment, shall be kept in good repair and working order; (c)  A bond and interest fund which shall be sufficient to provide for the payment of the principal of and the interest on the bonds as they mature and accrue, including a reasonable sum for the creation of a bond reserve fund to assure the payment of such bonds and the interest therein in the event that sufficient funds therefor are not otherwise available; and (d)  A contingent fund to provide for unforeseen contingencies arising in the operation of the project facilities. Any surplus funds remaining after making the foregoing allocations shall be dealt with as may be directed by the resolution of the board of supervisors whereunder such bonds are issued, for the repayment of advances received from any source, for the payment of any maturities of principal and interest of such bonds, for the improvement of the port and/or harbor facilities for which such bonds were issued, or for the retirement of the outstanding bonds according to their terms. SECTION 111.  Section 65-33-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-1.  When any public road, street or highway shall extend along the beach or shore of any body of tidewater, and such road, street, or highway, or any part thereof shall be exposed or subject to, or in danger of, damage by water driven against the shore by storms, the boards of supervisors shall have the power, and it is hereby made their duty, to erect and maintain all necessary seawalls, breakwaters, bulkheads, shore stabilization structures, causeways, bridges, breakwaters, or other necessary structures or improvements connecting the beach or shore of any such bodies of water with islands or other land areas located offshore or connecting therewith, pumped-in sand or earth fills, sloping beaches, topping, road surfacing, road protection pavements, aprons, or other necessary devices to protect and preserve such roads, streets, and highways, or to increase the strength or stability of any existing road protection structures by hard surface aprons or other road protection devices or structures, and for that purpose and for the purpose of constructing or improving such highway, may issue the bonds of the county therefor. SECTION 112.  Section 65-33-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-3.  The words "sea wall," as used in this chapter, shall be held to include filling behind the sea wall, culverts, sluiceways, flood gates, and any other construction work found necessary for the protection of the water front from storms, caving banks, overflow, and other like dangers. The terms "roads, streets, avenues, and highways" as herein used shall include all such roads, streets, avenues, and highways as may form any part of any highway extending along such body of water through or across such county, or any other existing or contemplated public road, street, avenue, or highway connected therewith, extending to or along the side of a harbor or to a boat landing or dock, which, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of such county, is in need of the protection provided in this chapter, whether the same is under the jurisdiction of the national government, the state, the county, or of any municipality. SECTION 113.  Section 65-33-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-5.  Prior to the issuance of any bonds hereunder, and precedent to the inauguration of this program, the following steps shall be taken: (a)  Any such board of supervisors is authorized to employ competent engineers or technical assistants to make necessary preliminary plans and specifications and estimates of cost of the construction of any causeways or bridges or other structures in connection with any proposed project or projects which the board may deem necessary and proper.  After said preliminary plans, specifications and estimates of cost have been approved by said board, the same shall be filed in the office of the chancery clerk of such county; (b)  Such board of supervisors shall obtain approval by the proper United States governmental authorities of the building of the proposed project, or projects, with regard to questions of navigation. SECTION 114.  Section 65-33-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-7.  Such bonds shall be in the denomination of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) each and shall mature annually, with all maturities not longer than twenty-five (25) years, with not less than one-fiftieth (1/50) of the total issue to mature each year during the first five (5) years of the life of such bonds, not less than one-twenty-fifth (1/25) of the total issue to mature each year during the succeeding ten-year period of the life of such bonds, and the remainder to be divided into approximately equal annual payments, one (1) payment to mature each year for the remaining life of such bonds.  Such bonds shall not bear a greater rate of interest than the maximum amount specified in Section 75-17-103 per annum, and the denomination, form, and place or places of payment of such bonds shall be fixed in the resolution or order of the board of supervisors issuing such bonds.  Such bonds shall be signed by the president of the board of supervisors and countersigned by the clerk thereof, with the official seal of the county affixed thereto, but the coupons may bear only the facsimile signatures of such president and clerk.  No bonds shall be issued and sold under the provisions of Sections 65-33-1 through 65-33-15 for less than par and accrued interest, and not more than one (1) series of interest coupons shall be attached to any bonds issued under the provisions of said sections; but all interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.  Such bonds shall be payable at such place or places as may be designated therein by said board, shall be fully negotiable, and shall be sold pursuant to advertised public sale at not less than par and accrued interest.  Such bonds shall not be subject to other restrictions, limitations or provisions of the general laws governing the issuance and sale of bonds by the board of supervisors, and the board of supervisors may sell said bonds at any time within three (3) years after the sale has been approved in an election held for that purpose herein required, or three (3) years after the successful termination of any litigation affecting the same, or three (3) years after the acquisition of all lands in the areas to be developed as hereinafter provided, but not later; however, in no event shall the amount borrowed by any such county after May 4, 1954, exceed the amount of Twelve Million Dollars ($12,000,000.00) under the provisions of this section. Before any bonds shall be issued under the cited sections, the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution reciting its intention to issue such bonds and stating the amount of bonds proposed to be issued, and shall give notice of election, to be published once each week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper published in such county, in accordance with the provisions of Section 19-9-13, except that such election shall be mandatory. Such election shall be held, as far as practicable, in the same manner as other elections are held in counties.  At such election, all qualified electors of such county may vote, and the ballots used at such election shall have printed thereon a brief statement of the amount and purpose of the proposed bond issue and the words "For the Bond Issue" and "Against the Bond Issue," and the voter shall vote by placing a cross (X) or check mark (V) opposite his choice on the proposition. When the results of the election on the question of the issuance of such bonds shall have been canvassed by the election commissioners of such county and certified by them to the board of supervisors of such county, it shall be the duty of such board of supervisors to determine and adjudicate whether or not three-fifths (3/5) of the qualified electors who voted in such election voted in favor of the issuance of such bonds; and, unless three-fifths (3/5) of the qualified electors who voted in such election shall have voted in favor of the issuance of such bonds, then such bonds shall not be issued. SECTION 115.  Section 65-33-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-9.  In addition to the bonds authorized under Section 65-33-7, said board shall have the authority, and it is hereby authorized, to issue and sell callable mortgage and revenue bonds in an amount not exceeding four million dollars ($4,000,000.00) to provide additional funds, if found by the board to be necessary for the purposes of Sections 65-33-1 through 65-33-15, which mortgage and revenue bonds shall be secured by a mortgage indenture on any land acquired by the board under the authority of said sections and, in the discretion of the board, by tolls to be fixed and collected by the board for the use of any such bridge or bridges, causeway or causeways, or other structure, and by any other revenue derived from any source under said sections. Such bonds shall be in the denomination of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) each, all shall mature within twenty-five years from the date of issuance, with such dates of maturity not to exceed twenty-five years as may be fixed in the resolution authorizing their issuance, shall bear interest not to exceed six per cent (6%) per annum to accrue and be payable semiannually, and shall be executed and sold in the manner authorized for the execution and sale of bonds, as provided in Section 65-33-7. To secure the payment of such mortgage and revenue bonds and to fix the rights of the holders thereof, said board may execute a trust indenture constituting a mortgage lien upon any of the lands acquired under the provisions of Sections 65-33-1 through 65-33-15, and which indenture may, in the discretion of the board, pledge and assign any revenues and tolls which the board may fix and collect for the use of any bridge or bridges, causeway or causeways, or other structure financed under the provisions of said sections.  Said indenture shall contain such provisions and conditions as the board may find necessary or proper, shall include provisions for insurance of such bridges or causeways against such hazards as the board may deem proper and necessary, and shall fix the terms and conditions for calling said mortgage and revenue bonds for prepayment before their maturities. SECTION 116.  Section 65-33-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-11. In event any such bonds be authorized by said election for the purpose of building or constructing any causeway or bridge to any island or islands, then and in that event, and before any of said bonds shall be sold or delivered, the said board shall take necessary steps to acquire title to all of the land on such island or islands, susceptible of private ownership, not belonging to the United States government or the State of Mississippi (exclusive of any historic fort or fortress belonging to a patriotic association with not exceeding five acres of land surrounding the same); or for binding option or other enforceable legal right to acquire the same at a price satisfactory to the said board. However, no land shall be purchased from any private owner who has acquired title to said land during the 12 last months at a price in excess of the cost to the person acquiring same except by condemnation in a court at law. After the bond election has carried and after options have been obtained and other provisions enforceable at law satisfactory to said board of supervisors have been made for the acquisition of the land as hereinabove provided, it shall be the duty of the board of supervisors to employ a suitable engineer or engineers to make final plans, specifications, and estimates of cost of construction of the additional and supplementary protection for public roads and highways and the building and construction of any causeways, bridges, or other projects authorized by Sections 65-33-1 through 65-33-15.  Upon adoption of such plans and specifications and approval thereof by such board, or upon such adoption and approval of any revision thereof which may be made from time to time, said board of supervisors may proceed to sell and deliver said bonds, or so much thereof as may be necessary, and proceed to enter into necessary contracts to the lowest and best bidder, after advertising therefor in the manner by statute provided, and do all other things necessary toward the accomplishment of the work contemplated by such plans and specifications and to acquire in the name of such county such property or rights in property as may be necessary for the construction and execution of such plans and specifications and in compliance with the provisions of said sections relative to the acquisition of title to land on any island or islands.  Said board of supervisors shall have the right to acquire by purchase, gift, or eminent domain any land or lands deemed necessary for roads, roadways, parks, recreation projects, seashore parks, or other public grounds approved by such board; no lands so acquired by eminent domain by said board for such public purposes shall be sold.  Other lands on such island or islands so acquired by such board may be subdivided into lots, blocks, and building sites and sold, either at public auction, or prices may be placed upon individual lots and placed on sale to the public at such prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by said board. SECTION 117.  Section 65-33-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-13.  It shall be the duty of such board to exercise a continuing supervision over all public lands, works, and road protection.  All bonds issued under the provisions of Section 65-33-7 and all obligations and expenses necessarily incurred in connection there with shall be paid out of the funds made available for road protection purposes under this chapter. Any attorneys' fees paid in connection with or in consideration of the issuance of any bonds under the terms of Sections 65-33-1 through 65-33-15, shall not exceed one half of one per cent of (½ of 1%) the total amount of each bond issue. The cost of the maintenance of any such causeway or causeways, bridge or bridges, road and roads shall be defrayed out of funds provided under Section 65-33-47, or general county fund, or from tolls or revenues derived from any bridge or bridges, causeway or causeways, or facilities provided for herein. Said county shall insure the causeway or causeways, bridge or bridges, against such perils as the board may deem proper, such insurance to be written by an insurance company or companies authorized to do business in the State of Mississippi, and the premiums therefor shall be payable out of funds provided under this chapter. SECTION 118.  Section 65-33-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-15.  Except as herein to the contrary provided, such counties, acting by and through their respective boards of supervisors in the performance of the powers and duties hereunder granted and provided, shall have and may exercise all powers and rights, including but not limited to the right of eminent domain heretofore granted by and under this chapter. The provisions of Sections 65-33-1 through 65-33-15 are additional and supplemental to all other powers heretofore or hereafter granted to counties, and no county shall be deemed to be required to issue bonds under the provisions hereof.  Unless and until a county shall have issued bonds under the provisions hereof, such county shall not be obligated by any of the provisions of said sections, and may avail itself of any law now or hereafter enacted and which may contain other and different provisions concerning the application of the revenues herein referred to. SECTION 119.  Section 65-33-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-17.  The board of supervisors of any county in the State of Mississippi bordering on the Mississippi Sound or Gulf of Mexico, having an assessed valuation of less than five million ($5,000,000.00) dollars according to the last completed assessment, and maintaining a seawall or road protection structure under this chapter, is hereby authorized, in its discretion, and subject to complying with the provisions of Sections 65-33-17 through 65-33-21, to borrow funds not to exceed two hundred thousand ($200,000.00) dollars at a rate of interest not exceeding six (6%) per cent per annum, in addition to such sums as may have heretofore been borrowed, for the purpose of constructing, repairing and maintaining such seawall or road protection structure and/or the public roads of such county, and in its discretion, to expend such funds or any part thereof in conjunction with contributions and allotments of funds, materials or labor for the works progress administration or other governmental department for the aforesaid improvements, or any of them. SECTION 120.  Section 65-33-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-19.  The board of supervisors of any such county may, in its discretion, issue and sell the bonds of such county in an amount not exceeding Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) to provide funds for the purposes enumerated in Section 65-33-17. However, such bonds shall not be issued until notice of intention to issue and sell the same shall have been made by publishing such notice in two (2) weekly issues of some newspaper having a general circulation in the county.  If, within fifteen (15) days after the first publication of such notice twenty-five percent (25%) of the qualified electors of the county petition the board of supervisors for an election to determine whether or not such bonds shall be issued, an election shall be ordered by said board of supervisors in which all of the qualified electors of the county shall be eligible to participate.  If at such election a majority of those voting vote in favor of the issuance of such bonds the same shall be issued as provided by statute.  In event a majority of the qualified electors voting vote against the issuance of such bonds the same shall not be issued and no further effort shall be made to issue bonds under Sections 65-33-17 through 65-33-21 by such board for a period of six (6) months after such election.  If no such petition be filed with the clerk of such board of supervisors within fifteen (15) days after the first publication of such notice, the board of supervisors shall proceed forthwith to issue and sell such bonds without an election and without further notice. SECTION 121.  Section 65-33-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-21.  Bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 65-33-17 through 65-33-21 shall be full faith and credit obligations of the county for which the same are issued, shall mature so as to be paid within twenty years from their date of issuance, and shall be paid out of the funds collected under this chapter.  All bonds, notes and certificates of indebtedness heretofore issued by such county for seawall and road protection purposes maturing each year and the interest thereon however, shall be first provided for and paid out of said funds.  The bonds authorized to be issued under Sections 65-33-17 through 65-33-21 shall not be subject to other limitations, restrictions or provisions of the general laws or laws which may be enacted at the Regular 1940 Session of the Mississippi Legislature governing the borrowing of money, amounts of indebtedness, budget and election, and shall be payable, both as to principal and interest, from the same sources of revenue and taxes made available for the payment of road protection bonds under the provisions of this chapter. SECTION 122.  Section 65-33-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-23.  For the purpose of this chapter the several boards of supervisors are hereby clothed with the power and authority, and it is made their duty, to exercise the right of eminent domain in order to procure the right of way for such roads, streets, highways, sea walls, breakwaters, bulkheads, sloping beach, and such other devices as may be adopted for the protection of such highways.  They shall have the power to pass all necessary ordinances for the preservation and protection of any such road, sea wall, sloping beach, or other device constructed hereunder, and the violation of such ordinances shall constitute, and be punished as, a misdemeanor. SECTION 123.  Section 65-33-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-25.  The several boards of supervisors shall have the power and authority, for the purpose of constructing, maintaining, and repairing any such sea wall, sloping beach, or other protection, to purchase, maintain, and operate one or more dredges, together with all necessary machinery, tools, and implements for the operation thereof, to employ necessary engineers and laborers to operate the same, and to insure such sea wall, sloping beach, or other protection against loss by hurricanes, tide water, cyclone, tornado, and risks of all kinds; and the board may pay for the same out of any funds available collected and paid into the treasury by virtue of this chapter. SECTION 124.  Section 65-33-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-27.  Whenever it may be necessary to protect any highway hereunder, the board of supervisors by an order on its minutes shall so declare and shall certify the same to the governor of the state, who shall thereupon appoint five suitable freeholders of the county to constitute, and be known as, the road protection commission of such county, and who shall decide and recommend the kind and character of protection necessary, to be approved by the board of supervisors.  When such commission shall have been appointed and shall have organized, said commission shall select and employ a suitable engineer, to be approved by the board of supervisors, to make a survey, plans, specifications, and estimates of costs of construction under the direction of the said road protection commission, to be approved by the board of supervisors.  When so approved, the board of supervisors may proceed to issue bonds of the county therefor, and the road protection commission shall thereupon advertise for bids and let a contract or contracts therefor.  Such contracts shall be submitted to and approved by the board of supervisors, all contracts under this section to be executed by the board of supervisors.  The road protection commission and the board of supervisors are authorized and empowered to do all things and to make all expenditures necessary to carry out the purposes hereof. SECTION 125.  Section 65-33-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-29.  The road protection commission shall organize by the election of a chairman, and they shall serve without compensation except actual expenses, which shall be allowed by the board of supervisors and paid out of the general county fund or the road fund, as the board of supervisors may elect.  Three members shall constitute a quorum to transact business, and all meetings shall be held at the courthouse. Their tenure of office shall be four years or until the work for which bonds are issued is completed and accepted, if less than four years.  The clerk of the board of supervisors shall be ex-officio clerk of the road protection commission, shall attend all meetings, and shall preserve a record of all proceedings of said commission. SECTION 126.  Section 65-33-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-31.  Whenever it shall become necessary to construct, widen, or protect any highway under the provisions hereof, the road protection commission shall make publication for thirty (30) days in some newspaper published in the county wherein such improvements are made, setting forth the commencement and termination, with a general outline of the nature and extent thereof.  When any owner of land or other person shall claim compensation for land taken for such purpose, or for damage sustained by the construction, widening, improvement, or protection of such road or highway, he shall petition the board of supervisors in writing within thirty (30) days after the expiration of the time provided for such publication, setting forth the nature and character of the damages claimed. Thereupon the board shall, on five (5) days' notice to petitioner, go on the premises and assess the damages sustained by him.  The finding of the board shall be in writing, signed by the members agreeing to it, and must be entered on the minutes at the next meeting; but if the damages sustained and claimed be less than the cost of assessing, the board may allow the same without inquiry. SECTION 127.  Section 65-33-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-33.  All proceedings of the board of supervisors and the road protection commission in widening, improving, or protecting any such highway and assessing damages therefor may be reviewed by the circuit court in respect to any matter of law arising on the face of the proceeding.  On the question of damages, the case may be tried anew and the damages may be assessed by a jury if the owner of the land so desires. The board of supervisors shall grant appeals for that purpose when prayed for, on appellant giving bond for cost in such penalty as the board may require, not exceeding $200.00, payable to the county. SECTION 128.  Section 65-33-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-35.  All expenses incurred prior to the issuance and sale of bonds as hereinabove provided may be paid out of the general county fund or such other fund as the board of supervisors may select.  The fund out of which such expense is paid shall be reimbursed out of the proceeds of such bond issue when the bonds are issued and sold. SECTION 129.  Section 65-33-37, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-37.  The board of supervisors may agree with any municipality or sea wall district that the county be assessed for its pro rata share of the construction and maintenance of sea walls.  The assessment shall be paid each year by the county for whatever period agreed upon by the board of supervisors and the sea wall district or municipality. Where any municipality has issued bonds and constructed road protection, such as is contemplated by this chapter, which protection is, or shall become, a part of the general scheme to protect roads, streets, or highways from tidewater in said county, the board of supervisors may use the funds derived under Sections 65-33-47 and 65-33-49 for the payment and retirement of said bonds, or for such portion thereof as the board may deem equitable and just, and to refund upon an equitable and just basis to municipal property owners who have paid direct special improvement taxes to municipalities for sea wall or road protection, which sea wall or road protection is or shall become a part of the general road system of the county; and said payments may be made in yearly installments. SECTION 130.  Section 65-33-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-39.  When any county of this state has adopted or will adopt any sea wall or part of a sea wall constructed prior to October 31, 1931, by a municipality as a part of its general system as provided by Section 65-33-37, and where said county has been unable to take care of or pay the maturing bonds and interest of said municipality from the gasoline tax as provided by said section, the said county may borrow funds necessary to pay outstanding maturing bonds and interest of the municipality issued for said sea wall, or walls.  The said county may borrow said funds either upon certificates of indebtedness, notes, or bonds, as in its judgment it may see fit.  Said obligation or bonds shall not be for a period longer than ten years and at a rate of interest not exceeding six per cent. Said obligations or bonds shall not be considered as included in any limitation now fixed by law upon the indebtedness of any county, and said obligations or bonds may be issued without notice and without an election on the question of the issuance of same.  The said obligation or bonds issued hereunder shall be general obligations of the county and payable out of the gasoline tax when available, as provided in the cited section, and the general sea wall road protection laws.  In the event of the failure of sufficient funds from the said gasoline tax, the county shall levy a special tax to pay said bonds.  The board of supervisors issuing bonds hereunder may provide that the first obligations or bonds mature as long as three years from the date of their issuance, but all interest shall be paid semiannually.  In the event of the failure to collect sufficient gasoline tax to pay said bonds or obligations authorized hereunder, the board of supervisors of the county are authorized to levy ad valorem taxes to pay same as other sea wall or road protection bonds. SECTION 131.  Section 65-33-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-41.  The board of supervisors of any county may, in its discretion, levy a special tax for sea wall purposes, not to exceed five mills, may issue bonds therefor, or may pay for its pro rata share out of the funds of the county. SECTION 132.  Section 65-33-43, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-43.  In all counties where the bonds of the county are or have been issued under this chapter or any previous statutes of a similar character, the boards of supervisors may levy and collect a privilege tax on each person resident in such county driving an automobile or other motor vehicle on any of the public streets or highways of the county, not exceeding two dollars.  The amount of said tax may be varied in case more than one member of a family pays such tax, the funds arising therefrom to be applied in the same manner as funds arising under Sections 65-33-45 through 65-33-49 are applied.  The boards of supervisors shall have the power, and it shall be the duty of such boards, to levy annually on all the taxable property in such counties, and to collect a special tax sufficient to cover any deficiency, if such deficiency occur, in the amount necessary to meet annually such interest and sinking fund. SECTION 133.  Section 65-33-45, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-45.  Where any county issues or has heretofore issued its bonds under this chapter or any previous statutes of a similar character for protection of any highway, there shall be paid into the treasury of such county fifty percent (50%) of any license taxes which would otherwise be paid into the State Highway Fund collected by the state in such county on motor vehicles or drivers thereof, and fifty percent (50%) of any excise taxes levied and collected in such county by the state on gasoline which would otherwise be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Highway Fund, to meet the interest and annual sinking fund on such bonds.  Such funds shall be applied toward the liquidation of the interest and sinking fund accruing annually on such bonds, the other fifty percent (50%) to go into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Highway Commission, and, if such taxes in any year should be insufficient to cover such interest and sinking fund, the deficiency therein shall be supplied out of any other such funds collected by the state in such county and allotted by law to such county for road purposes.  Nothing herein shall be construed as a guarantee on the part of the state to pay the interest or principal on any bonds issued hereunder. This section shall not apply to the tax collected from registration fees and the sale of automobile tags. Of the surplus of such funds so paid into the treasuries of Harrison and Jackson Counties, the portions thereof hereinafter designated, to the extent necessary under the limitations hereinafter stated, shall be paid by Harrison and Jackson Counties to the State Highway Commission and shall be applied by said commission on the annual payments of principal of and interest on bonds to be issued by the State Bond Commission in an amount not to exceed Seven Million Dollars ($7,000,000.00), for the construction, by the State Highway Commission, of a four-lane highway bridge across the Bay of Biloxi, to form a part of United States Highway No. 90, to the extent that two thirds of the total cost of principal and interest on such bonds shall be paid out of such surplus funds of Harrison County, and one third out of such surplus funds of Jackson County. For the purpose of this section, such "surplus funds of Harrison County" shall be construed to be the amount paid to Harrison County under this section not pledged to the payment of principal and interest of bonds issued under this chapter, or any previous statutes of a similar character for the protection of any highway, and presently outstanding.  "Surplus funds of Jackson County" shall be construed to be the amount paid to Jackson County under this section not pledged to the payment of principal and interest of bonds issued under this chapter, or any previous statutes of a similar character for the protection of any highway, and presently outstanding, and remaining after payment of principal and interest on bonds now issued or authorized by an election by Jackson County in connection with its Bayou Casotte development project under the authority of Senate Bill No. 1265, Extraordinary Session of 1954, as amended by Senate Bill No. 1624 enacted at the Regular 1958 Session of the Mississippi Legislature. Annually, to the extent necessary to meet the annual requirements for the payment of principal of and interest on said bonds, Harrison County shall pay to the State Highway Commission not exceeding two thirds of its aforesaid annual surplus, as hereinabove defined; and, to the extent necessary and available, Jackson County shall annually pay to the State Highway Commission from such surplus funds an amount not exceeding one third of the annual requirements for bonds issued by the State Bond Commission, and such amounts as may be necessary to satisfy any deficiency in preceding annual payments required to be made under the provisions hereof. Surplus funds remaining to both Harrison and Jackson Counties, after making the payments above directed, may be pledged, used, and expended in whole or part for the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds issued and to be issued under the authority of Sections 59-9-1 through 59-9-83; however, unless and until so pledged all or any part of such surplus now or hereafter accumulated may be transferred by the board of supervisors to a fund designated the county port fund and shall be subject to expenditure by the county port authority or county development commission for the purposes and objects authorized by said sections.  All expenditures made by the county port authority or county development commission shall be audited by the county auditor, who shall annually report such expenditures to the board of supervisors. SECTION 134.  Section 65-33-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-47.  Where any county issues or has heretofore issued the bonds of the county under this chapter or any previous statutes of a similar character, an excise tax of not exceeding three cents per gallon, in addition to any such tax levied and collected by the state in such counties, for the distribution of gasoline, may be collected by such counties.  Such collection shall be made at the time and in the manner provided for the collection of the gasoline tax generally and shall be remitted by the auditor of the county at the same time as is remitted the amount due to the county out of the regular gasoline tax.  The additional funds so derived shall be applied first towards any deficiency in the amount collected by the state and paid to such county which may be necessary for the liquidation of the interest accruing on, and to provide a sinking fund for the retirement of, such bonds issued by municipalities for road protection and refunds as hereinbefore provided.  Any overplus or parts thereof may be used in the construction of road protection pavements or hard surfaced aprons to any existing road protection heretofore constructed, or to increase the strength or stability of any such existing road protection, or in the construction of additional road protection, or in the repair and maintenance of existing road protection, or road protection hereafter constructed, as the board of supervisors may elect. The taxes hereinabove provided for, upon the faith of which bonds may be issued, shall be levied and collected annually in an amount estimated to be equal to the interest and sinking fund on said bonds and shall not, until said bonds with interest thereon shall have been paid, be lowered beyond that amount which is estimated to be necessary to produce annually a sum sufficient to pay interest and provide a sinking fund, requirements on such bond issue or issues, provided such tax shall not exceed such reasonable sum as may be legally levied and collected; said tax and sinking fund may be used by the board of supervisors to retire bonds issued by municipalities for road protection purposes and refunds as hereinbefore provided. Any such county may exempt from the payment of the additional tax levied on the distribution of gasoline, any and all gasoline which may be consumed by boats engaged in fishing, by boats in commerce between the states or in necessary duties as instrumentalities of the United States government, gasoline purchased for agricultural purposes or domestic purposes, as was defined by Section 12, Chapter 264, Laws of 1946.  Such exemption shall be contained in the order of such board of supervisors levying the tax on such gasoline and, when such exemption is granted in such order, then no additional tax shall be required from the person distributing gasoline direct to consumers using same in operating boats for fishing, in commerce, or as instrumentalities of the United States government.  When a distributor is entitled to the said exemption, he shall, when reporting and remitting to the auditor for the regular gasoline tax, report also in detail with respect to the distributions exempted from said additional tax in the same manner as is required in the section on exemptions and allowances in the chapter on gasoline taxes. SECTION 135.  Section 65-33-49, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-49.  In those counties operating under this chapter, the board of supervisors may borrow funds not in excess of Three Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($350,000.00) at a rate of interest not exceeding six percent. per annum, in addition to such sums as may have heretofore been borrowed, for the purpose of extending, constructing, repairing, or maintaining the road protection of the county or to protect by sea wall or road protection any street, highway, road, or avenue connected therewith extending to or along the side of a harbor or to a boat landing or dock, which, in the judgment of the board of supervisors of such county, should be so protected either for an existing or a contemplated road, street, highway, or avenue.  Such board of supervisors shall have authority to acquire by purchase or otherwise a dredge boat and use and operate the same for the purpose of pumping a sand beach adjacent to such sea wall or road protection structure, and to pay for same out of any funds provided under this section or any funds collected under Section 65-33-47.  The funds or amount borrowed for the purpose provided for in this section shall be paid within a period of ten years from the date borrowed, and shall be paid out of the funds collected under this chapter.  All bonds, notes, or certificates of indebtedness maturing each year and the interest thereon, however, shall be first provided for and paid out of said funds.  The loans authorized herein shall not be subject to other limitations, restrictions, or provisions of the general laws governing the borrowing of money, amounts of indebtedness, budget, and election; and said loans may be made by the board of supervisors of such county either by issuance of county bonds, notes, or certificates of indebtedness which shall be full faith and credit obligations of the county issuing the same and shall be payable, both as to principal and interest, from the same sources of revenue and taxes made available for the payment of road protection bonds under the provisions of this chapter.  The money herein authorized to be borrowed may be borrowed by such board of supervisors from any person, firm, corporation, governmental lending agency, or from any sinking funds of such county, provided that if the money be borrowed from any sinking fund, it shall be repaid before the sinking fund from which it is borrowed, when supplemented by funds paid into same, is needed.  Before the board of supervisors shall borrow money under this section, it shall spread on its minutes an order reciting such intention and shall thereafter publish a copy of such order, in two weekly issues of some newspaper having a general circulation in the county.  If, within fifteen days after the first publication of a copy of such order, twenty-five percent of the qualified electors of the county petition the board of supervisors for an election to determine whether or not the adoption of such order should be annulled, such election shall be ordered by such board of supervisors.  If at such election a majority of those voting vote in favor of the adoption of such order, the same shall be valid and effective; but if a majority shall vote against such order, it shall be annulled and shall be ineffective, and no further effort shall be made to borrow funds under this section by such board for a period of six months from the date of such election.  If no such petition be presented within fifteen days after the first publication of a copy of such order, such order shall be valid and effective.  The amount authorized to be borrowed under this section may be borrowed at any time and in any amount, but the total borrowed shall not exceed Three Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($350,000.00) in addition to such sums as may heretofore have been borrowed for the purposes herein enumerated, or either of them. SECTION 136.  Section 65-33-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-51.  (1)  In any county maintaining a seawall or road protection structure under the provisions of this chapter, the board of supervisors may borrow funds not in excess of One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00), at a rate of interest not exceeding four percent per annum, in addition to such sums as have heretofore been borrowed for the purpose of constructing, repairing, strengthening or maintaining the road protection structure or seawall of the county.  Such board of supervisors shall have the authority to acquire by purchase or otherwise a dredge boat and to use and operate it for the purpose of pumping a sand beach adjacent to such seawall or road protection structure or for the maintenance thereof, and to pay for same out of any funds provided under this section.  The funds or amount borrowed for the purposes provided for in this section shall be repaid within a period of fifteen years from the date borrowed, and shall be paid out of the funds collected under this chapter.  All bonds, notes, or certificates of indebtedness maturing each year and the interest thereon, however, shall be first provided for and paid out of said funds.  The loans authorized herein shall not be subject to other limitations, restrictions, or provisions of the general laws governing the borrowing of money, amounts of indebtedness, budget, and election; and said loans may be made by the board of supervisors of such county either by issuance of county bonds, notes, or certificates of indebtedness which shall be full faith and credit obligations of the county issuing same and shall be payable, both as to principal and interest, from the same sources of revenue and taxes made available for the payment of road protection bonds under the provisions of this chapter.  The money herein authorized to be borrowed by such board of supervisors may be borrowed from any person, firm, corporation, governmental lending agency, or from any sinking funds of such county; if the money be borrowed from any sinking fund, it shall be repaid before the sinking fund from which it is borrowed, when supplemented by funds paid into same, is needed. Before the board of supervisors shall borrow money under this section, it shall spread on its minutes an order reciting such intention, and shall thereafter publish a copy of such order in three weekly issues of some newspaper having a general circulation in the county.  If, within fifteen days after the first publication of a copy of such order, fifteen percent of the qualified electors of the county shall file with such board of supervisors a petition in writing requesting an election on the question of borrowing money in the amount and for the purpose as set forth in such order, then such money shall not be borrowed unless authorized by a majority of the qualified voters of such county voting in an election to be ordered by such board of supervisors for that purpose. Notice of such election shall be given and such election shall be held and conducted as provided by law in connection with elections for the submission of bond issues in such county.  If such proposition shall fail to receive such majority vote at such election, then no further proceedings for the borrowing of such money shall be had or taken within a period of six months from and after the date of such election.  If, however, no such petition shall be so filed, or if at such election such petition shall be assented to by a majority vote, then such board of supervisors shall be authorized to borrow such money in the amount and for the purpose as set forth in such order as published.  The amount authorized to be borrowed under this section may be borrowed at any time and in any amount, but the total borrowed shall not exceed One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00) in addition to such sums as may heretofore have been borrowed for the purposes herein enumerated, or either of them. (2)  The board of supervisors is hereby given full power and authority to meet and do and grant any request of the United States Beach Erosion Board of the United States Army Engineers by and under Public Law 727, 79th Congress, Chapter 960, 2nd Session, and to assure either or both the following: (a)  Assure maintenance of the seawall and drainage facilities, and of the beach by artificial replenishment, during the useful life of these works, as may be required to serve their intended purpose; (b)  Provide, at the county's own expense, all necessary land, easements, and rights of way; (c)  To hold and save the United States free from all claims for damages that may arise either before, during, or after prosecution of the work; (d)  To prevent, by ordinance, any water pollution that would endanger the health of the bathers; (e)  To assume perpetual ownership of any beach construction and its administration for public use only, and that the board of supervisors is given full power and authority to do any and all things necessary in and about the repair and reconstruction, or construction or maintenance of the seawall and sloping beach adjacent thereto; and it is given such power to cooperate with the requirements of the United States government to receive any grant or grants of money from Congress or to contribute any grant or grants to the United States Army Engineers in and about this construction and maintenance and it is further given full power and authority to employ engineers, lawyers, or any other professional or technical help in and about the completion of this project.  In the event the county engineer is selected to do any or all of said work, the board of supervisors is hereby authorized to pay and allow him such reasonable fees or salary which, in its opinion, is necessary, just, and commensurate to the work done by him. It is further given full power and authority to let, by competitive bids, any contract for the repair of said wall, or for the installation and drainage, and for the construction of any additional section of wall, together with any artificial beach adjacent to said wall; or it may, in its discretion, negotiate a contract for any and all construction or any part thereof for the construction, repair, reconstruction, or additions thereto; or it may do any or all of said work under the direction of the county engineer or engineers employed by it and for which purpose it may employ all necessary labor and equipment and purchase necessary materials. The intent and purpose of this section is to give unto the respective boards of supervisors the full power and authority to carry out all the provisions herein, and to act independently, jointly, or severally with the United States government by and under Public Law 727, 79th Congress. (3)  The provisions of this section shall not apply to any county with an assessed valuation of less than $10,000,000.00. SECTION 137.  Section 65-33-53, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-53.  (1)  In any county maintaining a seawall or road protection structure under the provisions of this chapter, the board of supervisors may borrow funds not in excess of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) in addition to the One Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,500,000.00) authorized under Section 65-33-51, at the rate of interest not exceeding four percent per annum, in addition to such sums as have heretofore been borrowed for the purpose of constructing, repairing, strengthening, or maintaining the road protection structure or seawall of the county, including the raising of the roadbed as recommended and approved by the Mississippi State Highway Commission, and to construct retaining walls for such raised roadbeds and to pump by hydraulic fill, or otherwise, a sand beach adjacent to such retaining wall or seawall structure. Such board of supervisors shall have the authority to acquire by purchase or otherwise a dredge boat and to use and operate it for the purpose of pumping a sand beach adjacent to such seawall or road protection structure or for the maintenance thereof; however, said board of supervisors shall not pay for same out of any funds provided under this section.  The funds or amount borrowed for the purposes provided in this section shall be repaid within a period of fifteen years from the date borrowed, and shall be paid out of the funds collected under this chapter.  All bonds, notes, or certificates of indebtedness maturing each year and the interest thereon, however, shall be first provided for and paid out of said funds.  The loans authorized herein shall not be subject to other limitations, restrictions, or provisions of the general laws governing the borrowing of money, amounts of indebtedness, budget, and election, and said loans may be made by the board of supervisors of such county either by issuance of county bonds, notes, or certificates of indebtedness which shall be full faith and credit obligations of the county issuing same and shall be payable, both as to principal and interest, from the same sources of revenue and taxes made available for the payment of road protection bonds under the provisions of this chapter, which sources of revenue and taxes are irrevocably pledged toward the repayment of any monies borrowed or any bonds issued under the provisions of this section.  The money herein authorized to be borrowed by such board of supervisors may be borrowed from any person, firm, corporation, governmental lending agency, or from any sinking funds of such county; if the money borrowed from any sinking fund, it shall be repaid before the sinking fund from which it is borrowed, when supplemented by funds paid into same, is needed.  Before the board of supervisors shall borrow money under this section, it shall spread on its minutes an order reciting such intention and shall thereafter publish a copy of such order in three weekly issues of some newspaper having a general circulation in the county.  If, within fifteen days after the first publication of a copy of such order, fifteen percent of the qualified electors of the county shall file with such board of supervisors a petition in writing requesting an election on the question of borrowing money in the amount and for the purpose as set forth in such order, then such money shall not be borrowed unless authorized by a majority of the qualified voters of such county voting in an election to be ordered by such board of supervisors for that purpose.  Notice of such election shall be given and such election shall be held and conducted as provided by law in connection with elections for the submission of bond issues in such county.  If such proposition shall fail to receive such majority vote at such election, then no further proceedings for the borrowing of such money shall be had or taken within a period of six months from and after the date of such election. If, however, no such petition shall be so filed, or if at such election such petition shall be assented to by a majority vote, then such board of supervisors shall be authorized to borrow such money in the amount and for the purpose as set forth in such order as published.  The amount authorized to be borrowed under this section may be borrowed at any time and in any amount, but the total borrowed shall not exceed Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) in addition to such sums as may heretofore have been borrowed for the purposes herein enumerated, or either of them, and especially in addition to any sums that may have heretofore been borrowed or in addition to any bonds that may have heretofore been issued under authority of Section 65-33-51.  Any attorneys' fees paid for the issuance of said bonds shall be paid out of the general fund of said county. (2)  The board of supervisors is hereby given full power and authority to meet and do and grant any request of the United States Beach Erosion Board of the United States Army Engineers by and under Public Law 727, 79th Congress, Chapter 960, 2nd Session, and to assure either or both the following: (a)  Assure maintenance of the seawall and drainage facilities, and of the beach by artificial replenishment, during the useful life of these works, as may be required to serve their intended purpose; (b)  Provide, at the county's own expense, all necessary land, easements, and rights of way; (c)  To hold and save the United States free from all claims for damages that may arise either before, during, or after prosecution of the work; (d)  To prevent, by ordinance, any water pollution that would endanger the health of the bathers; (e)  To assume perpetual ownership of any beach construction and its administration for public use only, and that the board of supervisors is given full power and authority to do any and all things necessary in and about the repair and reconstruction, or construction or maintenance of the seawall and sloping beach adjacent thereto, built under the authority of this section, and it is given such power to cooperate with the requirements of the United States government to receive any grant or grants of money from Congress or to contribute any grant or grants to the United States Army Engineers in and about this construction and maintenance, and it is further given full power and authority to employ engineers, lawyers, or any other professional or technical help in and about the completion of this project.  In the event the county engineer is selected to do any or all of said work, the board of supervisors is hereby authorized to pay and allow him such reasonable fees or salary which, in its opinion, is necessary, just, and commensurate to work done by him. It is further given full power and authority to let, by competitive bids, any contract for the repair of said wall, or for the installation and drainage, and for the construction of any additional section of wall, together with any artificial beach adjacent to said wall, and for the raising of any roadbeds and the construction of any such retaining wall. The intent and purpose of this section is to give unto the respective boards the full power and authority to carry out all the provisions herein, and to act independently, jointly, or severally with the United States government by and under Public Law 727, 79th Congress. (3)  The provisions of this section shall not apply to any county with an assessed valuation of less than Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00). SECTION 138.  Section 65-33-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-55.  (1)  In any county maintaining a sea wall or road protection structure under provisions of this chapter and having an assessed valuation of five million dollars or less, the board of supervisors may borrow funds not in excess of Four Hundred Thousand Dollars ($400,000.00), at a rate of interest not exceeding five per cent per annum, in addition to such sums as have heretofore been borrowed for the purpose of constructing, repairing, strengthening, or maintaining the road protection structure or sea wall of the county.  Such board of supervisors shall have the authority to own a dredge boat and to use and operate it for the purpose of pumping a sand beach adjacent to such sea wall or road protection structure or for the maintenance thereof, and to pay for same out of any funds provided under this section. The funds or amount borrowed for the purposes provided in this section shall be repaid within a period of twenty years from the date borrowed, and shall be paid out of the funds collected under this chapter.  All bonds, notes, or certificates of indebtedness maturing each year and the interest thereon, however, shall be first provided for and paid out of said funds.  The loans authorized herein shall not be subject to other limitations, restrictions, or provisions of the general laws governing the borrowing of money, amounts of indebtedness, budget, and election; and said loans may be made by the board of supervisors of such county either by issuance of county bond, notes, or certificates of indebtedness which shall be full faith and credit obligations of the county issuing same and shall be payable, both as to principal and interest, from the same sources of revenue and taxes made available for the payment of road protection bonds under the provisions of this chapter.  The money herein authorized to be borrowed by such board of supervisors may be borrowed from any person, firm, corporation, governmental lending agency, or from any sinking funds of such county; if the money be borrowed from any sinking fund, it shall be repaid before the sinking fund from which it is borrowed, when supplemented by funds paid into same, is needed. Before the board of supervisors shall borrow money under this section, it shall spread on its minutes an order reciting such intention, and shall call an election and submit the question of issuing bonds under this section to the qualified voters of such county in accordance with the present laws of issuing bonds.  If a majority of the qualified electors voting in said election vote to issue said bonds, then the board of supervisors shall proceed to issue so much or such parts of said bonds not to exceed Four Hundred Thousand Dollars ($400,000.00). (2)  The board of supervisors is given full power and authority to do any and all things necessary in its opinion to obtain funds from the United States government by and under Public Law 727, 79th Congress, Chapter 960, 2nd Session, or under any other law, and in and about the solicitation and preparation of any application; and it may do any and all things necessary in the promotion of obtaining relief under this act of congress for such county, and it is further given authority to assure the United States government, the United States beach erosion board, and the United States army engineers the following: (1)  Assure maintenance of the sea wall and drainage facilities, and of the beach by artificial replenishment, during the useful life of these works, as may be required to serve their intended purpose; (2)  Provide, at the county's own expense, all necessary land, easements, and rights of way; (3)  To hold and save the United States free from all claims for damages that may arise either before, during, or after prosecution of the work; (4)  To prevent, by ordinance, any water pollution that would endanger the health of the bathers; (5)  To assume perpetual ownership of any beach construction and its administration for public use only. The intent and purpose of this section is to give unto the respective boards of supervisors the full power and authority to carry out all of the provisions herein, and to act independently, jointly, or severally with the United States government by and under Public Law 727, 79th Congress, or other laws. SECTION 139.  Section 65-3-57, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-3-57.  (1)  That portion of the Mississippi Highway No. 13 running from the intersection of such highway with Mississippi Highway No. 16 in Leake County, Mississippi, and continuing southerly through the counties of Leake, Scott, Rankin and Simpson shall be designated and henceforth known as the William G. Walter Memorial Highway. (2) The Mississippi State Highway Department is hereby directed to erect appropriate signs along and approaching such highway. SECTION 140.  Section 65-33-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-59.  Bonds issued under the authority of Sections 65-33-57 and 65-33-59 shall be full faith and credit obligations of the county issuing the same; shall mature within fifteen years of their date of issuance in such annual maturities and denominations as the board of supervisors may direct; shall bear interest at a rate not to exceed five and one half per centum per annum, payable semiannually; may be issued without notice or an election therefor; and shall not be subject to any limitation relative to amount of bonded debt.  Such bonds and the interest thereon shall be payable both as to principal and interest from the same sources of revenue and taxes made available for the payment of road protection bonds under the provisions of this chapter.  Nothing herein contained shall be construed to affect any of the provisions of House Bill No. 287 [ch. 130] as enacted at the Regular 1938 Session of the Mississippi Legislature. SECTION 141.  Section 65-33-61, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-61.  The board of supervisors of any county operating under the provisions of this chapter is hereby authorized to refund any bonded indebtedness of such county now outstanding, payable from the sources of revenue provided by this chapter, and to issue refunding bonds of such county, which shall be secured by and payable from the same sources of revenue as the bonds refunded thereby.  The said refunding bonds may be issued by the board of supervisors of such county only after the question of the issue of said refunding bonds shall have been submitted to the qualified electors of such county at an election to be held for that purpose in said county, and only after the said issue has been authorized by a vote of three fifths of the qualified electors voting in an election to be ordered by the board of supervisors for that purpose, whenever any such board of supervisors shall find it necessary or advisable or in the best interest of such county so to do. Such refunding bonds may be issued only to redeem outstanding bonds at maturity, or on any date upon which outstanding bonds may be redeemable, or upon the voluntary surrender of outstanding bonds by the owners thereof.  Such refunding bonds may be sold for not less than par and accrued interest, or may be exchanged for bonds to be refunded thereby; however, the issue of such refunding bonds shall be accomplished in such manner as to avoid payment by the county of interest on the refunding bonds and on the bonds refunded thereby for the same period of time. SECTION 142.  Section 65-33-63, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-63.  Such refunding bonds shall bear such rate or rates of interest as may be determined by the board of supervisors, not exceeding, however, three and one-half per centum per annum, payable semiannually; shall be in such denomination or denominations and form as may be determined by the board of supervisors; shall be executed on behalf of the county by the president of the board of supervisors, countersigned by the clerk of such board; and the interest to accrue on such bonds shall be represented by coupons to be attached thereto, which may be executed by the facsimile signatures of such officers.  Such refunding bonds shall mature in such amount or amounts and at such time or times, not exceeding twenty-five years from date thereof, as may be specified by the board of supervisors.  All such refunding bonds and interest thereon shall be payable at the office of the state treasurer of the State of Mississippi in the city of Jackson, Mississippi, and a certified copy of the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such refunding bonds shall be filed in said office.  The bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 65-33-61 through 65-33-71 shall in no way be construed as state obligations or state bonds. SECTION 143.  Section 65-33-65, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-65.  The fact of the issuance and delivery of refunding bonds hereunder shall be certified by the clerk of the board of supervisors to the state Treasurer, who shall immediately register such bonds in a suitable bond register.  Thereafter, the revenues and taxes which would otherwise be paid into the county treasury of such county for the payment of road protection and seawall bonds and interest thereon under the provisions of Section 65-33-45, shall be paid by the official collecting such taxes into the state treasury on a proper receive warrant of the state auditor to the credit of such county in a special fund to be designated "interest and sinking fund for road protection and seawall bonds of ____  County, Mississippi," which fund shall be held and shall be applied by the state treasurer in the payment of interest accruing on such refunding bonds and the principal thereof at maturity, according to law. In the event that less than all of outstanding bonds payable under the provisions of this chapter shall be refunded as herein provided, then and in that event there shall be paid into the state treasury, for the credit of the aforesaid interest and sinking fund, only the proportion of the revenues and taxes as the amount of refunding bonds issued and outstanding bears to the total amount of outstanding bonds payable from the revenues herein referred to. SECTION 144.  Section 65-33-67, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-67.  The board of supervisors of any county issuing refunding bonds under the provisions of Sections 65-33-61 through 65-33-65, shall levy an annual tax of not less than five mills on each dollar of the assessed valuation of taxable property within such county for the purpose of providing funds sufficient to pay such bonds at maturity and interest thereon as it accrues.  The said tax shall be levied and collected as other county taxes are levied and collected, and the proceeds thereof shall be remitted by the county tax collector to the State Treasury at the time when state taxes are required by law to be so remitted.  The State Treasurer shall credit the amount to the interest and sinking fund referred to in Section 65-33-65.  On or before October 1st in each year, the State Treasurer shall certify to the board of supervisors of each such county the amount standing to the credit of such interest and sinking fund as of September 15th, of that year, and if such amount shall be sufficient (1) to pay all principal of and interest on such bonds then due and owing and (2) all principal of and interest on such refunding bonds maturing and accruing during the period of twelve months running from said September 15th, then and in that event such board of supervisors may reduce the aforesaid taxes or omit the same for the ensuing year, as such board may determine.  All funds paid into the State Treasury hereunder shall remain in the State Treasury for the payment of principal and interest on such refunding bonds until all the principal and interest on such refunding bonds shall have been fully paid. SECTION 145.  Section 65-33-69, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-69.  The board of supervisors shall pay all lawful fees of the chancery clerk and its attorney now prescribed by law, which fees are incidental to the execution of said refunding bonds, and may also pay all expenses in connection with the validation of said refunding bonds and procuring the opinion as to the validity thereof from some expert bond attorney, other than the state bond attorney, of national reputation. However, in cases where the bonds to be refunded are not due or redeemable prior to maturity, such board in procuring the surrender of such outstanding bonds may expend not exceeding an additional two and one-half percent (2 ½%) of the principal amount of refunding bonds actually issued and delivered, but in no event shall any part of the said two and one-half percent (2 ½%) be used in the payment of attorneys fees. All such fees and compensation shall be paid out of the interest and sinking fund applicable to the bonds to be refunded, if the amount credited to such fund be adequate therefor.  Otherwise, such fees and compensation shall be paid out of the proceeds of a special annual tax to be levied for that purpose by the board of supervisors upon all taxable property within such county.  All expenses as authorized by Sections 65-33-61 through 65-33-71 in effectuating the exchange of said bonds and the actual expense of the state treasurer in paying principal and interest on said bonds shall be paid by the board of supervisors of the county. SECTION 146.  Section 65-33-71, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 65-33-71.  The provisions of Sections 65-33-61 through 65-33-71, without reference to any other statute, shall be deemed full and complete authority for the issuance of refunding bonds as therein provided; and all powers necessary to be exercised by the board of supervisors of such counties, in order to carry out the provisions of said sections, are hereby conferred. SECTION 147.  Section 29-1-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 29-1-105.  The right to construct or use any such pipe line in, on, under, or across land which is submerged or whereover the tide may ebb and flow shall be subject to the following: (a)  The paramount right of the United States to control commerce and navigation; and (b)  The right of the public to make free use of the waters; and (c)  The restrictions and prohibitions contained in Section 81 of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890. SECTION 148.  Section 53-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 53-3-41.  (1)  For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein: (a)  "Oil and gas production" means any oil, natural gas, condensate of either, natural gas liquids, other gaseous, liquid or dissolved hydrocarbons, sulfur or helium, or other substance produced as a by-product or adjunct to their production, or any combination of these, which is severed, extracted or produced from the ground, the seabed or other submerged lands within the jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi. Any such substance, including recoverable or recovered natural gas liquids, which is transported to or in a natural gas pipeline or natural gas gathering system, or otherwise transported or sold for use as natural gas, or is transported or sold for the extraction of helium or natural gas liquids is gas production.  Any such substance which is transported or sold to persons and for purposes not included in the foregoing natural gas definition is oil production. (b)  "Interest owner" means a person owning an entire or fractional interest of any kind or nature in oil or gas production at the time of severance, or a person who has an express, implied or constructive right to receive a monetary payment determined by the value of oil or gas production or by the amount of production. (c)  "Royalty owner" means any person who possesses an interest in the production, but who is not an owner as defined in Section 53-1-3(g). (d)  "Disbursing agent" shall mean that person who, pursuant to an oil and gas lease, operating agreement, purchase contract, or otherwise, assumes the responsibility of paying royalty proceeds derived from a well's oil and gas production to the royalty owner or owners legally entitled thereto.  A first purchaser shall not be deemed to be the disbursing agent unless the first purchaser expressly assumes such responsibility in the purchase contract. (e)  "First purchaser" means the first person who purchases oil or gas production from the interest owners after the production is severed and may include the operator if the operator acts as a purchaser of production attributable to other interest owners. (f)  An "operator" is a person engaged in the business of severing oil or gas production from the ground, whether for himself alone, for other persons alone or for himself and others. (2)  Whenever a disbursing agent has not disbursed the royalty proceeds derived from the well's production to the royalty owner within one hundred twenty (120) days following the date of first sale of oil or gas in the event the disbursing agent is a first purchaser of oil or gas, or within one hundred twenty (120) days following the date the disbursing agent receives the proceeds from such production if the disbursing agent is not the first purchaser, such royalty owner shall have a lien to secure the payment of the royalty proceeds.  The lien shall attach to the proceeds from such production received by the disbursing agent attributable to the royalty owner's interest. (3)  The lien provided by this section shall be effective against a third party only from the time a financing statement evidencing such lien is filed in the same manner as financing statements evidencing security interests in minerals are filed in accordance with the provisions of Section 75-9-501. (4)  The lien provided by this section shall expire one (1) year after it becomes effective against a third party, unless judicial proceedings have been commenced to assert it or unless insolvency proceedings have been commenced by or against the disbursing agent, in which event the lien shall remain effective until termination of the insolvency proceedings or until expiration of the one-year period, whichever occurs later. (5)  Whenever there is a conflict between a lien under this section and a security interest under Title 75, Chapter 9, the lien or security interest first to be filed has priority. Liens provided for in this section shall have priorities among themselves according to priority in time of filing of such liens. (6)  The filing required by this section shall be a financing statement as provided for in Section 75-9-310 and shall be subject to the provisions of Part 5 of Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code, except that in order for the filing to be sufficient, it shall not be necessary for the debtor to sign the financing statement, and the filing shall be effective for a period of only one (1) year from the date of filing. (7)  This section does not impair an operator's right to set off or withhold funds from other interest owners as security for or in satisfaction of any debt or security interest.  This section does not impair a disbursing agent's right to withhold funds in the event a question is raised concerning the title or ownership of, or right to sell, the oil or gas production.  In case of a dispute between interest owners, a good-faith tender by the disbursing agent of funds to the person the interest owners shall agree on, or to a court of competent jurisdiction in the event of litigation or bankruptcy, shall operate as a tender of the funds to both. (8)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to enlarge or diminish the rights and obligations provided to or imposed on interest owners, royalty owners, disbursing agents, first purchasers, or operators by contract or otherwise by law.  The sole purpose of this section is to provide royalty owners a lien under the conditions provided herein. SECTION 149.  Section 53-3-75, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 53-3-75.  The right to construct, operate and maintain any facility as described in Section 53-3-71 in, on, under or across land which is submerged or wherever the tide may ebb and flow shall be subject to the following: (a)  The paramount right of the United States to control commerce and navigation; (b)  The right of the public to make free use of the waters; and (c)  The restrictions and prohibitions contained in Section 81 of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890, as same may be amended. SECTION 150.  Section 55-7-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 55-7-13.  The bridge and park commission shall have the power, among others, in the case of the municipal agency, to acquire for park, recreational, harbor development and other similar purposes, by the exercise of eminent domain or otherwise, and by gift, grant or purchase, for any purpose of this chapter, an island or islands, in whole or in part, situated in the Gulf of Mexico or in the Mississippi Sound, and lying within three leagues of the nearest point of the corporate limits of the municipality involved; and, in the case of the county agency, to acquire for park, recreational, harbor development and other similar purposes by the exercise of eminent domain or otherwise, and by gift, grant or purchase, for any purpose of this chapter, an island or islands, in whole or in part, situated in the Gulf of Mexico or in the Mississippi Sound, and lying within the boundaries of the county involved. Said commission shall have the power to acquire, by eminent domain, gift, grant or purchase, such portion or portions of such island or islands as it may find to be needed for use in developing and financing the public improvements set forth in this chapter. Prior to the acquisition of any such real estate, the commission shall, by resolution spread upon its minutes, find, determine and adjudicate that the property to be so acquired is needed to aid in the financing of the improvements under this chapter. Any such commission which has acquired an island or islands, in whole or in part, adjacent to any submerged lands belonging to the State of Mississippi may purchase from the State of Mississippi a sufficient amount of such submerged lands to be reclaimed and added to such island or islands to be used, and developed for the purposes provided in this chapter.  The state land commissioner, with the approval of the attorney general and the governor, is hereby authorized and empowered to sell and convey such submerged lands to such commission and to issue the state's patent thereto.  Said commission shall have the power to dredge, fill in and reclaim submerged lands adjacent to any such island or islands and to develop and utilize the same for any of the purposes set forth in this chapter, including the financing of the authorized public improvements.  However, no normal or natural channel shall be obstructed so as to interfere with the normal navigation therein, it being the purpose and intention of this chapter to authorize the use and development of shallow bottoms and shoal waters in the areas herein set out for the purpose of filling and reclaiming same for the purposes herein set forth and where said bottoms are not susceptible to reasonable navigation at all times as a practical matter. SECTION 151.  Section 55-7-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 55-7-15.  The bridge and park commission which has acquired submerged lands, and before such lands have been reclaimed, shall bring its suit in the chancery court of the county in which such lands lie, against the state and all the world for confirmation of the commissions title to such submerged lands, as provided by law for the confirmation of patents issued by the state. Upon the hearing of such cause, if the court shall find that the reclamation of the said lands does not constitute an obstruction of the navigable waters of the state and does not interfere with the rights of the public generally to use the navigable waters of the state for fishing, boating, and other public uses, and that the reclamation and sale of said lands has or will, in whole or in part, contribute toward the deepening of a channel or channels for boats and improvement of navigation of any of the navigable waters of this state, and that a fair and adequate consideration has been paid or is to be paid for such property, then the court shall confirm the title to the property and forever set at rest any claims by the State of Mississippi in its sovereign capacity as proprietor of said lands. Any of the parties of the suit may appeal as in other proceedings in chancery, provided any interlocutory appeal is taken within ten (10) days after the rendition of the decree from which the appeal is desired and provided that any final appeal is taken within sixty (60) days from the date of the rendition of the final decree.  Any title perfected by a decree in a suit under this section shall forever estop and preclude the state and other parties from thereafter questioning the validity of the patent and deed involved in such proceedings. SECTION 152.  Section 55-7-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 55-7-21.  (1)  The park and bridge commission shall have power to lease or sell to private persons or corporations, real estate or any interest therein, acquired by said commission, whether improved or unimproved, and including reclaimed or filled-in lands, whenever it shall find such real estate or interest therein is or has become unnecessary for park or recreational purposes for the benefit of the public, or for other public use, and in the event of sale, to convey to the grantee, fee simple title to such real estate.  Prior to the leasing or conveyance of any such real estate, the commission shall, by resolution spread upon its minutes, find, determine and adjudicate that the property, to be so leased or sold and conveyed, is, or has become unnecessary for park and recreational purposes for the benefit of the public, or other public use.  Such findings, determination and adjudication shall be final and conclusive and shall not thereafter be questioned in any court.  However, lands acquired by eminent domain under the provisions of this chapter may not be sold, and may not be leased except for public purposes and continuing public uses, and when such lands cease to be used for public purposes, the title to same shall revert to the former owners, or their successors or assigns. (2)  The bridge and park commission shall have power to sell or lease to private persons, or corporations, real estate other than the submerged lands reclaimed by it, whether improved or unimproved, whenever it shall find such real estate is or has become unnecessary for park, recreational or harbor development purposes for the benefit of the public, and to convey to the grantee the fee simple title to such real estate.  Said commission shall have the power to lease the submerged lands reclaimed by it for a period not exceeding ninety-nine (99) years upon such terms and provisions and for such consideration as it may determine. After any of such lands have been developed, if the commission finds, by resolution spread on its minutes, that it is impractical to lease the same and that it is more advantageous to the public interest to sell such lands, the commission shall have the power to sell the same in fee simple. Prior to the conveyance or lease of any such real estate, the commission shall, by resolution spread upon its minutes, find, determine and adjudicate that the property so to be conveyed or leased is or has become unnecessary for park, recreational or harbor development purposes for the benefit of the public. SECTION 153.  Section 55-24-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 55-24-9.  The Mississippi Coast Coliseum Commission, a political subdivision of the State of Mississippi, shall have jurisdiction and authority over matters relating to promoting, developing, maintaining and operating a multipurpose coliseum and related facilities within Harrison County, Mississippi.  Multipurpose coliseum and related facilities shall include a multipurpose coliseum or arena facility, a convention center and facility grounds, as well as any lands purchased by or on the behalf of the commission.  From and after July 1, 2016, any development and/or any land acquired by or on behalf of the commission, shall be subject to the Land Development Ordinances of the City of Biloxi.  Such commission is authorized to acquire lands by purchase, gift or the exercise of eminent domain as provided by Section 11-27-1 et seq., above or below mean high-water mark subject to the approval of the Harrison County Board of Supervisors.  The acquisition of lands below mean high-water mark by the commission for the purposes authorized herein are declared to be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the State of Mississippi, a public purpose, and an essential governmental function in the exercise of the powers conferred upon them by such act. The commission, acting on behalf of the State of Mississippi, shall have the right to reclaim submerged lands for the purpose of constructing a multipurpose coliseum and related facilities, and to acquire in its name on behalf of the state any estate or property right therein or in other land necessary to the purpose of this chapter by purchase, gift, deed or other transfer, subject to the approval of the Harrison County Board of Supervisors.  Title to all oil, gas and other minerals in, on or under any lands, title to which is held by the State of Mississippi on August 8, 1968, shall be reserved unto the State of Mississippi, and all income derived from the sale or lease of such minerals shall inure to the benefit of the State of Mississippi for such purposes as the Legislature may direct.  Provided, that prior to utilization of lands in which title vests in the State of Mississippi, a description of such land shall be submitted to the Department of Finance and Administration and said utilization shall not be commenced until or unless approval of such utilization is given by the Department of Finance and Administration. The commission is authorized to own, furnish, equip and operate the multipurpose coliseum and facilities and equipment necessary or useful in the operation of such multipurpose coliseum and related facilities; to receive and expend, subject to the provisions of this chapter and the approval of the commission's annual budget by the Harrison County Board of Supervisors, revenues from any source, including the operation of the multipurpose coliseum and related facilities; and to do all other things necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The commission is authorized and directed to adopt uniform rules and regulations regarding the granting of contracts that are less than one hundred eighty (180) days for franchises, licenses, contracts or lease agreements, or the granting of contracts that are less than one hundred eighty (180) days for the use, operation and maintenance of the premises, and to publish the uniform rules and regulations for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper having a general circulation in the county and fixing a time and place not more than ten (10) days after the last publication to receive and hear objections to such rules and regulations.  The commission shall also publish such information on commission and county websites during the same time period as the newspaper publication.  In addition, a copy of such rules and regulations or any revisions or amendments thereto shall be filed with the Clerk of the Harrison County Board of Supervisors.  The commission may revise or amend such rules and regulations but such revisions shall be uniform and shall not be adopted unless the commission shall publish the proposed change and hold a public hearing as required by this section. Before any contract that is more than one hundred eighty (180) days for a franchise, license, contract or lease agreement may be granted, the commission shall notify the Harrison County Board of Supervisors and publish its intent to grant such franchise, license, contract or lease agreement and the conditions upon which same shall be granted.  Such publication shall be made for three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper having a general circulation in Harrison County.  Such publication shall also be made on the commission and county websites during the same time period as the newspaper publication.  All bids received shall be sealed, and shall be opened at a date, time and place set forth in the publications, which date shall not be less than five (5) days nor more than ten (10) days after the last day of such publications. Unless the commission shall find that the successful bidder cannot demonstrate financial responsibility to comply with the terms and conditions of the franchise, license, contract or lease agreement or cannot perform the services required thereunder, it shall, subject to the limitations set forth under this chapter, recommend the granting of the franchise, license, contract or lease agreement to the bidder whose proposal shall be in the best financial interest of the commission. Any person aggrieved by any action of the commission may appeal to the Circuit Court of Harrison County in the manner provided for appeals from orders of the board of supervisors. The commission is granted the power to sue and be sued in its own name, and the commission is authorized to take liability insurance on the operation of the facilities in an amount equal to the extent of its liability for claims or causes of action arising from acts or omissions as provided in Section 11-46-15; provided, however, that immunity from suit is only waived to the extent of such liability insurance carried, and a judgment creditor shall have recourse only to the proceeds or right to proceeds of such liability insurance.  No attempt shall be made in the trial of any case to suggest the existence of any insurance which covers in whole or in part any judgment or award rendered in favor of a claimant, but if the verdict rendered by the jury exceeds the limit of applicable insurance, the court on motion shall reduce the amount of said judgment to a sum equal to the applicable limit stated in the insurance policy. The commission shall prepare an annual budget specifically describing the proposed receipt and expenditure of all funds from any source whatsoever, and such budget shall be approved by the Harrison County Board of Supervisors.  If the commission desires to take any action associated with the receipt or expenditure of funds which deviates from the annual budget, such individual action shall be subject to the approval of the Harrison County Board of Supervisors. The commission is granted the power to invest funds credited to the Mississippi Coast Coliseum Commission Operating Fund, the commission is vested with authority to designate depositories of its funds, and to deposit the funds in interest-bearing accounts.  Provided, however, all funds in excess of ninety (90) days' operating expenses, to the extent practicable, shall be invested in Treasury bills or in interest-bearing accounts or approved securities to include, but not limited to, United States Treasury bills and United States Treasury notes and bonds, federal agency securities or mortgage-backed securities guaranteed as to repayment of principal by the government or an agency of such government, certificates of deposit fully covered by insurance administered by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or covered by pledged securities, repurchase agreements and short-term money market funds invested in United States government and United States government agencies. The commission is authorized to contract with any agency of the United States or the State of Mississippi for a loan or grant, subject to the approval of the Harrison County Board of Supervisors and to give such agency any assurances of compliance with federal or state laws which are not in conflict with the laws of the State of Mississippi.  It is the intent and purpose of this chapter that the Coliseum Commission cooperate with agencies administering the National Seashore Act of 1970. Whenever any real or personal property belonging to the commission shall cease to be used or needed for the commission's purposes, the commission may recommend to the Harrison County Board of Supervisors that it sell, exchange or lease the property on such terms as the commission may propose.  No lease of surplus real property may exceed a term of ninety-nine (99) years.  The deed of conveyance in such transactions shall be executed in the name of the commission by the Harrison County Board of Supervisors pursuant to order issued on the minutes of its meetings.  In any sale, exchange or lease of real property, the commission shall retain all mineral rights that it owns, together with the right of ingress and egress to remove same.  Before any sale, exchange or lease is made, the commissioners shall publish at least once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks, in a public newspaper of Harrison County, Mississippi, and on the commission and county websites the intention to sell, exchange or lease, as the case may be, the real or personal property and to accept sealed competitive bids for the sale, exchange or lease.  The commissioners shall thereafter accept bids for the sale, exchange or lease, and the property shall be sold, exchanged or leased to the highest and best bidder in the manner provided by law.  However, whenever the commissioners shall find and determine, by resolution duly and lawfully adopted and spread upon its minutes:  (a) that any commission-owned real property is no longer needed for commission purposes and is not to be used in the operation of a multipurpose coliseum and related facilities, (b) that the sale, exchange or lease of such property in the manner otherwise provided for herein is necessary or desirable for the financial welfare of a multipurpose coliseum and related facilities, and (c) that the use of such property for the purpose for which it is to be sold, exchanged or leased will promote and foster the development and improvement of the multipurpose coliseum and related facilities, the commissioners may recommend to the Harrison County Board of Supervisors that it sell, exchange or lease the property without having to advertise for and accept competitive bids.  In any case in which the commission proposes to sell or exchange real property under the provisions of this section without advertising for and accepting competitive bids, the Harrison County Board of Supervisors must approve such proposal, and consideration for the sale or exchange of the real property shall be not less than the average of the fair market price for the property as determined by three (3) professional property appraisers selected by the commission and approved by the purchaser or devisee and the Harrison County Board of Supervisors.  Appraisal fees shall be shared equally by the commission and the purchaser or devisee. The enumeration of any specific rights and powers contained herein or elsewhere in this chapter where followed by general powers shall not be construed in the restrictive sense but rather in as broad and comprehensive sense as possible to effectuate the purposes and intent of this chapter. SECTION 154.  Section 59-3-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-3-1.  The corporate authorities of any municipality in which there is situated, wholly or partially within its boundaries, a harbor that is a port of entry, shall have the following power and authority: to construct all needful improvements in such harbor, including the deepening of any part of said harbor, and/or extending, enlarging and adding to the same by dredging in any direction including inland; to acquire, construct, repair and improve public wharves and docks for said municipality, in connection with said harbor, and to operate the same under the port commissioners; to own, construct, lease and maintain sheds, warehouses, elevators, compresses, floating dry docks, graving docks, marine railways, tugboats, and other structures and facilities needful for the convenient use of the same in the aid of commerce, and other works of public improvement, including roadways necessary or useful for such port, harbor, and/or dock and wharf purposes, and to control and operate the same under the port commissioners; said sheds, warehouses, elevators, compresses and other works of public improvements, including roadways, to be situated either upon the municipal wharves and docks, and/or upon lands owned, purchased, reclaimed or leased by the municipality and situated within reasonable and practical proximity to such wharves, docks, harbor or port; to set aside or lease portions or all of the said lands, wharves, docks, sheds, warehouses, elevators, compresses, floating dry docks, graving docks, marine railways, tugboats, and other structures and facilities needful for convenient use of the same in the aid of commerce, or any of the said necessary or useful improvements, for special purposes, for a term not exceeding twenty-five years; and to lease same for industrial use for a term not exceeding ninety-nine years to individuals, firms or corporations, public or private, on such terms and conditions and with such safeguards as will best promote and protect the public interest.  Any such industrial lease may be executed upon such terms and conditions and for such monetary rental or other consideration as may be found adequate and approved by the city in orders or resolutions authorizing the same.  Any covenants and obligations of the lessee to make expenditures in determined amounts and within such time or times, for improvements to be erected on the land by such lessee and to conduct thereon industrial operations in such aggregate payroll amounts and for such period of time or times as may be determined and defined in such lease, and to give preference in employment where practicable to qualified residents of the port of entry and of the county in which said port is situated, shall, if included in said lease, constitute and be deemed sufficient consideration for the execution of any such lease in the absence of a monetary rental or other considerations; any such instrument may contain reasonable provisions giving the lessee the right to remove its or his improvements upon termination of the lease.  Such corporate authority shall also have the power and authority to acquire by eminent domain proceedings, purchase, or otherwise, the land, property and rights that may be necessary or useful for the foregoing purposes, and for such purposes the municipality shall have the right to reclaim submerged lands. SECTION 155.  Section 59-5-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-5-11.  The board shall have power to acquire, purchase, install, lease, construct, own, hold, maintain, equip, use, control, and operate ports, harbors, waterways, channels, wharves, piers, docks, quays, elevators, tipples, compresses, bulk loading and unloading facilities, warehouses, floating dry docks, graving docks, marine railways, tugboats, ships, vessels, shipyards, shipbuilding facilities, machinery and equipment, dredges and any other facilities required and incidental to the construction, outfitting, drydocking or repair of ships or vessels, and water, air and rail terminals, and roadways and approaches thereto, and other structures and facilities needful for the convenient use of the same in the aid of commerce, including the dredging, deepening, extending, widening, or enlarging of any ports, harbors, rivers, channels, and waterways, the damming of inland waterways, the establishment of water basins, the acquisition and development of industrial sites and the reclaiming of submerged lands.  For such purposes the board is vested with full jurisdiction and control of any and all lands lying within, adjacent to, or near any state-owned or operated ports, harbors, rivers, channels, and waterways, or natural lakes, which lands are below the mean high tide mark, and which lands are not within the jurisdiction of any other public body. SECTION 156.  Section 59-9-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-9-19.  The board of supervisors of any county in which there has been created a county port authority or county development commission as provided in this chapter, acting through its county port authority or county development commission, shall have the following additional powers and authority: (a)  To set aside or lease all or portions of said harbor facilities, wharves, docks, sheds, warehouses, elevators, compresses, floating dry docks, graving docks, marine railways, tugboats or any necessary or useful improvements for special purposes for a term not exceeding ninety-nine (99) years. (b)  To sell, lease or otherwise dispose of tourism facilities, service facilities, shipyards, shipbuilding facilities, machinery and equipment, dredges, facilities and land acquired for industrial or harbor operations to individuals, firms or corporations, public or private, for industrial operations on such terms and conditions and with such safeguards as will best promote and protect the public interest, and they are hereby authorized to transfer possession and/or title to any part of all of such facilities and lands by deed, lease, contract or other customary business instrument; however, no such lease of land or facilities acquired for industrial operations shall be executed for a term in excess of ninety-nine (99) years from its date, and before the execution of the same any such deed, conveyance, lease, contract or other disposition shall be authorized by the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the membership of such port authority or development commission by order or resolution entered on its minutes, which order or resolution shall set forth the substantial terms of such deed, conveyance, lease, contract or other disposition. In the letting of contracts and in the advertisement for bids thereon, for the development, construction, repair, maintenance or operation of any structures, facilities and lands required pursuant to any of the provisions of this chapter, the board of supervisors and the county port authority shall comply with all of the requirements of the general laws of the State of Mississippi governing the advertisement for bids and the letting of contracts by county boards of supervisors.  In the event title to any such lands under jurisdiction of the port authority or development commission is in the name of the county, no such transaction shall be consummated until and unless the same be authorized by proper resolution of the port authority or development commission and of the county, in which event the county shall join the port authority or development commission in the execution of such instrument.  Any such sale or lease may be executed upon such terms and conditions and for such monetary rental or other consideration as may be found adequate and approved by the county port authority or county development commission and the board of supervisors in orders or resolutions authorizing the same.  Any covenants and obligations of the lessee or purchaser to make expenditures in determined amounts and within such time or times for improvements to be erected on the land by such lessee or purchaser and to conduct thereon industrial operations in such aggregate payroll amounts and for such period of time or times as may be determined and defined in such lease or conveyance, and to give preference in employment where practicable to qualified residents of the port of entry and of the county and/or state in which such port is situated, shall, if included in such lease or conveyance, constitute and be deemed sufficient consideration for the execution of any such lease or conveyance in the absence of a monetary rental or other considerations; any such lease may contain reasonable provisions giving the lessee the right to remove its or his improvements upon termination of the lease. Where the rentals provided in the lease will be sufficient to fully retire the cost of the particular facility or where the monetary consideration for a deed is sufficient to fully repay the cost of land acquired for industrial operations described in said deed, contracts for construction, repairs, maintenance and operation of the facility or for the sale of the land, may be negotiated and consummated without the necessity of advertising and obtaining competitive bids therefor.  Such county, acting through the port authority or development commission, shall have the right to reclaim submerged lands for such purposes and shall also have the right to acquire by eminent domain proceedings, purchase or otherwise, any land or estate therein or property and rights that may be necessary for the purposes of this chapter, provided that land acquired for industrial operations by eminent domain shall be leased or shall be sold only with such provisions in the deed or lease as shall ensure that the use of the land shall be beneficial to the carrying out of the purposes of this chapter and the promotion of commerce through said port.  The county, acting through the port authority or development commission, shall have no authority or power to acquire without the consent of the owner thereof any property operated or used for port, harbor or industrial operations, or for such purposes as the county, acting through the port authority or development commission, is authorized to acquire and use such property for, where such property has been sold or leased by the county, acting through the port authority or development commission, to any person, firm or corporation for industrial operations as provided in this chapter.  In the exercise of eminent domain, the county, acting through the port authority or development commission, shall determine the amount and character of the land or estate therein thus to be acquired and the public necessity for such exercise and their determination shall be conclusive and shall not be subject to attack in the absence of manifold abuse of discretion or fraud on the part of said county in making such determination and said county, acting through the port authority or development commission, shall have all powers and authority vested in persons or corporations having the right of eminent domain by Sections 11-27-1 through 11-27-49 and all other statutes pertinent thereto. (c)  To accept assurances and other agreements from persons, firms and corporations who are benefited by any action of the port authority pursuant to this chapter, including agreements to save the county harmless on account of any assurances given by the county to the United States of America or any agency thereof, including the Secretary of the Army, and to enter into contracts with such persons, firms or corporations relative to the future development and use of property owned by such persons, firms or corporations. (d)  To obligate the county by contract with persons, firms and corporations owning or agreeing to purchase property in the area benefited by any action of the port authority under the provisions of this chapter for the construction, development, improvement or expansion of channels and other navigation projects by the county at its expense and the continued maintenance and operation thereof by the county at its expense for a period of time not to exceed ninety-nine (99) years, or so long as any such person, firm or corporation continues to use said property for industrial operations. (e)  To obtain liability insurance as deemed appropriate for the needs of the port authority or development commission.  If liability insurance is in effect, the port authority or development commission may be sued by anyone affected to the extent of such insurance carried; however, immunity from suit is waived only to the extent of such liability insurance carried, and a judgment creditor shall have recourse only to the proceeds or right to proceeds of such liability insurance. (f)  To invest funds credited to the county development commission.  A county development commission is vested with authority to designate depositories of its funds and to deposit its funds in insured, interest-bearing accounts or securities guaranteed by the good faith of the United States Treasury.  All funds in excess of ninety (90) days' operating expenses, to the extent practicable, shall be invested in United States Treasury bills, interest-bearing accounts insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or other securities of the United States government including United States Treasury bills, notes and bonds, federal agency securities, mortgage-backed securities guaranteed as to repayment of principal by the United States government, or repurchase agreements and mutual funds invested in obligations of the United States government or its agencies and repurchase agreements fully collateralized by such obligations. SECTION 157.  Section 59-17-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-17-13.  (1)  The board shall have power to acquire, purchase, install, lease, construct, own, hold, maintain, equip, use, control, and operate ports, harbors, waterways, channels, wharves, piers, docks, quays, elevators, tipples, compresses, bulk loading and unloading facilities, warehouses, floating dry docks, graving docks, marine railways, tugboats, machinery and equipment, and water, air and rail terminals, and roadways and approaches thereto, and other structures and facilities needful for the convenient use of the same in the aid of commerce, including the dredging, deepening, extending, widening, or enlarging of any ports, harbors, rivers, channels, and waterways, the damming of inland waterways, the establishment of water basins, the acquisition and development of industrial sites and the reclaiming of submerged lands. (2)  The State Inland Port Authority, subject to the approval of the board, shall have the power to borrow money from any source, public or private, for any of its corporate purposes and to give such security as may be required in connection therewith and to enter into a joint agreement with the boards of supervisors of any county, or the governing authority of any municipality, or both acting jointly, to issue revenue bonds of such county or municipality, or both, acting jointly, as provided by Section 59-7-311 which bonds may be payable out of any revenues of the authority, including grants or contributions from the federal government or other sources.  Such revenue bonds may be issued without an election on resolution of the board of supervisors, governing body of the municipality, or both acting jointly, and shall not be subject to any limitation as to amount, and shall not be included or computed in the statutory limitation of indebtedness of any such county or municipality. (3) All leases which are now in effect or which may hereafter be executed by the State Inland Port Authority for port, harbor, commercial or industrial improvements, and all structures and all improvements and other permanent facilities erected, installed or located by such lessees, or their successors or assignees within the limits of any port, harbor or part thereof, may be free and exempt from all state, county and municipal ad valorem taxes if so stipulated in such lease, and for such period as may be fixed in such lease, not to exceed such periods of time as are now authorized or may be hereafter authorized by law. SECTION 158.  Section 61-3-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 61-3-15.  An authority shall have all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter (excluding the power to levy and collect taxes or special assessments) including, but not limited to, the power: (a)  To sue and be sued, to have a seal and to have perpetual succession. (b)  To purchase general liability insurance coverage, including errors and omissions insurance, for its officials and employees. (c)  To employ an executive director, secretary, technical experts, and such other officers, agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and to determine their qualifications and duties, and to establish compensation and other employment benefits as may be advisable to attract and retain proficient personnel.  For regional airport authorities organized under Section 61-3-7, such employment benefits may include payment for all or part of dependent health insurance coverage. (d)  To execute such contracts and other instruments and take such other action as may be necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter. (e)  To plan, establish, develop, construct, enlarge, improve, maintain, equip, operate, regulate and protect airports and air navigation facilities within this state and within any adjoining state, including the acquisition, lease, lease-purchase, construction, installation, equipment, maintenance and operation of such airports or buildings, equipment and other facilities or other property for the servicing of aircraft or for the comfort and accommodation of air travelers or for any other purpose deemed by the authority to be necessary to carry out its duties; to develop, operate, manage or own and maintain intermodal facilities to serve air and surface cargo and multimodal facilities to serve highway and rail passenger transportation needs to ensure interface and interaction between modes for cargo and passengers; to construct, improve, and maintain means of ingress and egress to airport properties from and over off-airport sites with approval of the city or county in which the off-airport site is located; to market, promote and advertise airport properties, goods and services; and to directly purchase and sell supplies, goods and commodities incident to the operation of its airport properties without having to make purchases thereof through the municipal governing authorities, and with the authority to utilize design-build and construction manager at-risk methods of construction in accordance with Sections 31-7-13.1 and 31-7-13.2.  For all the previously stated purposes, an authority may, by purchase, gift, devise, lease, eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, acquire property, real or personal, or any interest therein, including easements in airport hazards or land outside the boundaries of an airport or airport site, as are necessary to permit the removal, elimination, obstruction-marking or obstruction-lighting of airport hazards, to prevent the establishment of airport hazards or to carry out its duties. (f)  To acquire, by purchase, gift, devise, lease, lease-purchase, eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, existing airports and air navigation facilities.  However, an authority shall not acquire or take over any airport or air navigation facility owned or controlled by another authority, a municipality or public agency of this or any other state without the consent of such authority, municipality or public agency. (g)  To establish or acquire and maintain airports in, over and upon any public waters of this state, and any submerged lands under such public waters, and to construct and maintain terminal buildings, landing floats, causeways, roadways and bridges for approaches to or connecting with any such airport, and landing floats and breakwaters for the protection thereof. (h)  To establish, enact and enforce ordinances, rules, regulations and standards for public safety, aviation safety, airport operations and the preservation of good order and peace of the authority; to prevent injury to, destruction of or interference with public or private property; to protect property, health and lives and to enhance the general welfare of the authority by restricting the movements of citizens or any group thereof on the property of the authority when there is imminent danger to the public safety because of freedom of movement thereof; to regulate the entrances to property and buildings of the authority and the way of ingress and egress to and from the same; to establish fire limits and to hire firemen, including aircraft fire and rescue and similar personnel, and to establish and equip a fire department to provide fire and other emergency services on any property of the authority; to regulate, restrain or prohibit construction failing to meet standards established by the authority; to appoint and discharge police officers with jurisdiction limited to property of the airport authority and authorization to enforce the ordinances, rules and regulations of the authority, as well as the laws of the State of Mississippi, and to issue citations for infractions of all of such ordinances, rules, regulations, standards and laws of the State of Mississippi returnable to the court of appropriate jurisdiction. (i)  To develop and operate an industrial park or parks and exercise all authority provided for under Chapter 7, Title 57, Mississippi Code of 1972. (j)  To attach, pursuant to the power and procedure set forth in Chapter 33, Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972, the equipment of debtors of the authority. (k)  To enter into agreements with local governments pursuant to Section 17-13-1 et seq. (l)  To render emergency assistance to other airports within the United States at an aggregate cost of less than Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) per emergency.  The assistance authorized in this paragraph must be rendered within ninety (90) days after a state of emergency has been declared by the federal government, or by the local or state government that has jurisdiction over the area where the airport needing assistance is located. (m)  To enter into joint use or similar agreements with any department or agency of the United States of America or the State of Mississippi, including any military department of the United States of America or the State of Mississippi, with respect to the use and operation of, or services provided at, any airport or other property of the authority on the terms and conditions as the authority may deem appropriate, including provisions limiting the liability of the United States of America or the State of Mississippi for loss or damage to the authority if the authority determines that the limitation of liability is reasonable, necessary and appropriate under the circumstances. (n)  To enter into mutual aid agreements with counties and municipalities for reciprocal emergency aid and assistance in case of emergencies too extensive to be dealt with unassisted; to participate in the Statewide Mutual Aid Compact (SMAC) in accordance with Section 33-15-19. SECTION 159.  Section 79-21-53, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 79-21-53.  As used in Sections 79-21-51 through 79-21-67, Mississippi Code of 1972: (a)  The term "member" shall include actual members of associations without capital stock and holders of common stock in associations organized with capital stock. (b)  The term "person" shall include individuals, firms, partnerships, corporations and associations. (c)  The term "association" means any association organized under the terms of Sections 79-21-51 through 79-21-67, Mississippi Code of 1972. (d)  The term "aquatic product" shall include all commercial products of aquatic life normally found in, or associated with, the salt waters of the State of Mississippi or the United States.  It shall specifically include, but is not limited to, shellfish, domesticated fish, fish of all species, and their by-products, normally found in salt water. (e)  The term "commercial fishing" shall include all persons engaged totally or part-time in the business of catching freezing, marketing, processing, transporting, wholesaling or otherwise involved in the utilization of aquatic products from the salt waters of the State of Mississippi or the United States for commercial purposes. (f)  The term "domestic fish farming" shall include all persons engaged in the growing, managing, harvesting and/or marketing of domesticated fish or shellfish as a cultivated crop in privately owned or leased waters or submerged lands. (g)  The term "domesticated fish" means any fish or shellfish that are spawned and grown, managed, harvested and marketed on an annual, semiannual, biennial, or short-term basis in privately owned or leased waters or submerged lands. (h)  The term "producer" means any person engaged totally, or part-time, in the business of commercial fishing or domestic fish farming for the commercial purpose of providing aquatic products to consumers. SECTION 160.  Section 27-31-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-31-39.  All Public Trust Tidelands belonging to the State of Mississippi or any of its political subdivisions shall be exempt from ad valorem taxation. SECTION 161.  Section 29-7-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 29-7-3.  There shall be no development or extraction of oil, gas, or other minerals from state-owned lands by any private party without first obtaining a mineral lease therefor from the commission.  The commission is hereby authorized and empowered, for and on behalf of the state, to lease any and all of the state land now owned (including that submerged or whereover the tide may ebb and flow) or hereafter acquired, to some reputable person, association, or company for oil and/or gas and/or other minerals in and under and which may be produced therefrom, excepting, however, sixteenth section school land, lieu lands, and such forfeited tax land and property the title to which is subject to any lawful redemption, for such consideration and upon such terms and conditions as the commission deems just and proper.  No mineral lease of offshore lands shall allow offshore drilling operations north of the coastal barrier islands, except in Blocks 40, 41, 42, 43, 63, 64 and 66 through 98, inclusive.  Further, surface offshore drilling operations will not be allowed within one (1) mile of Cat Island.  The commission may only offer for lease the state-owned lands in Blocks 40, 41, 42, 43, 63, 64 and 66 through 98, inclusive, as shown on the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality Bureau of Geology Plat of Lease Blocks (Open File Report 151) on terms and conditions and for a length of time as determined by the commission.  The commission may not lease any lands or submerged lands off the Mississippi Gulf Coast that have been leased by the Department of Marine Resources before January 1, 2004, for any public or private oyster reef lease or any lands or submerged lands within one (1) mile of that lease for the purposes of drilling offshore for oil, gas and other minerals. Consistent with the conservation policies of this state under Section 53-1-1 et seq., the commission may offer for public bid any tracts or blocks of state-owned lands not currently under lease, which have been identified to the commission as having development potential for oil or natural gas, not less than once a year.  Upon consultation with the Office of Geology in the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality, the Secretary of State and any other state agency as the commission deems appropriate, the commission shall promulgate rules and regulations consistent with this chapter governing all aspects of the process of leasing state lands within its jurisdiction for mineral development, including the setting of all terms of the lease form to be used for leasing state-owned lands, any necessary fees, public bidding process, delay rental payments, shut-in royalty payments, and such other provisions as may be required.  The Attorney General shall review the lease form adopted by the commission for legal sufficiency. There shall not be conducted any seismographic or other mineral exploration or testing activities on any state-owned lands within the mineral leasing jurisdiction of the commission without first obtaining a permit therefor from the commission.  Upon consultation with the Office of Geology in the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality, the Secretary of State and any other state agency as the commission deems appropriate, the commission shall promulgate rules and regulations governing all aspects of seismographic or other mineral exploration activity on state lands within its jurisdiction, including the establishing of fees and issuance of permits for the conduct of such mineral exploration activities.  The Attorney General shall review the permit form adopted by the commission for legal sufficiency.  Provided, however, that persons obtaining permits from the commission for seismographic or other mineral exploration or testing activities on state-owned wildlife management areas, lakes and fish hatcheries, shall be subject to rules and regulations promulgated therefor by the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks which shall also receive all permit fees for such testing on said lands.  In addition, persons obtaining permits from the commission for seismographic or other mineral exploration or testing activities on state-owned marine waters shall be subject to rules and regulations promulgated therefor by the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources which shall also receive all permit fees for such testing on those waters. Further, provided that each permit within the Mississippi Sound or tidelands shall be reviewed by the Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources and such special conditions as it may specify will be included in the permit.  Information or data obtained in any mineral exploration activity on any and all state lands shall be disclosed to the state through the commission, upon demand.  Such information or data shall be treated as confidential for a period of ten (10) years from the date of receipt thereof and shall not be disclosed to the public or to any firm, individual or agency other than officials or authorized employees of this state.  Any person who makes unauthorized disclosure of such confidential information or data shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or imprisoned in the county jail not more than one (1) year, or both. Whenever any such land or property is leased for oil and gas and/or other minerals, such lease contract shall provide for a lease royalty to the state of at least three-sixteenths (3/16) of such oil and gas or other minerals, same to be paid in the manner prescribed by the commission.  Of the monies received in connection with the execution of such leases, five-tenths of one percent (5/10 of 1%) shall be retained in a special fund to be appropriated by the Legislature, One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) of which amount to be used by the commission for the administration of the leasing and permitting under this section, and the remainder of such amount shall be deposited into the Education Trust Fund, created in Section 206A, Mississippi Constitution of 1890; and two percent (2%) shall be paid into a special fund to be designated as the "Gulf and Wildlife Protection Fund," to be appropriated by the Legislature, one-half (1/2) thereof to be apportioned as follows:  an amount which shall not exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be used by the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks and the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources solely for the purpose of cleanup, remedial or abatement actions involving pollution as a result of the exploration or production of oil or gas, and any amount in excess of such One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be deposited into the Education Trust Fund, created in Section 206A, Mississippi Constitution of 1890.  The remaining one-half (1/2) of such Gulf and Wildlife Protection Fund to be apportioned as follows:  an amount which shall not exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be used by the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks and the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources for use first in the prudent management, preservation, protection and conservation of existing waters, lands and wildlife of this state and then, provided such purposes are accomplished, for the acquisition of additional waters and lands and any amount in excess of such One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be deposited into the Education Trust Fund, created in Section 206A, Mississippi Constitution of 1890.  However, in the event that the Legislature is not in session to appropriate funds from the Gulf and Wildlife Protection Fund for the purpose of cleanup, remedial or abatement actions involving pollution as a result of the exploration or production of oil or gas, then the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks and the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources may make expenditures from this special fund account solely for said purpose.  The commission may lease the submerged beds for sand and gravel on such a basis as it may deem proper, but where the waters lie between this state and an adjoining state, there must be a cash realization to this state, including taxes paid for such sand and gravel, equal to that being had by such adjoining state, in all cases the requisite consents therefor being lawfully obtained from the United States. The Department of Environmental Quality is authorized to employ competent engineering personnel to survey the territorial waters of this state in the Mississippi Sound and the Gulf of Mexico and to prepare a map or plat of such territorial waters, divided into blocks of not more than six thousand (6,000) acres each with coordinates and reference points based upon longitude and latitude surveys.  The commission is authorized to adopt such survey, plat or map for leasing of such submerged lands for mineral development; and such leases may, after the adoption of such plat or map, be made by reference to the map or plat, which shall be on permanent file with the commission and a copy thereof on file in the Office of the State Oil and Gas Board. SECTION 162.  Section 39-7-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 39-7-3.  It is hereby declared to be the public policy and in the public interest of the State of Mississippi to locate, protect, and preserve all sites, objects, buildings, shipwrecks, and locations of historical, archaeological, or architectural significance, including, but not limited to historically or architecturally significant buildings, structures relating to significant engineering accomplishments, prehistoric and historical American Indian or aboriginal campsites, dwellings, and habitation sites, archaeological sites of every character, treasure imbedded in the earth, sunken or abandoned ships and wrecks of the sea or any part or the contents thereof, maps, records, documents, books, artifacts, and implements of culture in any way related to the inhabitants, prehistory, history, natural history, government, or culture in, on or under any of the lands, tidelands, submerged lands, and bed of the sea within the jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 163.  Section 39-7-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 39-7-9.  All sunken or abandoned ships and wrecks of the sea, and any part or the contents thereof, and all treasure imbedded in the earth, located in, on or under the surface of lands belonging to the State of Mississippi, including its tidelands, submerged lands and the beds of its rivers and the sea within the jurisdiction of the State of Mississippi are hereby declared to be Mississippi Landmarks and are the sole property of the State of Mississippi and may not be taken, altered, damaged, destroyed, salvaged or excavated without a contract or permit of the board. SECTION 164.  Section 49-15-301, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-301.  (1)  The Mississippi Advisory Commission on Marine Resources is hereby established and full power is vested in the advisory commission to advise the Executive Director of the Department of Marine Resources on all matters pertaining to all saltwater aquatic life and marine resources.  The advisory commission shall advise the Executive Director of the Department of Marine Resources on the administration of the Coastal Wetlands Protection Law and the Public Trust Tidelands Act.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the commission shall only be an advisory commission to the Department of Marine Resources and shall not have independent authority to take official action on behalf of the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources and its actions are purely advisory in nature.  Whenever the terms "Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources," "Commission on Marine Resources" and "commission" when referring to the Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources appear in any state law, they shall mean the "Mississippi Advisory Commission on Marine Resources." (2)  The reconstituted Mississippi Advisory Commission on Marine Resources shall consist of five (5) members to be appointed as follows: (a)  The Governor shall appoint five (5) members who shall be residents of Jackson, Harrison and Hancock Counties with the advice and consent of the Senate.  The Governor shall appoint at least one (1) member from each county but not more than two (2) members from any one (1) county.  The members designated in subparagraphs (i), (ii) and (iv) must be a resident of the county where the business he is appointed to represent is located. (b)  The advisory commission shall be composed as follows: (i)  One (1) member shall be a commercial seafood processor. (ii)  One (1) member shall be a commercial fisherman. (iii)  One (1) member shall be a recreational sports fisherman. (iv)  One (1) member shall be a charter boat operator. (v)  One (1) member shall be a member of an incorporated nonprofit environmental organization. (c)  Of the initial members appointed by the Governor, the members designated in subparagraphs (i), (ii) and (iii) shall serve for an initial term of two (2) years and one (1) member shall be appointed from each county.  The members designated in subparagraphs (iv) and (v) shall serve an initial term of four (4) years.  All terms after the initial terms shall be for a period of four (4) years. (d)  Any vacancy in the office of an appointed member of the advisory commission shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the balance of the unexpired term. (3)  Each member shall have a demonstrated history of involvement in the matter of jurisdiction for which he is appointed to represent and his employment and activities must not conflict with the matter of jurisdiction represented.  A member shall not have a record of conviction of violation of fish and game or seafood laws or regulations within the five (5) years preceding his appointment or a record of any felony conviction. After July 1, 1999, if a member is convicted of a violation of the seafood laws during his term, his office shall be deemed vacant and the Governor shall fill the vacancy as provided in this section. (4)  The advisory commission shall elect a chairman who shall preside at all meetings of the commission, and the advisory commission shall also elect a vice chairman who shall serve in the absence or inability of the chairman. (5)  Each member shall be paid actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending meetings of the advisory commission and in performing his duties away from his domicile under assignment by the advisory commission.  In addition, members shall receive the per diem authorized in Section 25-3-69. (6)  The advisory commission shall adopt rules and regulations governing times and places of meetings. (7)  The advisory commission shall not take any action without the approval of the Department of Marine Resources, and such action shall be included in the minutes of the advisory commission.  A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum of the advisory commission. (8)  The advisory commission shall advise the Department of Marine Resources on how to devise a plan to make licenses available in each coastal county. (9)  (a)  There is hereby created a Marine Resources Technical Advisory Council composed of the Executive Director of the Gulf Coast Research Lab, or his designee; the Executive Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, or his designee; and the Executive Director of the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, or his designee. (b)  The council shall give technical assistance to the department. (10)  For purposes of this section the following definitions apply: (a)  "Charter boat operator" means an individual who operates a vessel for hire, guiding sports fishermen for a fee and is duly licensed to engage in such activity in the State of Mississippi. (b)  "Commercial fisherman" means a fisherman who sells, barters or exchanges any or all of his catch or who is paid for attempting to catch marine species, and is duly licensed to engage in commercial fishing. (c)  "Commercial seafood processor" means an individual who engages in the business of purchasing seafood products and preparing them for resale and who is duly licensed to engage in such commercial activity in the State of Mississippi. (d)  "Incorporated environmental nonprofit organization" means an organization duly incorporated in any state as a nonprofit organization and whose stated goals and purposes are the conservation of natural resources. (e)  "Recreational sports fisherman" means an individual who catches or harvests marine species only for recreation or personal consumption and not for sale.  The individual must possess a saltwater sports fishing license, be a member of an incorporated nonprofit sports fishing organization and not possess a commercial fishing or seafood processor license. SECTION 165.  Section 49-15-304, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-15-304.  The department, with the advice of the advisory commission, may adopt, modify or repeal rules or regulations to utilize, manage, conserve, preserve and protect the flora, fauna, tidelands, coastal wetlands, coastal preserves, marine waters and any other matter pertaining to marine resources under its jurisdiction.  Rules and regulations adopted by the department shall be consistent with the public policy expressed in Section 29-15-3 (public trust tidelands), Section 39-7-3 (antiquities and historic preservation), Section 49-15-1 (seafood), Section 49-17-3 (pollution control), Section 49-27-3 (coastal wetlands protection) and Section 57-15-6 (coastal zone management).  The department may make exceptions to and grant variances from any rules and regulations adopted by the department.  The department shall give due consideration to permissable uses of the natural resources within its jurisdiction when promulgating rules and regulations. SECTION 166.  Section 49-27-4, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-27-4.  (1)  The Mississippi Department of Marine Resources is authorized and directed to designate the Danzler Tract, nine hundred twenty-five (925) acres located in the Pascagoula River Marshes in Jackson County, Mississippi, acquired in 1997 with funds obtained by Secretary of State Eric Clark as trustee of the public trust tidelands and part of the Mississippi Coastal Preserves Program, as the "Secretary of State Eric Clark Coastal Preserve" in honor of his role in the development of the program. (2)  The Mississippi Department of Marine Resources in conjunction with the Office of Secretary of State are further authorized to erect appropriate markers and signs indicating the location of the "Secretary of State Eric Clark Coastal Preserve" and other pertinent information on the mission, trail systems and visitor guidelines relating to the Mississippi Coastal Plain. SECTION 167.  Section 49-27-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-27-5.  (a)  "Coastal wetlands" means all publicly-owned lands subject to the ebb and flow of the tide; which are below the ordinary high water mark; all publicly-owned accretions above the ordinary high water mark and all publicly-owned submerged water-bottoms below the ordinary high water mark and includes the flora and fauna on the wetlands and in the wetlands. (b)  "Department" means the Department of Marine Resources. (c)  "Regulated activity" means any of the following activities: (i)  The dredging, excavating or removing of soil, mud, sand, gravel, flora, fauna or aggregate of any kind from any coastal wetland; (ii)  The dumping, filling or depositing of any soil, stones, sand, gravel, mud, aggregate of any kind or garbage, either directly or indirectly, on or in any coastal wetlands; (iii)  Killing or materially damaging any flora or fauna on or in any coastal wetland; (iv)  The erection on coastal wetlands of structures which materially affect the ebb and flow of the tide; and (v)  The erection of any structure or structures on suitable sites for water dependent industry. (d)  "Dredging" means the removal or displacement by any means of soil, sand, gravel, shells or other material, whether of intrinsic value or not, from coastal wetlands. (e)  "Executive director" means the Executive Director of the Department of Marine Resources. (f)  "Filling" means either the displacement of waters by the deposition into coastal wetlands of soil, sand, gravel, shells or other material; or the artificial alteration of water levels or water currents by physical structures, drainage ditches or otherwise. (g)  "Person" means any natural person, partnership, joint stock company, corporation, unincorporated association or society, or the state and any agency thereof, or any county, municipality or political subdivision, or any other corporation of any character whatsoever. (h)  "Commission" means the Mississippi Advisory Commission on Marine Resources. (i)  "Water dependent industry" means those commercial, industrial or manufacturing activities which, for purposes basic to their existence must occur or locate on or adjacent to the estuaries, sounds, channels, shores or marshlands of the coast. "Suitable sites for water dependent industry" means those areas of land which are suitable for the development of water dependent industry because of their proximity to waters of navigable depth, size and configuration, topography, soil conditions and access to other means of transportation.  After consultation with local governments, port authorities, development commissions, port and harbor commissions and other interested parties, and after full consideration of zoning ordinances duly adopted by local governments, the department shall designate those sites it deems suitable for water dependent industry.  The definition of "suitable sites for water dependent industry" shall be limited to, but not necessarily inclusive of, waterfront sites owned by county port authorities, development commissions and port and harbor commissions, and to areas that are now or are later made to be within one thousand (1,000) feet of the centerline of any natural or maintained channel having a depth of seven (7) feet or greater at mean low water. However, additional sites may be included in the definition of suitable sites for water dependent industry with the concurrence of the board of supervisors in the county affected. (j)  "Ordinary High Water Mark (OHWM)" means a mark on the shore determined by the department staff, established by fluctuations in water level and indicated by physical and biological characteristics including, but not limited to, water stains, changes in the character of the soil, scour lines, presence of debris lines, changes in plant communities and other appropriate means that consider the characteristics of the surrounding area.  The determination of OHWM shall not be made by the department staff during high tide where the above referenced characteristics are not observable.  OHWM is not the same as mean high water and shall not be used for determination of the boundary between private property and public trust tidelands or for any purpose other than regulated activity as defined in this section. SECTION 168.  Section 49-27-71, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 49-27-71.  (1)  Definitions. As used in the section, the following words and phrases have the following meanings unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Abandoned vessel" means a vessel left unattended for four (4) or more weeks after a hurricane, tropical storm or other natural event resulting in a declaration of emergency by the Governor, or, in the absence of a hurricane, tropical storm or other natural event resulting in a declaration of emergency by the Governor, any of the following: (i)  A vessel left unattended that is moored, anchored, or otherwise in the waters of the state or on public property for a period of more than ten (10) days. (ii)  A vessel that is moored, anchored, or otherwise on or attached to private property for a period of more than ten (10) days without the consent of the owner or lessee of the property or of the public trust tidelands. Upon notification from the owner of the vessel outlining the circumstances following a hurricane, tropical storm or other natural event, the department may grant an exception to the time frames indicated above. (b) "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources. (c)  "Derelict vessel" means a vessel in the waters of the State of Mississippi that satisfies any of the following: (i)  Is aground without the ability to extricate itself absent mechanical assistance; (ii)  Is sunk or otherwise resting on the bottom of the waterway; (iii)  Is abandoned; (iv)  Is wrecked, junked, or in a substantially dismantled condition upon any waters of this state: 1.  A vessel is "wrecked" if it is sunken or sinking; or remaining after a marine casualty, including, but not limited to, a boating accident, extreme weather, or fire. 2.  A vessel is "junked" if it has been substantially stripped of vessel components, if vessel components have substantially degraded or been destroyed, or if the vessel has been discarded by the owner or operator.  Attaching an outboard motor to a vessel that is otherwise junked will not cause the vessel to no longer be junked if such motor is not an effective means of propulsion. 3.  A vessel is "substantially dismantled" if at least two (2) of the three (3) following vessel systems or components are missing, compromised, incomplete, inoperable, or broken: (A)  The steering system; (B)  The propulsion system; or (C)  The exterior hull integrity. Attaching an outboard motor to a vessel that is otherwise substantially dismantled will not cause the vessel to no longer be substantially dismantled if such motor is not an effective means of propulsion; (v)  Docked, grounded, or beached upon the property of another without the consent of the owner of the property; (vi)  Is obstructing a waterway or within one hundred (100) yards of the boundaries of any state, county or municipal port; (vii)  Is endangering life or property; (viii)  Has broken loose or is in danger of breaking loose from its anchor, mooring, or ties; or (iv)  A vessel that is otherwise not seaworthy. (d)  "Documented vessel" means a vessel documented under 46 USC, Chapter 121. (e)  "Effective means of propulsion" means a vessel, other than a barge, that is equipped with: (i)  A functioning motor, controls, and steering system; or (ii)  Rigging and sails that are present and in good working order, and a functioning steering system. A vessel does not have an effective means of propulsion for safe navigation within seventy-two (72) hours after the vessel owner or operator received telephonic notice, in-person notice recorded on an agency-approved body camera, or written notice, which may be provided by facsimile, electronic mail, or other electronic means, stating such from a representative of the department, and the vessel owner or operator is unable to provide a receipt, proof of purchase, or other documentation of having ordered necessary parts for vessel repair.  The department may adopt regulations to implement this paragraph. (f)  "Floating building or structure" means a floating entity, with or without accommodations built thereon, which is not primarily used as a means of transportation on water but which serves purposes or provides services typically associated with a structure or other improvement to real property. The term includes, but is not limited to, an entity used as a residence, place of business or office with public access; a hotel or motel; a restaurant or lounge; a clubhouse; a meeting facility; a storage or parking facility; or a mining platform, dredge, dragline, or similar facility or entity represented as such.  Incidental movement upon water or resting partially or entirely on the bottom does not, in and of itself, preclude an entity from classification as a floating structure. (g)  "Gross negligence" means conduct so reckless or wanting in care that it constitutes a conscious disregard or indifference to the safety of the property to such conduct. (h)  "Moored" means a vessel that is anchored or affixed in some other way to the public trust tidelands, to leased tidelands, to private land, or within the riparian zone of a private or public landowner or leaseholder. (i) "Registered" means a vessel documented under Section 59-21-5. (j)  "Unseaworthy" means a vessel that is not fit or safe for any normal perils of the sea or has no effective means of propulsion. (k)  "Vessel" means every description of watercraft, other than a seaplane, capable of being used as a means of transportation on the water.  For the purposes of this section, vessels powered only by hand, foot, oars or paddles, are included.    For the purposes of this section, floatable buildings and structures, whether or not they are used for navigation, are included. (l)  "Waters of the state" means any waters located within Harrison, Hancock and Jackson Counties under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Department of Marine Resources as established pursuant to Section 49-15-23. (m)  "Willful misconduct" means conduct evidencing carelessness or negligence of such a degree or recurrence as to manifest culpability, wrongful intent, or evil design or to show an intentional and substantial disregard of the interests of the vessel owner. (2)  Jurisdiction. (a)  (i)  In the waters of Harrison, Hancock and Jackson Counties, a person, firm, corporation or other entity may not leave derelict or at risk of being derelict, any vessel on the coastal wetlands, marine waters, or on public or privately owned lands without the owner's permission. (ii)  The Department of Marine Resources has the authority to remove derelict vessels, whether located on private or public property. (iii)  Vessels located in ports and harbors are subject to the provisions outlined in Title 50, Mississippi Code of 1972, Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft. (iv)  Subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (a) does not apply to vessels located in marinas, garages or repair shops for repairs, improvements or other work with knowledge of the owner and for which the costs for such services have been unpaid. (v)  Vessels deemed to be derelict pursuant to this chapter are exempt from the salvage provisions in Section 89-17-1 et seq. (b)  (i)  In all other waters of the State of Mississippi, a person, firm, corporation or other entity may not leave derelict or at risk of being derelict, any vessel in the wetlands, public waters or waterways or on public or privately owned lands without the owner's permission. (ii)  Subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (b) does not apply to vessels located in public or private marinas, garages or repair shops for repairs, improvements or other work with knowledge of the owner and for which the costs for such services have been unpaid. (iii)  Vessels deemed to be derelict pursuant to this chapter are exempt from the salvage provisions of Section 89-17-1 et seq. (3)  Penalties. Violations of this section will be subject to the penalties as provided in Section 49-15-63. (4)  Standing.  A party with standing may initiate the derelict vessel procedures in this section.  For purpose of this section, the following parties have standing: (a)  The owner of the property where the vessel came to rest or to which the vessel was made fast; (b)  Any harbormaster, police department, municipality or agent of the state that agrees to accept or process a derelict vessel; or (c)  Any professional marine salvager when the salvager is engaged by a person with standing. (5)  Landowner permission may be revoked at any time.  The landowner must provide the department sufficient proof that the vessel owner has been notified of the revocation of landowner's permission or proof that the landowner cannot locate the owner of the vessel. When a vessel that is not otherwise leased to another party is moored upon public trust tidelands for a period of thirty (30) days or longer, permission must be granted by the Secretary of State's Office. (6)  Notice.  Any party with standing, or his or her representative, may initiate the notice process by filing an application with the department to remove the derelict vessel.  Upon receipt and review of the application, the department may initiate the following notice process: (a)  A department officer is authorized to board any vessel that has been reported to the department as being derelict or at risk of being derelict to determine the condition of the vessel and in an attempt to establish ownership of the vessel. (b)  A department officer shall post notice, which must comply with the following requirements: (i)  Be posted on the vessel in a prominent location, visible to an approaching person; (ii)  Require the vessel owner to submit a plan for removal to the department within seven (7) days of the notice; and (iii)  Include a space for the owner of the vessel to respond. (c)  If the registered owner responds with a signature in the space or otherwise provides a written response to the department requesting an extension of time, then the registered owner will have an additional five (5) days to submit the plan for removal. (d)  The department will notify the respondent of the approval or denial of the removal plan within seven (7) business days. (e)  If the respondent fails to comply with the approved removal plan and fails to submit a satisfactory reason as to why the vessel cannot be moved as planned, the department may present the removal plan and evidence of the owner's noncompliance to the chancery court. (f)  Upon presentation of the required evidence, the chancery court will issue an order allowing the department or its representative to remove the vessel from its current location and make whatever disposition is deemed appropriate, including, but not limited to, immediate disposal, storage pending disposal, use for official purposes, transfer to another state agency or other disposition. (g)  If the vessel is located in an area of coastal wetlands where emergent vegetation is present or where the vessel is embedded in the ground, a wetlands permit may be required prior to removal. (h)  Any party who acts in good faith and without malicious intent in the processing, storing or moving any derelict vessel pursuant to this section is immune from liability for damages to the vessel. (7)  Determining ownership.  (a)  Upon receipt of an application for the removal of a derelict vessel where no removal plan has been submitted by the owner, the department must attempt to contact the registered owner of the vessel and any lien holders of record by other available means. (b)  The department must inquire of the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks (MDWFP) as to the status of the vessel in regard to the Mississippi Boating Law of 1960, Section 59-21-1 et seq., or the United States Coast Guard as to the status of the vessel in regard to documentation under 46 USC, Chapter 121. (c)  The inquiry must provide the description of the vessel, including the vessel registration number. (d)  The MDWFP is required to provide the requested information to the department within two (2) business days. (e)  The registered owner of a vessel must comply with Section 59-21-21 to change ownership.  In the event a vessel owner fails to notify the MDWFP of a transfer of ownership and supply the new owner's contact information, the owner of the vessel according to MDWFP records is presumed to be the person to whom the vessel is registered. (f)  If there is no registered owner found, the department must make publication on the department's website and in a newspaper with general circulation for three (3) weeks, describing the vessel and the location. (8)  Derelict vessel removal.  (a)  After the initial notice period described in subsection (6) has lapsed and the department can show proof of inquiries to ascertain the vessel ownership under subsection (7) of this section, the department may obtain an order from the chancery court for the derelict vessel to be removed from its current location. (b)  The chancery court order may authorize the department to make whatever disposition is deemed appropriate, including, but not limited to, immediate disposal of the vessel, storage pending disposal, use for official purposes, transfer to another state agency or other disposition. (c)  If the vessel is located in an area of coastal wetlands where emergent vegetation is present or where the vessel is embedded in the ground, a wetlands permit may be required prior to removal. (d)  Any person who acts in good faith and without malicious intent in the processing, storing or moving of any derelict vessel pursuant to this section is immune from civil liability for damage to the vessel. (9)  Emergency removal. Any derelict vessel that is obstructing a waterway, is within any designated navigation channel or within one hundred (100) yards of the boundaries of any state, county or municipal port may be declared a hazard to navigation and subject to immediate relocation, removal disposal, or other disposition by the department or other party with standing. (a)  Any derelict vessel that is leaking any hazardous substances, chemicals or fuels will be reported to the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality (MDEQ) and may be declared an environmental hazard and subject to immediate relocation, removal, disposal or other disposition by MDEQ, the department or other party with standing. (b)  The registered owner of a vessel removed in accordance with this subsection (9) is liable for the costs associated with the relocation, removal, salvage storage or disposal of the vessel and any damages to the flora and fauna within the affected area. (c)  Any funds derived from salvage or sale of a vessel pursuant to this section will be used to offset the costs to the department associated with the removal, salvage, storage or disposal of the vessel. (d)  Any funds derived from damages to the flora and  fauna will be deposited into the Coastal Resource Management Fund if the Department of Marine Resources initiates the action. (e)  Any party who relocates or removes a vessel under this section is not liable for damages resulting from relocation or removal unless the damage results from gross negligence or willful misconduct. (10)  Cost recovery. (a)  The department may seek full cost recovery from the registered owner of the derelict vessel for any expense incurred as a result of, or incidental to, removing the vessel.  The registered owner of the vessel is liable for the costs of removal, storage, disposal, and restoration of affected lands, attorneys' fees, and all court costs. (b)  The owner of the vessel is also liable for an administrative penalty of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per day.  The penalty for emergency removal of vessels under subsection (9) of this section may be imposed by the Executive Director of the Department of Marine Resources upon the recommendation of the Advisory Commission on Marine Resources, under Section 49-15-401 et seq.  The fines for removal of all other vessels may be imposed by the chancery court. (c)  Expenses incurred, including, but not limited to, fines, court costs, vessel removal, storage, disposal, restoration of affected lands, and attorneys' fees for derelict vessels will be imposed by the chancery court as outlined in subsection (11) of this section. (d)  If the registered owner should fail to pay fines imposed by the department in accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection, an enforcement action will be filed with the chancery court which may result in the court issuing an order, including, but not limited to, the collection of fines, court costs, and/or any legal avenue the court finds appropriate to collect such funds. (e)  All proceeds from any activity initiated by the Department of Marine Resources related to the disposition of a vessel under this chapter will go into the Derelict Vessel Fund, a special fund within the Seafood Fund.  However, any fines imposed for the damage to coastal wetlands will be placed in the Coastal Resource Management Fund. (11)  Court process. (a)  The chancery court of the county in which the vessel is located has jurisdiction over all matters concerning derelict vessels under this section, including injunctions and demands for damages.  If the vessel is allowed to float and/or is otherwise moved to another county after notice has been provided under subsection (6) of this section, the county in which the vessel was first provided notice shall have continuing jurisdiction. (b)  If there is no response to the publication attempts under subsection (7)(e) of this section, the chancery court will issue an order to the department allowing the department to take possession of the vessel and make such use or disposition of the vessel as deemed appropriate under the circumstances.  If the department determines that the vessel may be used for official purposes or otherwise sold, the MDWFP will issue a vessel registration number or a hull identification number to the department after proof of publication has been submitted. (c)  The chancery court may, in its discretion, order damages up to Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per day for every day the vessel was left abandoned or derelict, beginning on the day notice was posted on the vessel. (d)  If the department or a party with standing desires to require the registered owner to remove the vessel, then he or she may apply to the chancery court for a writ of mandatory injunction ordering the registered owner to remove the vessel.  The chancery court must allow a reasonable time for removal and restoration of the affected lands.  The chancery court may order further damages not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per day for each day that the violation exists beyond the date set by the court in an injunction for the removal of the vessel and restoration of the affected lands. (e)  Any court-ordered reimbursed costs or damages in excess of the actual costs of removal and restoration initiated by the Department of Marine Resources must be deposited in a special fund in the State Treasury known as the "Derelict Vessel Fund" within the Seafood Fund.  Any funds deposited in the fund must be used to cover the administrative costs and removal costs incurred by the department for the removal of vessels.  Any remaining funds must be used to cover the costs of removing additional derelict vessels.  However, any fines imposed for the damage to coastal wetlands will be placed in the Coastal Resource Management Fund. (12)  Department authorities.  (a)  The department is authorized to enter into contracts with individuals, firms and corporations, or agreements with other state agencies for the removal and/or temporary storage of vessels prior to removal. The salvage value, if any, of the vessel may be used to offset the costs of the removal of the vessel and the restoration of the affected area.  The department may enter into noncompetitive contracts or agreements with any state or federal entity for the removal of vessels. (b)  The department may enter into interstate or intrastate agreements toward this end, and may seek and utilize aid from all federal, state, and local sources in this endeavor. (c)  The Department of Marine Resources shall adopt rules and regulations necessary and appropriate to carry out this section for actions falling within its jurisdiction. (d)  The department may promulgate regulations to establish a derelict vessel prevention program to address vessels at risk of becoming derelict.  Such program may, but is not required to, include: (i)  Removal, relocation, and destruction of vessels declared a public nuisance due to the lack of proper marine sanitation, derelict or at risk of becoming derelict, or lost or abandoned. (ii)  Creation of a vessel turn-in program allowing the owner of a vessel determined by the department to be at risk of becoming derelict, to turn the vessel and vessel title over to the department to be destroyed without penalty. (iii)  Providing for removal and destruction or other disposition of an abandoned vessel for which an owner cannot be identified or the owner of which is deceased and no heir is interested in acquiring the vessel. (iv)  Purchase of anchor line, anchors, and other equipment necessary for securing vessels at risk of becoming derelict. (v)  Creating or acquiring moorings designated for securing vessels at risk of becoming derelict. (e)  The State of Mississippi, the Commission on Marine Resources, the Department of Marine Resources, and their employees and representatives shall not be liable for any damages resulting from the removal, towing, storage, sale or disposal of any vessel that is derelict or hazardous under this section. (f)  The department or any party with standing does not incur liability for any resulting damage to the vessel or any damage the vessel may cause to any property or person during the time frame between posting notice and vessel removal.  If any damages occur during the period of time between notice and removal of the vessel, the registered vessel owner, according to MDWFP records, is presumed liable for all damages. SECTION 169.  Section 57-15-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 57-15-5.  (1)  It is hereby declared to be the intent of the Legislature by this chapter that the policy of the council hereby created shall be conducted according to the following guidelines: the council shall have the general purpose and policy of studying and developing plans, proposals, reports and recommendations for the development and utilization of the coastal and offshore lands, waters and marine resources of this state in order to ensure that all future plans and/or programs of the State of Mississippi involving the field of marine resources and sciences, oceanographic research, and related studies, will be coordinated with comparable functions and programs of agencies of the United States government.  The council shall further have the purpose and policy to help coordinate, as hereinabove provided, all plans of other agencies of this state engaged in similar activities and of the various states of the United States of America, and also with all private agencies whose purpose is marine science and resource development.  The council is further authorized to enter into contract with any state or federal agency as may be necessary and requisite to carry out the purposes of this chapter.  The council shall have the responsibility for the general management of the state's wetlands. (2)  The council is authorized and empowered to solicit and accept financial support from sources other than the state, including private or public sources or foundations.  All funds received by or appropriated to the council shall be deposited upon receipt thereof into a special fund in the State Treasury to be known and designated as the "Mississippi Marine Resources Fund."  Expenditures from said fund shall be made in the following manner:  expenditures by and for the council for the purpose of carrying out its functions as provided by law shall be made with the approval of the council at any meeting upon requisitions presented to the State Auditor in the manner provided by law, and paid by the State Treasurer.  Full and complete accounting shall be kept and made by the council for all funds received and expended by it.  Representatives of the office of the State Auditor of Public Accounts annually shall audit the expenditure of funds received by the council from all sources and the said auditor shall make a complete and detailed report of such audit to the Legislature.  It is further provided that all state appropriated funds expended shall conform to all requirements of law as provided for expenditures. (3)  The council may solicit, receive and expend contributions, matching funds, gifts, bequests and devises from any source, whether federal, state, public or private, as authorized by annual appropriations therefor. (4)  The council may enter into agreements with federal, state, public or private agencies, departments, institutions, firms, corporations or persons to carry out its policies as provided for in this chapter.  To accomplish these goals, the council may expend any such sums from any source as herein provided. The agreements provided for in this subsection shall include, but not be limited to, the following provisions: (a)  The duration of the agreement; (b)  The purpose of the agreement; (c)  A description of the procedures to be used in carrying out the purpose of the agreement; and (d)  Provisions for termination of the agreement. Any entity entering into such an agreement shall comply with the provisions therein. (5)  The council is authorized and empowered to accept financial support from any federal outer continental shelf revenue sharing programs.  All funds received from such programs shall be deposited upon receipt thereof into a special trust fund in the State Treasury to be known and designated as the "Outer Continental Shelf Trust Fund."  Expenditures from said fund shall be made for the benefit of any project affecting any county in the State of Mississippi which borders on the Gulf of Mexico with the approval of the Legislature. (6)  The council may contract with other governmental agencies and third parties for the acquisition and management of lands and properties for inclusion in the "Coastal Preserve System."  For purposes of these contracts with other governmental agencies or third parties and the expenditure of funds pursuant to the contracts, the "Coastal Preserve System" as defined by the council shall be deemed to be a part of the ecosystems of the Public Trust Tidelands.  Contracts authorized under this section may provide funds for the management of properties included in the "Coastal Preserve System." (7)  There is established a special account to be known as the "Coastal Preserve System Timber Account" within the Mississippi Marine Resources Fund.  Any funds received from the salvage or harvesting of timber or sale of other forest products from lands included in or managed as a part of the Coastal Preserve System shall be credited to the account.  Any unexpended funds remaining in the account at the end of the year shall not lapse, but shall remain in the account.  The account shall be treated as a special trust fund and interest earned on the principal shall be credited to the account.  Any funds in the account may be expended, subject to the approval of the Legislature, for the management and improvement of the Coastal Preserve System and for the acquisition of additional lands for inclusion in the Coastal Preserve System. SECTION 170.  Section 59-1-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-1-17.  (1)  The several port commissions in the State of Mississippi are each hereby vested with full jurisdiction and control of any and all lands lying within, or adjacent to, any river, bay or natural lake which are now, or heretofore were, below the mean high tide mark, and which lands lie within or adjacent to any port or harbor within the jurisdiction of such port commission, and as to which lands the claims of private persons or private corporations have been, or hereinafter are, acquired by such port commission, or by the city for its benefit, by purchase, lease, conveyance or eminent domain proceedings.  Any such port commission is hereby authorized to reclaim any and all such lands, by filling, dredging or other methods and to utilize, lease or dispose of same for the development and operation of the port to the same extent it is now, or may hereinafter be, authorized to utilize its other facilities. (2)  It is hereby declared that the leasing or use for commercial purposes, port purposes and for industrial development related thereto of the following described submerged lands and tidelands belonging to the State of Mississippi in an area lying between the East Pascagoula River and the West Pascagoula River, Jackson County, Mississippi, will serve a higher public interest in accordance with the purposes of this section and with the public policy of this state as set forth in Section 49-27-3, said property being more particularly described as follows: All that part of the Lowry Island Resurvey, which is bounded on the South by the L&N (now CSX) Railroad Track; on the East by the East Pascagoula River; on the West by the West Pascagoula River; and on the North by the North corporate limits of the City of Pascagoula and the South corporate limits of the City of Moss Point, LESS AND EXCEPT, however, that part of said property now owned by any private corporations. (3)  The governing authority of the city in which such state lands are located is hereby authorized to apply for and secure a lease in accordance with Section 29-1-107, except for a period of not to exceed forty (40) years, of such state lands as may be necessary for the development for commercial purposes, port purposes and related industrial facilities in the aforesaid areas described in subsection (2) hereof. Application for a lease shall be made with the Secretary of State. Utilization of any and all submerged land and/or tideland shall be in such a manner so as not to obstruct normal navigation of any normal and natural channel.  Title to the property shall remain vested in the State of Mississippi. All oil, gas and other minerals in, on or under said lands leased are hereby specifically reserved unto the State of Mississippi. The city governing authority is hereby authorized to sublease such lands for commercial purposes, port purposes and for industrial development related thereto. All subleases executed by the city governing authority shall be on such terms and conditions, and with such safeguards, as will best promote and protect the public interest.  Such subleases shall be submitted to the Secretary of State for approval.  Each sublease shall provide that if such property is not utilized within five (5) years, or if commercial, port or industrial usage ceases and such termination continues for a period of two (2) years, the sublease shall terminate and all rights thereunder shall revert to the city.  If such nonutilization for a period of five (5) years or cessation of use for a period of two (2) years shall be caused, suspended, delayed or interrupted by act of God, fire, war, rebellion, scarcity of water, insurrection, riot, strike, scarcity of labor, differences with employees, failure of a carrier to transport or furnish facilities for transportation; or as a result of some order, rule or regulation of any federal, state, municipality or other governmental agency; or as the result of failure of the sublessee to obtain any required permit or certificate; or as the result of any cause whatsoever beyond the control of sublessee, the time of such delay or interruption shall not be counted against the sublessee in determining such period of five (5) years or two (2) years. All subleases shall be for a fair and adequate consideration and the compensation and revenues therefrom shall be retained by the state. (4)  (a)  It is further declared that it will serve a higher public interest in accordance with the purposes of this section and with the public policy of the state as set forth in Section 49-27-3 for the following parcels of the Lowry Island Resurvey to be subleased for the purpose of developing multiunit residential structures, height not exceeding fifty (50) feet, that are an integral part of a public marina:  (i) that parcel consisting of existing filled tidelands or fastlands lying immediately adjacent to the East Pascagoula River and north right-of-way boundary of U.S. Highway 90; and (ii) that parcel consisting of existing filled tidelands or fastlands lying immediately adjacent to the West Pascagoula River and north right-of-way boundary of U.S. Highway 90. (b)  The governing authority of the city in which are located the parcels described in this subsection may sublease such parcels for such residential development upon the same terms and conditions prescribed in subsection (3). (5)  This section is to be considered as supplementary and cumulative and nothing in this section shall be construed as repealing or amending any options, leases, deeds, contracts, agreements or legal instruments heretofore entered into by the governing authorities of the municipality in which the port of entry is located, or the port commission. SECTION 171.  Section 59-9-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-9-21.  (1)  In addition to the powers and authority elsewhere conferred by this chapter, the board of supervisors of any county in which there has been created a county port authority or county development commission, acting through its county port authority or county development commission, shall have the power and authority to rebuild and restore to its previous width and height any sloping beach or sand beach heretofore pumped in or dredged to protect a public highway extending along the beach or shore of any body of tidewater which is exposed to or in danger of damage by water driven against the shore by storms or hurricanes, as heretofore authorized by Section 1 of Chapter 319 enacted at the 1924 Regular Session of the Mississippi Legislature; and to let by competitive bids a contract therefor in the manner and by the procedure set out in Section 59-9-27. In addition to bonds heretofore issued pursuant to Chapter 462, Laws of 1971, the board of supervisors may issue and sell full faith and credit bonds of said county in the manner and by the procedure set out in this chapter in an amount not exceeding Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00), subject to the limitations and conditions of this chapter, and may apply thereon any funds now or hereafter made available to the use or pledge of the said development commission, and to dredge, fill in and reclaim submerged lands and tidelands belonging to the State of Mississippi. (2)  It is hereby declared that the leasing for the development of port and related industrial facilities of the following described submerged lands and tidelands belonging to the State of Mississippi in an area immediately adjacent to the present port and industrial complex known as the Bayou Casotte Area in Jackson County, Mississippi, will serve a higher public interest in accordance with the purposes of this section and with the public policy of this state as set forth in Section 49-27-3, said property being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at the Northeast corner of the Southeast Quarter of Section 20, Township 8 South, Range 5 West and at grid coordinates N242,489.57 feet, E606,331.52 feet; runs thence North 89 degrees 10' 22" East along the Mid-Section Line of Section 21, Township 8 South, Range 5 West, 661.48 feet to a point at grid coordinates N242,499.12 feet, E606,992.93 feet; runs thence South 0 degrees 27' 25" East 1,621.39 feet to a two inch iron pipe with cap, set in concrete at grid coordinates N240,877.78 feet, E607,005.86 feet, said point being the Southeast corner of the property conveyed to Corchem, Inc., by H.K. Porter Company, Inc., by instrument dated December 31, 1971, recorded in Deed Book 419, page 182, Land Deed records of Jackson County, Mississippi, and being the point of beginning; runs thence South 0 degrees 27' 25" East, 1,018.61 feet to a point on the South line of said Section 21, said point being North 89 degrees 18' 22" East, 650.33 feet, of the Southwest corner of said Section 21; runs thence South 0 degrees 27' 25" East, 2,306.58 feet, to a two inch iron pipe with cap, set in concrete at grid coordinates N237,552.70 feet, E607,032.37 feet; thence continues South 0 degrees 27' 25" East 173 feet, more or less, to the mean water line of the Mississippi Sound, at scaled grid coordinates N237,379 feet, N607,033 feet; runs thence South 0 degrees 27' 25" East 1,379 feet, more or less, to the intersection of the N236,000 grid line, at grid coordinates N236,000.00 feet, E607,044.75 feet; runs thence North 90 degrees 00' 00" West, with the N236,000 grid line, 3,305 feet, more or less, to the mean water line of the Mississippi Sound on the East side of a Spoil Island, at scaled grid coordinates N236,000 feet, E603,740 feet; runs thence across said Spoil Island, North 90 degrees 00' 00" West, 195 feet, more or less, to the mean water line of the Mississippi Sound on the West side of said Spoil Island at scaled grid coordinates N236,000 feet, E603,545 feet; runs thence North 90 degrees 00' 00" West, with the N236,000 grid line 2,140 feet, more or less, to the East Harbor Line of Bayou Casotte at grid coordinates N236,000.00 feet, E601,404.38 feet; runs thence with the East Harbor Line of Bayou Casotte North 0 degrees 03' 00" West, 4,056.52 feet to a point at grid coordinates N240,056.52 feet, E601,400.84 feet; thence continues with the East Harbor Line of Bayou Casotte North 6 degrees 34' 54" East, 746.48 feet to a point that is South 89 degrees 10' 22" West of the point of beginning and at grid coordinates N240,798.08 feet, E601,486.40 feet; runs thence North 89 degrees 10' 22" East, 780 feet, more or less, to the mean water line of the Mississippi Sound at scaled grid coordinates N240,809 feet, E602,266 feet; runs thence North 89 degrees 10' 22" East, 60 feet, more or less, to a two inch iron pipe with cap, set in concrete at grid coordinates N240,810.22 feet, E602,326.35 feet; thence continues North 89 degrees 10' 22" East, along the South boundary of Corchem, Inc., property 4,680.00 feet to the point of beginning and contains 623.7 acres, more or less.  The real property herein described is situated in the South one half of Section 20, Southwest Quarter of the Southwest Quarter of Section 21, West one half of the Northwest Quarter of Fractional Section 28, and Fractional Section 29, all being located in Township 8 South, Range 5 West, Jackson County, Mississippi.  LESS AND EXCEPT any portion of the following described property which is not owned or otherwise held in trust by the State of Mississippi: Commencing at the Northeast corner of the Southeast Quarter of Section 20, Township 8 South, Range 5 West and at grid coordinates N242,489.57 feet, E606,331.52 feet; runs thence North 89 degrees 10' 22" East along the Mid-Section line of Section 21, Township 8 South, Range 5 West, 661.48 feet to a point at grid coordinates N242,499.12 feet, E606,992.93 feet; runs thence South 0 degrees 27' 25" East, 1621.39 feet to a two inch iron pipe with cap, set in concrete, at grid coordinates N240,877.78 feet, E607,005.86 feet, said point being the Southeast corner of the property conveyed to Corchem, Inc., by H.K. Porter Company, Inc., by deed dated December 31, 1971, recorded in Deed Book 419, page 182, Land Deed Records of Jackson County, Mississippi, and the point of beginning; runs thence South 0 degrees 27' 25" East, 1,018.61 feet to a point on the South line of said Section 21, said point being 650.33 feet East of the Southwest corner of said Section 21; runs thence South 0 degrees 27' 25" East 2,306.58 feet to a two inch iron pipe with cap, set in concrete at grid coordinates N237,552.70 feet, E607,032.37 feet; thence continues South 0 degrees 27' 25" East, 173 feet, more or less, to the mean water line of the Mississippi Sound as existed in 1961; runs thence Northwesterly along the said meandering mean water line to a point on the West line of Fractional Section 28, Township 8 South, Range 5 West; thence continues along the meandering mean water line of the Mississippi Sound in a Northwesterly direction to a point on the North line of Fractional Section 29, Township 8 South, Range 5 West; thence continues along said meandering water line of the Mississippi Sound in a Northwesterly direction to a point that is South 89 degrees 10' 22" West of the point of beginning; runs thence North 89 degrees 10' 22" East, 60 feet, more or less, to a two inch iron pipe with cap, set in concrete, at grid coordinates N240,810.22 feet, E602,326.35 feet; thence continues North 89 degrees 10' 22" East along the South boundary of Corchem, Inc., property, 4,680.00 feet to the point of beginning.  The parcel of land herein described is situated in the South one-half of Section 20, the Southwest Quarter of the Southwest Quarter of Section 21, the West one-half of the Northwest Quarter of Fractional Section 28, and Fractional Section 29, all being in Township 8, Range 5 West, Jackson County, Mississippi, and contains 205.4 acres, more or less. Bearings and grid coordinates used in this description refer to the Transverse Mercator Projection for the State of Mississippi East Zone. (3)  It is hereby declared that the leasing or use for commercial fishing purposes, port purposes and for industrial development related thereto of the following described submerged lands and tidelands belonging to the State of Mississippi in an area lying between the East Pascagoula River and Middle River, Jackson County, Mississippi, will serve a higher public interest in accordance with the purposes of this section and with the public policy of this state as set forth in Section 49-27-3, said property being more particularly described as follows: All that part of the Lowry Island Resurvey, which is bounded on the North by the L&N Railroad Track; on the East by the East Pascagoula River; on the West by Middle River; and on the South by the Mississippi Sound; and also the dredged-up Spoil Island, known as Singing River Island, lying South of the above described land and South of the launching channel South of the lands leased to Litton Ship Systems, Inc., and lying West of the federally maintained dredged channel going from Horn Island Pass to East Pascagoula River; LESS AND EXCEPT, however, that part of said property now owned by Jackson County, Mississippi, and the State of Mississippi and leased to Litton Ship Systems, Inc. (4)  Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the county port authority of the county in which such state lands are located is hereby authorized to apply for and secure a lease for a period of not to exceed ninety-nine (99) years of such state lands as may be necessary for the development of commercial fishing, port and related industrial facilities in the aforesaid areas described in subsections (2) and (3) hereof except for the provisions of subsection (5) of this section. Application for a lease shall be made with the Secretary of State. Utilization of any and all submerged land and/or tideland shall be in such a manner so as not to obstruct normal navigation of any normal and natural channel.  Title to the property shall remain vested in the State of Mississippi. All oil, gas and other minerals in, on or under said lands leased are hereby specifically reserved unto the State of Mississippi. The county port authority is hereby authorized to sublease such lands for commercial fishing, port purposes and for industrial development related thereto. All subleases executed by the county port authority shall be on such terms and conditions, and with such safeguards, as will best promote and protect the public interest.  Such subleases shall be submitted to the Secretary of State for approval. Provided, however, that each sublease shall provide that if such property is not utilized within five (5) years, or if commercial fishing, industrial or port usage ceases and such termination continues for a period of two (2) years, the sublease shall terminate and all rights thereunder shall revert to the county. However, if such nonutilization for a period of five (5) years or cessation of use for a period of two (2) years shall be caused, suspended, delayed or interrupted by act of God, fire, war, rebellion, scarcity of water, insurrection, riot, strike, scarcity of labor, differences with employees, failure of a carrier to transport or furnish facilities for transportation; or as a result of some order, rule or regulation of any federal, state, municipality or other governmental agency; or as the result of failure of the sublessee to obtain any required permit or certificate; or as the result of any cause whatsoever beyond the control of sublessee, the time of such delay or interruption shall not be counted against sublessee in determining such periods of five (5) years or two (2) years.  All subleases shall be for a fair and adequate consideration and the compensation and revenues therefrom may be retained by the state or shared with the county in a fashion approved by the Secretary of State for port purposes and industrial development.  Such compensation and revenues may be pledged by the county to payment of any bonds required to be issued to finance such commercial fishing, port and industrial development, including a United States Navy home port.  However, in the event bonds are issued as provided herein, upon the discharge and payment of the principal and interest of such bonds, any additional revenue generated shall be retained by the state or shared with the county for port purposes and industrial development in a fashion approved by the Secretary of State. (5)  (a)  Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, upon selection of Jackson County as a site for a home port for a Surface Action Group and upon review of the contract authorized in Section 1 of Chapter 812, Laws of 1985, as amended, the Secretary of State is hereby authorized to lease for a period not to exceed ninety-nine (99) years or sell if required by the United States Navy or the United States Department of Defense such state lands as may be necessary for the development by the United States Navy or the United States Department of Defense for a home port and related facilities for a naval squadron in the aforesaid area described in subsection (3) hereof.  It is hereby declared that the leasing or sale to the United States Navy or the United States Department of Defense of any of the aforesaid area described in subsection (3) hereof will provide a major stimulus to employment in Jackson County and the state and will serve a higher public interest in accordance with the purposes of this section and with the public policy as set forth in Section 49-27-3, and such lease or sale may be made for nominal consideration. (i)  If the subject property is to be sold to the United States Navy or to the United States Department of Defense, the instrument of conveyance, which shall be by quitclaim deed, shall include the following: 1.  A reservation of all oil, gas and other minerals in, on and under the subject property subject to a provision that no exploration, exploitation or development of any minerals shall be undertaken without prior written consent of the United States Navy; which consent shall not be unreasonably withheld; 2.  A reverter which shall be created, declared, imposed and resolved in said quitclaim deed according to the terms of which said title to the subject property shall automatically revert to the state.  The reversion shall automatically occur if a. construction of the home port facilities has not commenced within two (2) years of the conveyance of the subject property or b. thereafter, if the subject property is no longer required by the Navy for a home port or related facilities and the Secretary of the Navy shall so determine and promptly notify the State of Mississippi of said determination.  In the event of said determination, the subject property as improved shall automatically revert to the State of Mississippi, and the state may pay to the United States of America the fair market value of the Navy's improvements within five (5) years from the date of reversion, less the fair market value of the state and/or county-financed facilities; however, the county financed facilities shall revert to Jackson County unless the state finances the same or unless otherwise agreed upon by Jackson County and the state.  If the State of Mississippi elects not to pay to the United States of America the fair market value of the Navy's improvements within said period of five (5) years, then said property and all facilities financed by the State of Mississippi and financed by Jackson County shall automatically revert to the United States of America. (ii)  If the subject property is to be leased to the United States Navy or to the United States Department of Defense, the lease agreement shall contain a termination clause which shall declare that the lease shall be rescinded if either of the conditions described in subsection (5)(a)(i)2 of this section occur.  If the condition described in subsection (5)(a)(i)2b of this section occurs, the United States Navy and the United States Department of Defense shall be allowed two (2) years from the date of termination or utilization of the area leased in which to remove any improvements or facilities thereon, excluding any county financed facilities, which shall revert to Jackson County unless otherwise agreed upon by Jackson County and the state.  All references to payment for county financed facilities upon reversion shall also apply to the state if it finances the same. (b)  Provided, however, if revenue bonds are to be issued by the State Bond Commission under Section 1 of Chapter 500, Laws of 1985, then the lands referred to in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be sold to the United States Navy or to the United States Department of Defense but may only be leased and such lease may contain an option to purchase when such bonds are retired.  In this case an additional clause shall be included in the lease agreement to provide that upon termination of the lease agreement prior to the retirement of all revenue bonds issued under Section 1 of Chapter 306, Laws of 1987, such payments by the United States Navy or the United States Department of Defense as are necessary to retire such revenue bonds shall become due and payable on the date of the termination of the lease. (6)  This section is to be considered as supplementary and cumulative and nothing in this section shall be construed as repealing existing laws, or as repealing or amending any options, leases, deeds, contracts, agreements or legal instruments heretofore entered into by the board of supervisors of such county, the county port authority, the governing authorities of the municipality in which the port of entry is located, or the port commission.  The grant of powers to the board of supervisors of such county, the county port authority, the governing authorities of the municipality in which the port of entry is located, and the port commission, where granted herein by reference to existing statutes, shall incorporate such statutes herein seriatim, and the subsequent amendment or repeal of such statutes shall not limit or rescind the powers and authority hereby conferred unless expressly so provided in such amending or repealing statute. SECTION 172.  Section 59-9-67, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 59-9-67.  (1)  For the purposes set out in subsection (1) of Section 59-9-65, the board of supervisors of such county, acting by and through the county port authority, and with the supervision and approval of the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board, shall have the power to dredge, fill in and reclaim submerged lands and tidelands belonging to the State of Mississippi; and the state land commissioner, with the approval of the Attorney General and the Governor, is hereby authorized and empowered to convey such reclaimed submerged lands and tidelands to such county and to issue the state's patent therefor, but all oil, gas and other minerals in, on or under said lands are hereby specifically reserved unto the State of Mississippi.  Such county, acting through its county port authority, shall have the further power to develop and utilize such lands for any of such purposes, provided, however, that no normal or natural channel shall be obstructed so as to interfere with the normal navigation therein. (2)  The board of supervisors of such county, acting jointly with the county port authority, and with the approval of the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board, shall have the power to lease such lands, for a term not in excess of ninety-nine (99) years from the date of such lease, or to sell or otherwise dispose of such land to the State of Mississippi, or to individuals, firms or corporations, public or private, for industrial operations, on such terms and conditions and with such safeguards as will best promote and protect the public interest, and they are hereby authorized to transfer possession and/or title to any part or all of such lands by deed, lease, contract, or other customary business instrument. (3)  Any facilities constructed or acquired for use on such lands under the provisions of Section 59-5-11, including, but not limited to, machinery or equipment, may be leased for a term not in excess of ninety-nine (99) years from the date of such lease, or sold, or otherwise disposed of to the State of Mississippi or to individuals, firms or corporations, public or private, for industrial operations, on such terms and conditions, with such safeguards as will best promote and protect the public interest, and subject to the limitations set out in Section 59-5-11, and the board of supervisors of such county, acting jointly with the county port authority, and with the approval of the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board, is authorized to transfer possession and/or title to any part, or all of such facilities, machinery or equipment by deed, lease, contract, or other customary business instrument. SECTION 173.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.